10-K 1 unp-20181231x10k.htm 10-K
 
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
[X]     ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2018
OR
[  ]     TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF
THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from __________ to ____________
Commission File Number 1-6075
UNION PACIFIC CORPORATION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
UTAH  13-2626465
(State or other jurisdiction of  (I.R.S. Employer
incorporation or organization)  Identification No.)
1400 DOUGLAS STREET , OMAHA, NEBRASKA
(Address of principal executive of fices)
68179
(Zip Code)
(402) 544-5000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each Class  Name of each exchange on which
registered
Common Stock (Par V alue $2.50 per
share) New York Stock Exchange, Inc.
§Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule
405 of the Securities Act.
☑ Yes   ☐ No
§Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13
or Section 15(d) of the Act.
☐ Yes   ☑ No
§Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by
Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months
(or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has
been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
☑ Yes   ☐ No
§Indicate by check mark whether the registran t has submitted electronically every Interactive
Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this
chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was
required to submit such files).
☑ Yes   ☐ No
§Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinque nt filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation
S-K (§229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best
of the registrant’ s knowl edge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by
reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K.
☑
§Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated
filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller report ing company .  See the definitions of “large
accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller reporting company” in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act.
Large accelerated
filer ☑Accelerated
filer ☐Non-accelerated
filer ☐Smaller reporting
company ☐
§Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2
of the Act).
☐ Yes   ☑ No
§If an emerging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to
use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial
accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a ) of the Exchange Act.
      ☐
§As of June 29, 2018, the aggregate market value of the registrant’ s Common Stock held by
non-af filiates (using the New York Stock Exchange closing price) was $104.6  billion .
The number of shares outstanding of the regis trant’ s Common Stock as of February 1, 2019
was 722,877,817.
 
 
 
 
Documents Incorporated by Reference – Portions of the registrant’s definitive Proxy
Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on May 16, 2019, are
incorporated by reference into Part III of this report. The registrant’s Proxy Statement
will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Regulation 14A.
UNION PACIFIC CORPORATION
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Chairman’s Letter 3
Directors and Senior Management 4
  
PART I
 
  
Item 1. Business 5
Item 1A. Risk Factors 9
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 13
Item 2. Properties 14
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 16
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 18
Executive Officers of the Registrant and Principal Executive
Officers of Subsidiaries 19
  
PART II
 
  
Item 5. Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder
Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 20
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 22
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations 23
Critical Accounting Policies 39
Cautionary Information 43
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 43
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 44
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 45
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting
and Financial Disclosure 79
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 79
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial
Reporting 80
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 81
Item 9B. Other Information 82
  
PART III
 
  
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance 82
Item 11. Executive Compensation 82
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and
Management and Related Stockholder Matters 82
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director
Independence 83
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 83
  
PART IV
 
  
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 84
Signatures
Certifications85
94
 
 
 
 
2
 
February 8, 2019
Fellow Shareholders:
I am pleased to report that Union Pacific produced record 2018 financial results and
finished the year with significant improvements in service reliability and efficiency, after
overcoming network congestion and excess operating costs.  The year was also one of
change, as we embarked on a fundamental shift in our operating philosophy by adopting
precision scheduled railroading (PSR) principles with the launch of Unified Plan 2020.  An
increase in customer shipments of 4 percent in 2018, coupled with core pricing and
productivity gains, generated earnings of $7.91 per share.  This represents a 37 percent
improvement compared to 2017 adjusted results of $5.79 per share*.  Our operating ratio
was 62.7 percent, 0.1 point better than last year’s adjusted 62.8 percent*.
Premium carloadings were up 6 percent, driven primarily by increases in international and
domestic intermodal shipments.  Our Industrial business unit also experienced a 6 percent
increase in shipments across a number of segments due to strong industrial production,
while Agricultural Products carloadings were down 1 percent reflecting lower export grain
movements.  Energy volume declined 2 percent due to lower coal and frac sand
carloadings, partially offset by an increase in petroleum products shipments.
As we entered 2018, the railroad was experiencing unusual network congestion on key
routes and in terminals that negatively impacted our operational performance.  These
inefficiencies also drove excess costs and impacted our ability to reliably serve our
customers.  In response, we initiated Unified Plan 2020 and began implementing PSR
October 1.  Fundamentally, PSR is an operating principle that emphasizes on-time service
performance for every rail car, execution accountability, and lean resource utilization, while
at the same time improving total safety performance.
Unified Plan 2020 implementation is progressing ahead of our original schedule, with the
initial roll out expected to be complete by mid-2019.  Results are encouraging as railroad
operations improved steadily throughout the fourth quarter, driving out excess costs.  We
removed over 1,200 locomotives and approximately 30,000 freight cars from our network
since August 1, which increases operational fluidity and provides a source of future growth
capacity. 
Despite our best efforts, we lost a little ground with our safety results in 2018.  Our 0.82
reportable personal injury rate increased 4 percent compared to 2017, although preliminary
results show this was the best safety performance for all Class 1 railroads for the fourth
year in a row.  Our reportable derailment incident rate and crossing incidents rate increased
12 and 5 percent, respectively, compared to 2017.  The entire Union Pacific team is not
satisfied with these results and will not be satisfied until every employee returns home
safely every day and we eliminate all derailments.  We are committed to making progress
toward these goals in 2019. 
As part of our robust capital program, we invested about $3.2 billion in 2018 including $1.8
billion in replacement capital to harden our infrastructure, replace older assets, and to
improve the safety and resiliency of our network.  We also invested $520 million toward
new rail capacity and commercial facilities projects to support future growth and
productivity initiatives.
Total shareholder return, including price appreciation and dividends, increased 5.3 percent
in 2018, compared to a negative 4.4 percent for the S&P 500.  Our return on invested
capital* of 15.1 percent increased 1.4 points over 2017’s adjusted 13.7 percent.  We raised
our quarterly dividend with two 10 percent increases, resulting in dividends paid in 2018
totaling $2.3 billion.  In addition, we repurchased 57.2 million Union Pacific shares,
decreasing our total share count by 6 percent.  Combining dividends and share
repurchases, Union Pacific returned $10.5 billion to our shareholders in 2018.
Looking to 2019, we are optimistic that continued economic growth, our improving service
performance, increasingly-efficient use of our assets, and the strength of our diverse
franchise will drive positive volume and top-line revenue growth.  We expect to generate
significant productivity benefits and enhance customer experience through our G55 + 0
initiatives and the continued roll out of Unified Plan 2020.  Every Union Pacific employee is
committed to achieving industry-leading safety, service reliability, and financial performance
in the coming year.
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
*See Item 7 of this report for reconciliations to U.S. GAAP.
 
3
 
DIRECTORS AND SENIOR MANAGEMENT
BOARD OF DIRECTORS
Andrew H. Card, Jr . Lance M. Fritz Thomas F . McLarty III
Former White House Chairman, President and President
Chief of Staff Chief Executive Officer McLarty Associates
Board Committees: Audit, Union Pacific Corporation and Board Committees: Finance
(Chair),
Compensation and Benefits Union Pacific Railroad
CompanyCorporate Governance and
Nominating
Erroll B. Davis, Jr . Deborah C. Hopkins
Former Chairman, Former Chief Executive Officer Bhavesh V . Patel
President & CEO Citi Ventures Chief Executive Officer and
Alliant Energy Corporation Former Chief Innovation Officer Chairman of the Management
Board
Board Committees:
CompensationCiti LyondellBasell Industries N.V.
and Benefits (Chair), Corporate Board Committees: Corporate Board Committees: Finance,
Governance and Nominating Governance and Nominating,
FinanceCompensation and Benefits
William J. DeLaney Jane H. Lute Jose H. V illarreal
Former Chief Executive Officer, President and Chief Executive
OfficerAdvisor
Sysco Corporation SICPA North America Akin, Gump, Strauss, Hauer &
Board Committees: Audit, Board Committees: Audit,
CorporateFeld, LLP
Compensation and Benefits Governance and Nominating Board Committees: Audit,
Compensation and Benefits
David B. Dillon Michael R. McCarthy
Former Chairman Chairman
The Kroger Company McCarthy Group, LLC
Board Committees: Audit (Chair), Lead Independent Director
Compensation and Benefits Board Committees: Corporate
Governance and Nominating
(Chair),
Finance
SENIOR MANAGEMENT*
Lance M. Fritz Thomas A. Lischer Todd M. Rynaski
Chairman, President and Executive Vice President-
OperationsVice President and Controller
Chief Executive Officer
Scott D. Moore Lynden L. T ennison
Prentiss W . Bolin, Jr . Senior Vice President-
CorporateExecutive Vice President and
Vice President-External
RelationsRelations and Chief Strategy Officer
Chief Administrative Officer
Bryan L. Clark V. James V ena
Vice President-Tax Jon T . Panzer Chief Operating Officer
Vice President and Treasurer
Rhonda S. Ferguson Elizabeth F . Whited
Executive Vice President, Chief
LegalClark J. Ponthier Executive Vice President and
Officer and Corporate Secretary Senior Vice President-Supply
ChainChief Human Resource Officer
And Continuous Improvement
Robert M. Knight, Jr .
Executive Vice President Kenny  G. Rocker
and Chief Financial Officer Executive Vice President-
Marketing
and Sales
*Senior management are elected of ficers of both Union Pacific Corporation and Union Pacific
Railroad Company , except M essrs. Lischer , Ponthier and Rocker  are elected of ficers for Union
Pacific Railroad Company .
.
 
 
4
 
PART I
Item 1. Business
GENERAL
Union Pacific Railroad Company is the principal operating company of Union Pacific
Corporation. One of America's most recognized companies, Union Pacific Railroad
Company links 23 states in the western two-thirds of the country by rail, providing a
critical link in the global supply chain.  The Railroad’s diversified business mix includes
Agricultural Products, Energy, Industrial and Premium. Union Pacific serves many of
the fastest-growing U.S. population centers, operates from all major West Coast and
Gulf Coast ports to eastern gateways, connects with Canada's rail systems and is the
only railroad serving all six major Mexico gateways. Union Pacific provides value to its
roughly 10,000 customers by delivering products in a safe, reliable, fuel-efficient and
environmentally responsible manner.
Union Pacific Corporation was incorporated in Utah in 1969 and maintains its principal
executive offices at 1400 Douglas Street, Omaha, NE 68179. The telephone number
at that address is (402) 544-5000. The common stock of Union Pacific Corporation is
listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the symbol “UNP”.
For purposes of this report, unless the context otherwise requires, all references herein
to “UPC”, “Corporation”, “Company”, “we”, “us”, and “our” shall mean Union Pacific
Corporation and its subsidiaries, including Union Pacific Railroad Company, which we
separately refer to as “UPRR” or the “Railroad”.
Available Information – Our Internet website is www.up.com. We make available free
of charge on our website (under the “Investors” caption link) our Annual Reports on
Form 10-K; our Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q; eXtensible Business Reporting
Language (XBRL) documents; our current reports on Form 8-K; our proxy statements;
Forms 3, 4, and 5, filed on behalf of our directors and certain executive officers; and
amendments to such reports filed or furnished pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act). We provide these reports and statements as
soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with, or
furnished to, the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). We also make available
on our website previously filed SEC reports and exhibits via a link to EDGAR on the
SEC’s Internet site at www.sec.gov. Additionally, our corporate governance materials,
including By-Laws, Board Committee charters, governance guidelines and policies,
and codes of conduct and ethics for directors, officers, and employees are available on
our website. From time to time, the corporate governance materials on our website
may be updated as necessary to comply with rules issued by the SEC and the NYSE
or as desirable to promote the effective and efficient governance of our Company. Any
security holder wishing to receive, without charge, a copy of any of our SEC filings or
corporate governance materials should send a written request to: Secretary, Union
Pacific Corporation, 1400 Douglas Street, Omaha, NE 68179.
We have included the Chief Executive Officer (CEO) and Chief Financial Officer (CFO)
certifications regarding our public disclosure required by Section 302 of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002 as Exhibits 31(a) and (b) to this report.
References to our website address in this report, including references in
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations, Item 7, are provided as a convenience and do not constitute, and should
not be deemed, an incorporation by reference of the information contained on, or
available through, the website. Therefore, such information should not be considered
part of this report.
OPERATIONS
The Railroad, along with its subsidiaries and rail affiliates, is our one reportable
operating segment. Although we provide revenue by commodity group, we analyze the
net financial results of the Railroad as one segment due to the integrated nature of our
rail network. Additional information regarding our business and operations, including
revenue and financial information and data and other information regarding
environmental matters, is presented in Risk Factors, Item 1A; Legal Proceedings, Item
3; Selected Financial Data, Item 6; Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations, Item 7; and the Financial Statements
and Supplementary Data, Item 8 (which include information regarding revenues,
statements of income, and total assets). 
 
 
5
 
Operations  – UPRR is a Class
I railroad operating in the U.S.
We have 32,236 route miles,
linking Pacific Coast and Gulf
Coast ports with the Midwest
and eastern U.S. gateways and
providing several corridors to
key Mexican gateways. We
serve the Western two-thirds of
the country and maintain
coordinated schedules with
other rail carriers to move
freight to and from the Atlantic
Coast, the Pacific Coast, the
Southeast, the Southwest,
Canada, and Mexico. Export
and import traffic moves through
Gulf Coast and Pacific Coast
ports and across the Mexican
and Canadian borders. Our
freight traffic consists of bulk,2018 Freight Revenue
manifest, and premium business. Bulk traffic primarily consists of coal, grain, soda
ash, ethanol, rock and crude oil shipped in unit trains – trains transporting a single
commodity from one origin to one destination. Manifest traffic includes individual
carload or less than train-load business involving commodities such as lumber, steel,
paper, food and chemicals. The transportation of finished vehicles, auto parts,
intermodal containers and truck trailers are included as part of our premium business.
In 2018, we generated freight revenues totaling $21.4 billion from the following four
commodity groups:
Agricultural Products – Transportation of grains, commodities produced from these
grains, fertilizer, and food and beverage products generated 21% of the Railroad’s
2018 freight revenue. We access most major grain markets, linking the Midwest and
Western U.S. producing areas to export terminals in the Pacific Northwest and Gulf
Coast ports, as well as Mexico. We also serve significant domestic markets, including
grain processors, animal feeders and ethanol producers in the Midwest, West, South
and Rocky Mountain states. Fertilizer movements originate in the Gulf Coast region,
the western U.S. and Canada (through interline access) for delivery to major
agricultural users in the Midwest, western U.S., as well as abroad.
Energy – The Company’s Energy shipments are grouped into the following three
categories: (i) coal, (ii)  sand and (iii) petroleum, liquid petroleum gases (LPG) and
renewables. In 2018, this group generated 21% of our freight revenue. The Railroad’s
network supports the transportation of coal shipments to independent and regulated
power companies and industrial facilities throughout the U.S. Through interchange
gateways and ports, UPRR’s reach extends to eastern U.S. utilities, as well as to
Mexico and other international destinations. Coal traffic originating in the Powder River
Basin (PRB) area of Wyoming is the largest segment of the Railroad’s coal business.
Demand for hydraulic fracturing sand, or frac-sand, is generated by oil and gas drilling,
whereas, the Company’s petroleum and LPG shipments are primarily impacted by
refinery utilization rates, regional crude pricing differentials, pipeline capacity, and the
use of asphalt for road programs. Renewable shipments consist primarily of biomass
exports and wind turbine components.
Industrial – Our extensive network facilitates the movement of numerous commodities
between thousands of origin and destination points throughout North America. The
Industrial group consists of several categories, including construction, industrial
chemicals, plastics, forest products, specialized products (primarily waste, lime, salt
and government), metals and ores, and soda ash. Transportation of these products
accounted for 27% of our freight revenue in 2018. Commercial, residential and
governmental infrastructure investments drive shipments of steel, aggregates (cement
components), cement and wood products. Industrial and light manufacturing plants
receive steel, nonferrous materials, minerals and other raw materials.
The industrial chemicals market consists of a vast number of chemical compounds that
support the manufacturing of more complex chemicals. Plastics shipments support
automotive, housing, and the durable and disposable consumer goods markets. Paper
and packaging commodities, as well as appliances, move to major metropolitan areas
for consumers. Forest product shipments originate primarily in the Pacific Northwest or
western Canada and move throughout the U.S. for use in new home construction and
repair and remodeling. Oil and gas drilling generates demand for raw steel, finished
pipe, stone and drilling fluid commodities. Soda ash originates in southwestern
Wyoming and California, destined for chemical and glass producing markets in North
America and abroad.
 
Premium – In 2018, the Premium franchise generated 31% of Union Pacific’s total
freight revenue. Our Premium franchise includes three segments: international
intermodal, domestic intermodal, and finished vehicles. International business consists
of import and export traffic moving in 20 or 40-foot shipping
 
6
 
containers, that mainly passes through West Coast ports served by UP’s extensive
terminal network. Domestic business includes container and trailer traffic picked up
and delivered within North America for intermodal marketing companies (primarily
shipper agents and logistics companies), as well as truckload carriers.
We are the largest automotive carrier west of the Mississippi River and operate or
access 38 vehicle distribution centers. The Railroad’s extensive franchise serves five
vehicle assembly plants and connects to West Coast ports, all six major Mexico
gateways, and the Port of Houston to accommodate both import and export shipments.
In addition to transporting finished vehicles, UPRR provides expedited handling of
automotive parts in both boxcars and intermodal containers destined for Mexico, the
U.S. and Canada.
Seasonality – Some of the commodities we carry have peak shipping seasons,
reflecting either or both the nature of the commodity and the demand cycle for the
commodity (such as certain agricultural and food products that have specific growing
and harvesting seasons). The peak shipping seasons for these commodities can vary
considerably each year depending upon various factors, including the strength of
domestic and international economies and currencies and the strength of harvests and
market prices for agricultural products.
Working Capital – At December 31, 2018, we had a working capital deficit. At
December 31, 2017, we had a working capital surplus. The deficit at 2018 year-end
was primarily due to an increase in upcoming debt maturities. As past years indicate, it
is not unusual for us to have a working capital deficit; however, we believe it is not an
indication of a lack of liquidity.  We also maintain adequate resources, including our
credit facility, and when necessary, access to capital markets to meet any foreseeable
cash requirements.
Competition – We are subject to competition from other railroads, motor carriers, ship
and barge operators, and pipelines. Our main railroad competitor is Burlington
Northern Santa Fe LLC. Its primary subsidiary, BNSF Railway Company (BNSF),
operates parallel routes in many of our main traffic corridors. In addition, we operate in
corridors served by other railroads and motor carriers. Motor carrier competition exists
for all four of our commodity groups (excluding most coal shipments). Because of the
proximity of our routes to major inland and Gulf Coast waterways, barges can be
particularly competitive, especially for grain and bulk commodities in certain areas
where we operate. In addition to price competition, we face competition with respect to
transit times, quality and reliability of service from motor carriers and other railroads.
Motor carriers in particular can have an advantage over railroads with respect to transit
times and timeliness of service.  However, railroads are much more fuel-efficient than
trucks, which reduces the impact of transporting goods on the environment and public
infrastructure, and we have been making efforts to convert certain truck traffic to
rail.  Additionally, we must build or acquire and maintain our rail system; trucks and
barges are able to use public rights-of-way maintained by public entities. Any of the
following could also affect the competitiveness of our transportation services for some
or all of our commodities: (i) improvements or expenditures materially increasing the
quality or reducing the costs of these alternative modes of transportation, (ii) legislation
that eliminates or significantly increases the size or weight limitations applied to motor
carriers, or (iii) legislation or regulatory changes that impose operating restrictions on
railroads or that adversely affect the profitability of some or all railroad traffic. Finally,
many movements face product or geographic competition where our customers can
use different products (e.g. natural gas instead of coal, sorghum instead of corn) or
commodities from different locations (e.g. grain from states or countries that we do not
serve, crude oil from different regions). Sourcing different commodities or different
locations allows shippers to substitute different carriers and such competition may
reduce our volume or constrain prices. For more information regarding risks we face
from competition, see the Risk Factors in Item 1A of this report.
Key Suppliers – We depend on two key domestic suppliers of high horsepower
locomotives. Due to the capital intensive nature of the locomotive manufacturing
business and sophistication of this equipment, potential new suppliers face high
barriers of entry into this industry. Therefore, if one of these domestic suppliers
discontinues manufacturing locomotives, supplying parts or providing maintenance for
any reason, including insolvency or bankruptcy, we could experience a significant cost
increase and risk reduced availability of the locomotives that are necessary to our
operations. Additionally, for a high percentage of our rail purchases, we utilize two
steel producers (one domestic and one international) that meet our specifications. Rail
is critical for maintenance, replacement, improvement, and expansion of our network
and facilities. Rail manufacturing also has high barriers of entry, and, if one of those
suppliers discontinues operations for any reason, including insolvency or bankruptcy,
we could experience cost increases and difficulty obtaining rail.
 
7
 
Employees –  Approximately 85% of our full-time employees are represented by 14
major rail unions.  Pursuant to the Railway Labor Act (RLA), our collective bargaining
agreements are subject to modification every five years.  The most recent round of
negotiations started on January 1, 2015, and throughout 2017 and 2018, we
concluded new agreements with all 14 major rail unions. Existing agreements remain
in effect until new agreements are ratified or until the RLA procedures are
exhausted.  The RLA procedures include mediation, potential arbitration, cooling-off
periods, and the possibility of Presidential Emergency Boards and Congressional
intervention.  The next round of negotiations begins with the service of RLA Section 6
notices on or about November 1, 2019 related to years 2019-2023.  Contract
negotiations historically continue for an extended period of time, and work stoppages
during negotiations are rare.
Railroad Security – Our security efforts consist of a wide variety of measures
including employee training, engagement with our customers, training of emergency
responders, and partnerships with numerous federal, state, and local government
agencies.  While federal law requires us to protect the confidentiality of our security
plans designed to safeguard against terrorism and other security incidents, the
following provides a general overview of our security initiatives. 
UPRR Security Measures – We maintain a comprehensive security plan designed to
both deter and respond to any potential or actual threats as they arise.  The plan
includes four levels of alert status, each with its own set of countermeasures.  We
employ our own police force, consisting of commissioned and highly-trained officers.
Our employees also undergo recurrent security and preparedness training, as well as
federally-mandated hazardous materials and security training. We regularly review the
sufficiency of our employee training programs. We maintain the capability to move
critical operations to back-up facilities in different locations.
We operate an emergency response management center 24 hours a day.  The center
receives reports of emergencies, dangerous or potentially dangerous conditions, and
other safety and security issues from our employees, the public, law enforcement and
other government officials.  In cooperation with government officials, we monitor both
threats and public events, and, as necessary, we may alter rail traffic flow at times of
concern to minimize risk to communities and our operations.  We comply with the
hazardous materials routing rules and other requirements imposed by federal law.  We
also design our operating plan to expedite the movement of hazardous material
shipments to minimize the time rail cars remain idle at yards and terminals located in
or near major population centers.  Additionally, in compliance with Transportation
Security Agency regulations, we deployed information systems and instructed
employees in tracking and documenting the handoff of Rail Security Sensitive
Materials with customers and interchange partners.
We also have established a number of our own innovative safety and security-oriented
initiatives ranging from various investments in technology to The Officer on Train
program, which provides local law enforcement officers with the opportunity to ride with
train crews to enhance their understanding of railroad operations and risks. Our staff of
information security professionals continually assesses cyber security risks and
implements mitigation programs that evolve with the changing technology threat
environment. To date, we have not experienced any material disruption of our
operations due to a cyber threat or attack directed at us.
Cooperation with Federal, State, and Local Government Agencies – We work closely
on physical and cyber security initiatives with government agencies, including the U.S.
Department of Transportation (DOT) and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS)
as well as local police departments, fire departments, and other first responders.  In
conjunction with the Association of American Railroads (AAR), we sponsor Ask Rail, a
mobile application which provides first responders with secure links to electronic
information, including commodity and emergency response information required by
emergency personnel to respond to accidents and other situations.  We also
participate in the National Joint Terrorism Task Force, a multi-agency effort established
by the U.S. Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to combat
and prevent terrorism. 
We work with the Coast Guard, U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), and the
Military Transport Management Command, which monitor shipments entering the
UPRR rail network at U.S. border crossings and ports.  We were the first railroad in the
U.S. to be named a partner in CBP’s Customs-Trade Partnership Against Terrorism, a
partnership designed to develop, enhance, and maintain effective security processes
throughout the global supply chain.
Cooperation with Customers and Trade Associations – Through TransCAER
(Transportation Community Awareness and Emergency Response) we work with the
AAR, the American Chemistry Council, the American Petroleum Institute, and other
chemical trade groups to provide communities with preparedness
 
8
 
tools, including the training of emergency responders.  In cooperation with the Federal
Railroad Administration (FRA) and other interested groups, we are also working to
develop additional improvements to tank car design that will further limit the risk of
releases of hazardous materials.
GOVERNMENTAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL REGULATION
Governmental Regulation – Our operations are subject to a variety of federal, state,
and local regulations, generally applicable to all businesses.  (See also the discussion
of certain regulatory proceedings in Legal Proceedings, Item 3.)
The operations of the Railroad are also subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the
Surface Transportation Board (STB).  The STB has jurisdiction over rates charged on
certain regulated rail traffic; common carrier service of regulated traffic; freight car
compensation; transfer, extension, or abandonment of rail lines; and acquisition of
control of rail common carriers. The STB continues its efforts to explore expanding rail
regulation and is reviewing proposed rulemaking in various areas, including reciprocal
switching, commodity exemptions, and expanding and easing procedures for smaller
rate complaints. The STB also continues to develop a methodology for determining
railroad revenue adequacy and the possible use of a revenue adequacy constraint in
regulating railroad rates.  The STB posts quarterly reports on rate reasonableness
cases and maintains a database on service complaints, and has the authority to initiate
investigations, among other things.
The operations of the Railroad also are subject to the regulations of the FRA and other
federal and state agencies. In 2010, the FRA issued initial rules governing installation
of Positive Train Control (PTC). PTC is a collision avoidance technology intended to
override engineer controlled locomotives and stop train-to-train and overspeed
accidents, misaligned switch derailments, and unauthorized entry to work zones. The
Surface Transportation Extension Act of 2015 amended the Rail Safety Improvement
Act to require implementation of PTC by the end of 2018, which deadline may be
extended to December 31, 2020, provided certain other criteria are satisfied.  On
December 10, 2018, we received FRA approval for an alternative schedule to
implement, test and refine our PTC during 2019-2020.    Through 2018, we have
invested approximately $2.8 billion in the ongoing development of PTC. Final
implementation of PTC will require us to adapt and integrate our system with other
railroads whose implementation plan may be different than ours. 
DOT, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the Pipeline and Hazardous
Materials Safety Administration, and DHS, along with other federal agencies, have
jurisdiction over certain aspects of safety, movement of hazardous materials and
hazardous waste, emissions requirements, and equipment standards. Additionally,
various state and local agencies have jurisdiction over disposal of hazardous waste
and seek to regulate movement of hazardous materials in ways not preempted by
federal law.
Environmental Regulation – We are subject to extensive federal and state
environmental statutes and regulations pertaining to public health and the
environment. The statutes and regulations are administered and monitored by the
Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and by various state environmental agencies.
The primary laws affecting our operations are the Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act, regulating the management and disposal of solid and hazardous
wastes; the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability
Act, regulating the cleanup of contaminated properties; the Clean Air Act, regulating air
emissions; and the Clean Water Act, regulating waste water discharges.
Information concerning environmental claims and contingencies and estimated
remediation costs is set forth in Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations – Critical Accounting Policies – Environmental,
Item 7 and Note 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8, Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
Item 1A. Risk Factors
The information set forth in this Item 1A should be read in conjunction with the rest of
the information included in this report, including Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, Item 7, and Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data, Item 8.
We Must Manage Fluctuating Demand for Our Services and Network Capacity – If
there are significant reductions in demand for rail services with respect to one or more
commodities or changes in consumer preferences that affect the businesses of our
customers, we may experience increased costs associated
 
9
 
with resizing our operations, including higher unit operating costs and costs for the
storage of locomotives, rail cars, and other equipment; work-force adjustments; and
other related activities, which could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity. If there is significant demand for our
services that exceeds the designed capacity of our network, we may experience
network difficulties, including congestion and reduced velocity, that could compromise
the level of service we provide to our customers. This level of demand may also
compound the impact of weather and weather-related events on our operations and
velocity. Although we continue to improve our transportation plan, add capacity,
improve operations at our yards and other facilities, and improve our ability to address
surges in demand for any reason with adequate resources, we cannot be sure that
these measures will fully or adequately address any service shortcomings resulting
from demand exceeding our planned capacity.  We may experience other operational
or service difficulties related to network capacity, dramatic and unplanned fluctuations
in our customers’ demand for rail service with respect to one or more commodities or
operating regions, or other events that could negatively impact our operational
efficiency, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity. 
We Transport Hazardous Materials – We transport certain hazardous materials and
other materials, including crude oil, ethanol, and toxic inhalation hazard (TIH)
materials, such as chlorine, that pose certain risks in the event of a release or
combustion. Additionally, U.S. laws impose common carrier obligations on railroads
that require us to transport certain hazardous materials regardless of risk or potential
exposure to loss. A rail accident or other incident or accident on our network, at our
facilities, or at the facilities of our customers involving the release or combustion of
hazardous materials could involve significant costs and claims for personal injury,
property damage, and environmental penalties and remediation in excess of our
insurance coverage for these risks, which could have a material adverse effect on our
results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
We Are Subject to Significant Governmental Regulation – We are subject to
governmental regulation by a significant number of federal, state, and local authorities
covering a variety of health, safety, labor, environmental, economic (as discussed
below), and other matters.  Many laws and regulations require us to obtain and
maintain various licenses, permits, and other authorizations, and we cannot guarantee
that we will continue to be able to do so. Our failure to comply with applicable laws and
regulations could have a material adverse effect on us. Governments or regulators
may change the legislative or regulatory frameworks within which we operate without
providing us any recourse to address any adverse effects on our business, including,
without limitation, regulatory determinations or rules regarding dispute resolution,
increasing the amount of our traffic subject to common carrier regulation, business
relationships with other railroads, calculation of our cost of capital or other inputs
relevant to computing our revenue adequacy, the prices we charge, and costs and
expenses. Significant legislative activity in Congress or regulatory activity by the STB
could expand regulation of railroad operations and prices for rail services, which could
reduce capital spending on our rail network, facilities and equipment and have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
As part of the Rail Safety Improvement Act of 2008, rail carriers were to implement
PTC by the end of 2015 (the Rail Safety Improvement Act).  The Surface
Transportation Extension Act of 2015 amended the Rail Safety Improvement Act to
require implementation of PTC by the end of 2018, which deadline may be extended to
December 31, 2020, provided certain other criteria are satisfied.  On December 10,
2018, we received approval from the FRA for an alternative schedule to implement,
test and refine our PTC during 2019-2020.  Final implementation of PTC will require us
to adapt and integrate our system with other railroads whose implementation plan may
be different than ours.  This implementation could have a material adverse effect on
our results of operations and financial condition. Additionally, one or more
consolidations of Class I railroads could also lead to increased regulation of the rail
industry.
We May Be Affected by General Economic Conditions – Prolonged severe adverse
domestic and global economic conditions or disruptions of financial and credit markets
may affect the producers and consumers of the commodities we carry and may have a
material adverse effect on our access to liquidity and our results of operations and
financial condition.
We Face Competition from Other Railroads and Other Transportation Providers – We
face competition from other railroads, motor carriers, ships, barges, and pipelines. In
addition to price competition, we face competition with respect to transit times and
quality and reliability of service. We must build or acquire and maintain our rail system,
while trucks, barges and maritime operators are able to use public rights-of-way
maintained by public entities. Any future improvements or expenditures materially
increasing the quality or reducing the cost of alternative modes of transportation, or
legislation that eliminates or significantly increases the size or weight limitations
currently applicable to motor carriers, could have a material adverse
 
10
 
effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Additionally, any
future consolidation of the rail industry could materially affect the competitive
environment in which we operate.
We Rely on Technology and Technology Improvements in Our Business Operations –
We rely on information technology in all aspects of our business. If we do not have
sufficient capital to acquire new technology or if we are unable to develop or
implement new technology such as PTC or the latest version of our transportation
control systems, we may suffer a competitive disadvantage within the rail industry and
with companies providing other modes of transportation service, which could have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
Additionally, if a cyber attack or other event causes significant disruption or failure of
one or more of our information technology systems, including computer hardware,
software, and communications equipment, we could suffer a significant service
interruption, safety failure, security breach, or other operational difficulties, which could
have a material adverse impact on our results of operations, financial condition, and
liquidity.
We May Be Subject to Various Claims and Lawsuits That Could Result in Significant
Expenditures – As a railroad with operations in densely populated urban areas and
other cities and a vast rail network, we are exposed to the potential for various claims
and litigation related to labor and employment, personal injury, property damage,
environmental liability, and other matters. Any material changes to litigation trends or a
catastrophic rail accident or series of accidents involving any or all of property
damage, personal injury, and environmental liability that exceed our insurance
coverage for such risks could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
We Are Subject to Significant Environmental Laws and Regulations – Due to the
nature of the railroad business, our operations are subject to extensive federal, state,
and local environmental laws and regulations concerning, among other things,
emissions to the air; discharges to waters; handling, storage, transportation, disposal
of waste and other materials; and hazardous material or petroleum releases. We
generate and transport hazardous and non-hazardous waste in our operations, and we
did so in our former operations. Environmental liability can extend to previously owned
or operated properties, leased properties, and properties owned by third parties, as
well as to properties we currently own. Environmental liabilities have arisen and may
also arise from claims asserted by adjacent landowners or other third parties in toxic
tort litigation. We have been and may be subject to allegations or findings that we have
violated, or are strictly liable under, these laws or regulations. We currently have
certain obligations at existing sites for investigation, remediation and monitoring, and
we likely will have obligations at other sites in the future.  Liabilities for these
obligations affect our estimate based on our experience and, as necessary, the advice
and assistance of our consultants.  However, actual costs may vary from our estimates
due to any or all of several factors, including changes to environmental laws or
interpretations of such laws, technological changes affecting investigations and
remediation, the participation and financial viability of other parties responsible for any
such liability and the corrective action or change to corrective actions required to
remediate any existing or future sites. We could incur significant costs as a result of
any of the foregoing, and we may be required to incur significant expenses to
investigate and remediate known, unknown, or future environmental contamination,
which could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial
condition, and liquidity.
We May Be Affected by Climate Change and Market or Regulatory Responses to
Climate Change – Climate change, including the impact of global warming, could have
a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and
liquidity.  Restrictions, caps, taxes, or other controls on emissions of greenhouse
gasses, including diesel exhaust, could significantly increase our operating
costs.  Restrictions on emissions could also affect our customers that (a) use
commodities that we carry to produce energy, (b) use significant amounts of energy in
producing or delivering the commodities we carry, or (c) manufacture or produce
goods that consume significant amounts of energy or burn fossil fuels, including
chemical producers, farmers and food producers, and automakers and other
manufacturers.  Significant cost increases, government regulation, or changes of
consumer preferences for goods or services relating to alternative sources of energy
or emissions reductions could materially affect the markets for the commodities we
carry, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations,
financial condition, and liquidity.  Government incentives encouraging the use of
alternative sources of energy could also affect certain of our customers and the
markets for certain of the commodities we carry in an unpredictable manner that could
alter our traffic patterns, including, for example, increasing royalties charged to
producers of PRB coal by the U.S. Department of Interior and the impacts of ethanol
incentives on farming and ethanol producers. Finally, we could face increased costs
related to defending and resolving legal claims and other litigation related to climate
change and the alleged impact of our operations on climate change.  Any of these
factors, individually or in operation with one or more of the other factors, or
 
11
 
other unforeseen impacts of climate change could reduce the amount of traffic we
handle and have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial
condition, and liquidity.
Severe Weather Could Result in Significant Business Interruptions and Expenditures –
As a railroad with a vast network, we are exposed to severe weather conditions and
other natural phenomena, including earthquakes, hurricanes, fires, floods, mudslides
or landslides, extreme temperatures, and significant precipitation. Line outages and
other interruptions caused by these conditions can adversely affect our entire rail
network and can adversely affect revenue, costs, and liabilities, which could have a
material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
Strikes or Work Stoppages Could Adversely Affect Our Operations – The U.S. Class I
railroads are party to collective bargaining agreements with various labor unions. The
majority of our employees belong to labor unions and are subject to these agreements.
Disputes with regard to the terms of these agreements or our potential inability to
negotiate acceptable contracts with these unions could result in, among other things,
strikes, work stoppages, slowdowns, or lockouts, which could cause a significant
disruption of our operations and have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity. Additionally, future national labor
agreements, or renegotiation of labor agreements or provisions of labor agreements,
could compromise our service reliability or significantly increase our costs for health
care, wages, and other benefits, which could have a material adverse impact on our
results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.  Labor disputes, work
stoppages, slowdowns or lockouts at loading/unloading facilities, ports or other
transport access points could compromise our service reliability and have a material
adverse impact on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.  Labor
disputes, work stoppages, slowdowns or lockouts by employees of our customers or
our suppliers could compromise our service reliability and have a material adverse
impact on our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
The Availability of Qualified Personnel Could Adversely Affect Our Operations –
Changes in demographics, training requirements, and the availability of qualified
personnel could negatively affect our ability to meet demand for rail service.
Unpredictable increases in demand for rail services and a lack of network fluidity may
exacerbate such risks, which could have a negative impact on our operational
efficiency and otherwise have a material adverse effect on our results of operations,
financial condition, and liquidity.
We May Be Affected By Fluctuating Fuel Prices – Fuel costs constitute a significant
portion of our transportation expenses. Diesel fuel prices can be subject to dramatic
fluctuations, and significant price increases could have a material adverse effect on
our operating results. Although we currently are able to recover a significant amount of
our fuel expenses from our customers through revenue from fuel surcharges, we
cannot be certain that we will always be able to mitigate rising or elevated fuel costs
through our fuel surcharges. Additionally, future market conditions or legislative or
regulatory activities could adversely affect our ability to apply fuel surcharges or
adequately recover increased fuel costs through fuel surcharges. As fuel prices
fluctuate, our fuel surcharge programs trail such fluctuations in fuel price by
approximately two months, and may be a significant source of quarter-over-quarter
and year-over-year volatility, particularly in periods of rapidly changing prices.
International, political, and economic factors, events and conditions affect the volatility
of fuel prices and supplies. Weather can also affect fuel supplies and limit domestic
refining capacity. A severe shortage of, or disruption to, domestic fuel supplies could
have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition, and
liquidity.  Alternatively, lower fuel prices could have a positive impact on the economy
by increasing consumer discretionary spending that potentially could increase demand
for various consumer products we transport. However, lower fuel prices could have a
negative impact on other commodities we transport, such as coal and domestic
drilling-related shipments, which could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
We Utilize Capital Markets – Due to the significant capital expenditures required to
operate and maintain a safe and efficient railroad, we rely on the capital markets to
provide some of our capital requirements.  We utilize long-term debt instruments, bank
financing and commercial paper from time-to-time, and we pledge certain of our
receivables.  Significant instability or disruptions of the capital markets, including the
credit markets, or deterioration of our financial condition due to internal or external
factors could restrict or prohibit our access to, and significantly increase the cost of,
commercial paper and other financing sources, including bank credit facilities and the
issuance of long-term debt, including corporate bonds. A significant deterioration of our
financial condition could result in a reduction of our credit rating to below investment
grade, which could restrict, or at certain credit levels below investment grade may
prohibit us, from utilizing our current receivables securitization facility. This may also
limit our access to external sources of capital and significantly increase the costs of
short and long-term debt financing.
 
12
 
A Significant Portion of Our Revenue Involves Transportation of Commodities to and
from International Markets – Although revenues from our operations are attributable to
transportation services provided in the U.S., a significant portion of our revenues
involves the transportation of commodities to and from international markets, including
Mexico and Southeast Asia, by various carriers and, at times, various modes of
transportation. Significant and sustained interruptions of trade with Mexico or countries
in Southeast Asia, including China, could adversely affect customers and other entities
that, directly or indirectly, purchase or rely on rail transportation services in the U.S. as
part of their operations, and any such interruptions could have a material adverse
effect on our results of operations, financial condition and liquidity. Any one or more of
the following could cause a significant and sustained interruption of trade with Mexico
or countries in Southeast Asia: (a) a deterioration of security for international trade and
businesses; (b) the adverse impact of new laws, rules and regulations or the
interpretation of laws, rules and regulations by government entities, courts or
regulatory bodies, including modifications to the North American Free Trade
Agreement (NAFTA) or its proposed successor called the U.S.-Mexico-Canada
Agreement (USMCA) and actions of taxing authorities that affect our customers doing
business in foreign countries; (c) any significant adverse economic developments,
such as extended periods of high inflation, material disruptions in the banking sector or
in the capital markets of these foreign countries, and significant changes in the
valuation of the currencies of these foreign countries that could materially affect the
cost or value of imports or exports; (d) shifts in patterns of international trade that
adversely affect import and export markets; and (e) a material reduction in foreign
direct investment in these countries.
We Are Subject to Legislative, Regulatory, and Legal Developments Involving Taxes –
Taxes are a significant part of our expenses.  We are subject to U.S. federal, state, and
foreign income, payroll, property, sales and use, fuel, and other types of taxes.
Changes in tax rates, such as those included in the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act,
enactment of new tax laws, revisions of tax regulations, and claims or litigation with
taxing authorities could result in a material effect to our results of operations, financial
condition, and liquidity.  Higher tax rates could have a material adverse effect on our
results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
We Are Dependent on Certain Key Suppliers of Locomotives and Rail – Due to the
capital intensive nature and sophistication of locomotive equipment, parts and
maintenance, potential new suppliers face high barriers to entry.  Therefore, if one of
the domestic suppliers of high horsepower locomotives discontinues manufacturing
locomotives, supplying parts or providing maintenance for any reason, including
bankruptcy or insolvency, we could experience significant cost increases and reduced
availability of the locomotives that are necessary for our operations.  Additionally, for a
high percentage of our rail purchases, we utilize two steel producers (one domestic
and one international) that meet our specifications.  Rail is critical to our operations for
rail replacement programs, maintenance, and for adding additional network capacity,
new rail and storage yards, and expansions of existing facilities.  This industry similarly
has high barriers to entry, and if one of these suppliers discontinues operations for any
reason, including bankruptcy or insolvency, we could experience both significant cost
increases for rail purchases and difficulty obtaining sufficient rail for maintenance and
other projects.
We May Be Affected by Acts of Terrorism, War, or Risk of War – Our rail lines,
facilities, and equipment, including rail cars carrying hazardous materials, could be
direct targets or indirect casualties of terrorist attacks. Terrorist attacks, or other similar
events, any government response thereto, and war or risk of war may adversely affect
our results of operations, financial condition, and liquidity. In addition, insurance
premiums for some or all of our current coverages could increase dramatically, or
certain coverages may not be available to us in the future.
 
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
 
13
 
Item 2. Properties
We employ a variety of assets in the management and operation of our rail business.
Our rail network covers 23 states in the western two-thirds of the U.S.
TRACK
Our rail network includes 32,236 route miles.  We own 26,039 miles and operate on
the remainder pursuant to trackage rights or leases. The following table describes
track miles at December 31, 2018, and 2017:
2018 2017 
Route 32,236 32,122 
Other main line 7,074 7,107 
Passing lines and turnouts 3,274 3,255 
Switching and classification yard lines 8,970 9,199 
Total miles 51,554 51,683 
HEADQUARTERS BUILDING
We own our headquarters building in Omaha, Nebraska. The facility has 1.2 million
square feet of space that can accommodate approximately 4,000 employees.
 
14
 
HARRIMAN DISPATCHING CENTER
The Harriman Dispatching Center (HDC), located in Omaha, Nebraska, is our primary
dispatching facility. It is linked to regional dispatching and locomotive management
facilities at various locations along our network. HDC employees coordinate moves of
locomotives and trains, manage traffic and train crews on our network, and coordinate
interchanges with other railroads. Approximately 900 employees currently work on-site
in the facility. In the event of a disruption of operations at HDC due to a cyber attack,
flooding or severe weather or other event, we maintain the capability to conduct critical
operations at back-up facilities in different locations.
RAIL FACILITIES
In addition to our track structure, we operate numerous facilities, including terminals for
intermodal and other freight; rail yards for building trains (classification yards),
switching, storage-in-transit (the temporary storage of customer goods in rail cars prior
to shipment) and other activities; offices to administer and manage our operations;
dispatching centers to direct traffic on our rail network; crew quarters to house train
crews along our network; and shops and other facilities for fueling, maintenance, and
repair of locomotives and repair and maintenance of rail cars and other
equipment.  The following table includes the major yards and terminals on our system:
Major Classification Yards Major Intermodal T erminals
North Platte, Nebraska Joliet (Global 4), Illinois
North Little Rock, Arkansas East Los Angeles, California
Englewood (Houston), Texas ICTF (Los Angeles), California
Proviso (Chicago), Illinois Global I (Chicago), Illinois
Fort W orth, Texas Marion (Memphis), Tennessee
Livonia, Louisiana DIT (Dallas), Texas
Pine Bluf f, Arkansas Mesquite, Texas
West Colton, California Lathrop, California
Roseville, California Global II (Chicago), Illinois
Neff (Kansas City), Missouri City of Industry , California
RAIL EQUIPMENT
Our equipment includes owned and leased locomotives and rail cars; heavy
maintenance equipment and machinery; other equipment and tools in our shops,
offices, and facilities; and vehicles for maintenance, transportation of crews, and other
activities. As of December 31, 2018, we owned or leased the following units of
equipment:
Average
Locomotives Owned Leased Total Age (yrs.)
Multiple purpose 6,387 1,582 7,969 20.5 
Switching 201 12 213 38.3 
Other 35 57 92 39.6 
Total locomotives 6,623 1,651 8,274 N/A
 Average
Freight cars Owned Leased Total Age (yrs.)
Covered hoppers 14,001 11,784 25,785 19.7 
Open hoppers 6,485 2,389 8,874 30.6 
Gondolas 6,105 2,133 8,238 27.6 
Boxcars 2,776 7,045 9,821 37.1 
Refrigerated cars 2,372 3,269 5,641 25.4 
Flat cars 2,404 1,057 3,461 33.6 
Other 8 332 340 30.8 
Total freight cars 34,151 28,009 62,160 N/A
 
15
 
Average
Highway revenue equipment Owned Leased Total Age (yrs.)
Containers 47,752 9,005 56,757 8.2 
Chassis 26,242 21,964 48,206 10.2 
Total highway revenue equipment 73,994 30,969 104,963 N/A
CAPITAL EXPENDITURES
Our rail network requires significant annual capital investments for replacement,
improvement, and expansion. These investments enhance safety, support the
transportation needs of our customers, and improve our operational efficiency.
Additionally, we add new locomotives and freight cars to our fleet to replace older, less
efficient equipment, to support growth and customer demand, and to reduce our
impact on the environment through the acquisition of more fuel-efficient and low-
emission locomotives.
2018 Capital Program – During 2018, our capital program totaled approximately $3.2
billion. (See the cash capital investments table in Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations – Liquidity and Capital
Resources, Item 7.)
2019 Capital Plan – In 2019, we expect our capital plan to be approximately $3.2
billion, flat compared to 2018.  The plan includes expenditures to renew and improve
our existing infrastructure as well as new capacity investments designed to support
future business growth and operational efficiency.  In addition, expenditures will be
made for locomotive modernization and freight cars.  The capital plan may be revised
if business conditions warrant or if new laws or regulations affect our ability to generate
sufficient returns on these investments.  (See further discussion of our 2019 capital
plan in Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations – Liquidity and Capital Resources, Item 7.)
OTHER
Equipment Encumbrances – Equipment with a carrying value of approximately $1.8
billion and $2.0 billion at December 31, 2018, and 2017, respectively served as
collateral for capital leases and other types of equipment obligations in accordance
with the secured financing arrangements utilized to acquire or refinance such railroad
equipment.
Environmental Matters – Certain of our properties are subject to federal, state, and
local laws and regulations governing the protection of the environment.  (See
discussion of environmental issues in Business – Governmental and Environmental
Regulation, Item 1, Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations – Critical Accounting Policies – Environmental, Item 7, and Note
18 of the Consolidated Financial Statements.)
 
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
From time to time, we are involved in legal proceedings, claims, and litigation that
occur in connection with our business. We routinely assess our liabilities and
contingencies in connection with these matters based upon the latest available
information and, when necessary, we seek input from our third-party advisors when
making these assessments. Consistent with SEC rules and requirements, we describe
below material pending legal proceedings (other than ordinary routine litigation
incidental to our business), material proceedings known to be contemplated by
governmental authorities, other proceedings arising under federal, state, or local
environmental laws and regulations (including governmental proceedings involving
potential fines, penalties, or other monetary sanctions in excess of $100,000), and
such other pending matters that we may determine to be appropriate.
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
District Attorneys from Placer, San Joaquin, San Bernardino and Nevada counties in
California have asserted claims against Union Pacific in connection with more than
150 alleged violations of environmental laws that occurred in their counties, largely
between 2011 and 2014.  The alleged violations consist of violation of (1) various
hazardous waste requirements, (2) Hazardous Materials Business Plan requirements,
(3) above ground petroleum storage requirements, and (4) various spill
requirements.   The Company has entered into a Stipulation for Entry of Final
Judgment with the District Attorneys to resolve their claims in connection with these
matters for payment of a $2 million civil penalty, $313,000 in attorneys’
 
16
 
fees and investigative costs, and a 3 year environmental compliance monitoring and
reporting program performed under the supervision of an agreed upon outside
consultant.  The Stipulation, together with the District Attorneys Complaint and a Final
Judgment (reflecting the terms of the Stipulation) were lodged with the Court in
December 2018.  The Judgment was signed on December 19, 2018.
The United States Department of Justice has asserted claims against Union Pacific in
connection with a September 12, 2014 release of diesel from a locomotive fuel tank
arising out of a derailment that occurred in Salem, OR.  Some portion of that fuel
entered Pringle Creek, which the United States asserts is a Water of the United
States.  The Company has agreed to resolve those claims through a Stipulation of
Settlement and Judgment, pursuant to which the Company will pay $47,500 to the
United States and $47,500 to the State of Oregon.
We receive notices from the EPA and state environmental agencies alleging that we
are or may be liable under federal or state environmental laws for remediation costs at
various sites throughout the U.S., including sites on the Superfund National Priorities
List or state superfund lists. We cannot predict the ultimate impact of these
proceedings and suits because of the number of potentially responsible parties
involved, the degree of contamination by various wastes, the scarcity and quality of
volumetric data related to many of the sites, and the speculative nature of remediation
costs.
Information concerning environmental claims and contingencies and estimated
remediation costs is set forth in Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations – Critical Accounting Policies – Environmental,
Item 7.  See also Note 18 of the Consolidated Financial Statements.
OTHER MATTERS
Antitrust Litigation – As we reported in our Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2007, 20 rail shippers (many of whom are represented by the
same law firms) filed virtually identical antitrust lawsuits in various federal district
courts against us and four other Class I railroads in the U.S. Currently, UPRR and
three other Class I railroads are the named defendants in the lawsuit. The original
plaintiff filed the first of these claims in the U.S. District Court in New Jersey on May
14, 2007. The number of complaints reached a total of 30. These suits allege that the
named railroads engaged in price-fixing by establishing common fuel surcharges for
certain rail traffic.
   
On June 21, 2012, Judge Friedman issued a decision that certified a class of plaintiffs
with eight named plaintiff representatives. The decision included in the class all
shippers that paid a rate-based fuel surcharge to any one of the defendant railroads for
rate-unregulated rail transportation from July 1, 2003, through December 31, 2008. On
July 5, 2012, the defendant railroads filed a petition with the U.S. Court of Appeals for
the District of Columbia requesting that the court review the class certification ruling.
On August 9, 2013, the Circuit Court vacated the class certification decision and
remanded the case to the district court to reconsider the class certification decision in
light of a recent Supreme Court case and incomplete consideration of errors in the
expert report of the plaintiffs. After reviewing an intervening case, supplemental expert
materials and related briefing from the parties, Judge Friedman scheduled and
completed a new class certification hearing during the week of September 26, 2016. 
On October 10, 2017, the parties received a ruling from Judge Friedman denying class
certification. Plaintiffs have sought appellate review of that ruling and on December 20,
2017, were granted the right of an interlocutory appeal by the U.S. Court of Appeals for
the District of Columbia Circuit.  A hearing of the appeal was conducted on September
28, 2018.  We are awaiting a decision on that hearing.
As we reported in our Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on June 10, 2011, the
Railroad received a complaint filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia
on June 7, 2011, by Oxbow Carbon & Minerals LLC and related entities (Oxbow).  The
parties are currently conducting discovery in this matter.  For additional information on
Oxbow, please refer to Item 3. Legal Proceedings, under Other Matters, Antitrust
Litigation in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016. 
We continue to deny the allegations that our fuel surcharge programs violate the
antitrust laws or any other laws. We believe that these lawsuits are without merit, and
we will vigorously defend our actions. Therefore, we currently believe that these
matters will not have a material adverse effect on any of our results of operations,
financial condition, and liquidity.
 
17
 
In 2016, a lawsuit was filed in U.S. District Court for the Western District of Washington
alleging violations of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and Genetic Information
Nondiscrimination Act relating to Fitness for Duty requirements for safety sensitive
positions.
On August 8, 2016, the U.S. District Court for the Western District of Washington
granted plaintiffs' motion to transfer their claim to the U.S. District Court of Nebraska.
On February 5, 2019, the U.S. District Court of Nebraska granted plaintiffs’ motion to
certify the ADA allegations as a class action. We intend to appeal this class
certification to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the 8th Circuit. We continue to deny these
allegations, believe this lawsuit is without merit and will defend our actions.  We
believe this lawsuit will not have a material adverse effect on any of our results of
operations, financial condition, and liquidity.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable. 
 
18
 
Executive Officers of the Registrant and Principal Executive Officers of
Subsidiaries
The Board of Directors typically elects and designates our executive officers on an
annual basis at the board meeting held in conjunction with the Annual Meeting of
Shareholders, and they hold office until their successors are elected. Executive officers
also may be elected and designated throughout the year, as the Board of Directors
considers appropriate. There are no family relationships among the officers, nor is
there any arrangement or understanding between any officer and any other person
pursuant to which the officer was selected. The following table sets forth certain
information current as of February 8, 2019, relating to the executive officers.
Business
Experience
During
Name Position AgePast Five Years
Lance M. Fritz Chairman, President and Chief Executive
Officer of UPC and the Railroad56 [1]
Robert M. Knight, Jr.Executive Vice President and Chief Financial
Officer of UPC and the Railroad61Current Position
Rhonda S.
FergusonExecutive Vice President and Chief Legal
Officer and Corporate Secretary of UPC and
the Railroad49 [2]
Thomas A. LischerExecutive Vice President - Operations of the
Railroad46 [3]
Kenny G. RockerExecutive Vice President - Marketing and
Sales of the Railroad47 [4]
Todd M. RynaskiVice President and Controller of UPC and
the Railroad48 [5]
Lynden L. TennisonExecutive Vice President and Chief Strategy
Officer of UPC and the Railroad59 [6]
V. James Vena Chief Operating Officer of UPC and the
Railroad60 [7]
Elizabeth F. WhitedExecutive Vice President and Chief Human
Resources Officer of UPC and the Railroad53 [8]
[1]On July 30, 2015, Mr. Fritz was named Chairman of the Board of UPC and the Railroad effective
October 1, 2015. Mr. Fritz was elected President and Chief Executive Officer of UPC and the Railroad
effective February 5, 2015. Previously, Mr. Fritz was President and Chief Operating Officer of the
Railroad effective February 6, 2014, Executive Vice President – Operations of the Railroad effective
September 1, 2010, and Vice President – Operations of the Railroad effective January 1, 2010.
[2]Ms. Ferguson was elected Corporate Secretary of UPC and the Railroad effective December 1, 2017,
and Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer of UPC and the Railroad effective July 11, 2016.
She previously was Vice President, Corporate Secretary and Chief Ethics Officer of FirstEnergy Corp.
since 2007.
[3]Mr. Lischer was elected Executive Vice President – Operations of the Railroad effective August 15,
2018. Previously, Mr. Lischer served as Vice President of the Harriman Dispatching Center and
Network Operations for the Railroad. Prior to this election, Mr. Lischer served as Assistant Vice
President of Operations for the North Region (September 2016 – April 2017), Assistant Vice President
of Locomotive Distribution and Network Operations (April 2014 – September 2016), and General
Superintendent of Transportation Services (February 2011 – April 2014).
[4]Mr. Rocker was elected Executive Vice President – Marketing and Sales of the Railroad effective
August 15, 2018. Mr. Rocker previously served at the Railroad as Vice President – Marketing and
Sales – Industrial team. Prior to this election, Mr. Rocker served as Assistant Vice President –
Chemicals (April 2014 – September 2016) and Assistant Vice President – Industrial Products -
Marketing (March 2012 – April 2014).
[5]Mr. Rynaski was elected Vice President and Controller of UPC and the Railroad effective September 1,
2015. He previously was Assistant Vice President – Accounting of the Railroad effective January 1,
2014, and Assistant Vice President – Financial Reporting and Analysis effective April 1, 2011.
[6]Mr. Tennison was elected Executive Vice President and Chief Strategy Officer of UPC and the Railroad
effective August 1, 2018. He previously was Senior Vice President and Chief Information Officer since
February 2005.  On January 29, 2019, Mr. Tennison announced he will retire from the Company
effective March 31, 2019.
[7]Mr. Vena was elected Chief Operating Officer of UPC and the Railroad effective January 14, 2019. Mr.
Vena previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Canadian National
Railway Company (CN) from February 2013 until his retirement in June 2016.
[8]Ms. Whited was elected Executive Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer of UPC and the
Railroad effective August 15, 2018. She previously served as Executive Vice President and Chief
Marketing Officer (December 2016 – August 2018) and Vice President and General Manager –
Chemicals (October 2012 – December 2016).
 
19
 
PART II
Item 5. Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters,
and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Our common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the
symbol “UNP”.
At February 1, 2019, there were 722,877,817 shares of common stock outstanding
and 30,902 common shareholders of record. On that date, the closing price of the
common stock on the NYSE was $159.67. We paid dividends to our common
shareholders during each of the past 119 years. 
Comparison Over One- and Three-Year Periods – The following table presents the
cumulative total shareholder returns, assuming reinvestment of dividends, over one-
and three-year periods for the Corporation (UNP), a peer group index (comprised of
CSX Corporation and Norfolk Southern Corporation), the Dow Jones Transportation
Index (DJ Trans), and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index (S&P 500).
Period UNPPeer
Group DJ Trans S&P 500
1 Year (2018) 5.3 % 10.3 % (12.3) % (4.4)%
3 Year (2016 - 2018) 89.3 121.0 27.6 30.4 
Five-Year Performance Comparison – The following graph provides an indicator of
cumulative total shareholder returns for the Corporation as compared to the peer
group index (described above), the DJ Trans, and the S&P 500. The graph assumes
that $100 was invested in the common stock of Union Pacific Corporation and each
index on December 31, 2013 and that all dividends were reinvested. The information
below is historical in nature and is not necessarily indicative of future performance.
 
20
 
Purchases of Equity Securities – During 2018, we repurchased 57,669,746 shares
of our common stock at an average price of $143.70. The following table presents
common stock repurchases during each month for the fourth quarter of 2018:
PeriodTotal
Number of
Shares
Purchased
[a]Average
Price
Paid Per
ShareTotal Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of a Publicly
Announced
Plan or Program [b]Maximum Number
of  Shares Remaining
Under the Plan or
Program [b]
Oct. 1 through Oct. 31 6,091,605 $158.20 6,087,727 32,831,024 
Nov. 1 through Nov . 30 3,408,467 147.91 3,402,190 29,428,834 
Dec. 1 through Dec. 31 3,007,951 148.40 3,000,715 26,428,119 
Total 12,508,023 $153.04 12,490,632 N/A
[a]Total number of shares purchased during the quarter includes approximately 17,391 shares delivered
or attested to UPC by employees to pay stock option exercise prices, satisfy excess tax withholding
obligations for stock option exercises or vesting of retention units, and pay withholding obligations for
vesting of retention shares.
[b]Effective January 1, 2017, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to 120 million shares
of our common stock by December 31, 2020. These repurchases may be made on the open market or
through other transactions. Our management has sole discretion with respect to determining the timing
and amount of these transactions.
 
21
 
Item 6. Selected Financial Data
The following table presents as of, and for the years ended, December 31, our
selected financial data for each of the last five years. The selected financial data
should be read in conjunction with Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations, Item 7, and with the Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data, Item 8. The information below is historical in nature and is not
necessarily indicative of future financial condition or results of operations.
Millions, Except per Share Amounts,
Carloads, Employee Statistics, and Ratios 2018 2017[a] 2016 2015 2014 
For the Year Ended December 31
Operating revenues [b] $22,832 $21,240 $19,941 $21,813 $23,988 
Operating income 8,517 8,106 7,243 8,082 8,765 
Net income 5,966 10,712 4,233 4,772 5,180 
Earnings per share - basic [c] 7.95 13.42 5.09 5.51 5.77 
Earnings per share - diluted [c] 7.91 13.36 5.07 5.49 5.75 
Dividends declared per share [c] 3.06 2.48 2.255 2.20 1.91 
Cash provided by operating activities 8,686 7,230 7,525 7,344 7,385 
Cash used in investing activities (3,411) (3,086) (3,393) (4,476) (4,249)
Cash used in financing activities (5,222) (4,146) (4,246) (3,063) (2,982)
Cash used for common share
repurchases(8,225) (4,013) (3,105) (3,465) (3,225)
At December 31
Total assets $59,147 $57,806 $55,718 $54,600 $52,372 
Long-term obligations [d] 34,098 29,011 32,146 30,692 27,419 
Debt due after one year 20,925 16,144 14,249 13,607 10,952 
Common shareholders' equity 20,423 24,856 19,932 20,702 21,189 
Additional Data
Freight revenues [b] $21,384 $19,837 $18,601 $20,397 $22,560 
Revenue carloads (units) (000) 8,908 8,588 8,442 9,062 9,625 
Operating ratio (%) [e] 62.7 61.8 63.7 62.9 63.5 
Average employees (000) 42.0 42.0 42.9 47.5 47.2 
Financial Ratios (%)
Return on average common
     shareholders' equity [f]26.4 47.8 20.8 22.8 24.4 
[a]2017 includes a $5.9 billion non-cash reduction to income tax expense and $212 million non-cash
reduction to operating expenses related to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act enacted on December 22, 2017.
[b]Includes fuel surcharge revenue of $1.7 billion, $966 million, $560 million, $1.3 billion, and $2.8 billion,
for 2018, 2017, 2016, 2015, and 2014, respectively, which partially offsets increased operating
expenses for fuel. (See further discussion in Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations – Item 7.)
[c]Earnings per share and dividends declared per share are retroactively adjusted to reflect the June 6,
2014 stock split.
[d]Long-term obligations is determined as follows: total liabilities less current liabilities.
[e]Operating ratio is defined as operating expenses divided by operating revenues.
[f]Return on average common shareholders' equity is determined as follows: Net income divided by
average common shareholders' equity.
 
 
22
 
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial
Statements and applicable notes to the Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data, Item 8, and other information in this report, including Risk Factors set forth in
Item 1A and Critical Accounting Policies and Cautionary Information at the end of this
Item 7.
The Railroad, along with its subsidiaries and rail affiliates, is our one reportable
business segment. Although revenue is analyzed by commodity, we analyze the net
financial results of the Railroad as one segment due to the integrated nature of the rail
network.
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
2018 Results
·Safety – During 2018, we continued our focus on safety to reduce risk and
eliminate incidents for our employees, our customers and the public. Despite our
efforts, our reportable personal injury incidents per 200,000 employee-hours of
0.82 increased 4% from 2017, which was our second best year on record.  2016
was our all-time annual record of 0.75 personal injury incidents per 200,000
employee-hours.  Our reportable derailment incident rate per million train miles of
3.28 and crossing incidents rate of 2.69 increased 12% and 5%, respectively,
compared to 2017.  We remain intently focused on improving employee and public
safety with programs such as Courage to Care, Total Safety Culture, and UP Way
(our continuous improvement culture).
·Network Operations: Unified Plan 2020 – We entered 2018 with network
congestion on key routes and terminals, compounded by high freight car inventory
levels that negatively impacted operational performance during the first half of the
year.  On October 1, 2018, we began implementation of the first phase of our
Unified Plan 2020, which included several initiatives focused on increasing
reliability of our service product, reducing variability in network operations, and
improving resource utilization costs.
As a result, network operations improved significantly as we progressed
throughout the fourth quarter.  We reduced our active locomotive fleet by 625
locomotives and reduced operating car inventory by more than 10% compared to
September 30, 2018, while handling relatively similar volume levels.    As
reference, average terminal dwell, as reported to the AAR improved 14%  to 26.7
hours in the fourth quarter compared to the first half of 2018.  On a full year basis,
average terminal dwell improved 2% while average train speed decreased 4%
compared to 2017.  Additional details on our Unified Plan 2020 goals and
implementation schedule are included in the “2019 Outlook” section of Item 7.
·Freight Revenues – Our freight revenues increased 8% year-over-year to $21.4
billion driven by volume growth of 4%, higher fuel surcharge revenue, and core
pricing gains, partially offset by negative mix of traffic.  Growth in international and
domestic intermodal, petroleum products, metals, rock, plastics, and industrial
chemical shipments more than offset declines in coal, grain, and frac sand
shipments.
·Financial Results – In 2018, we generated operating income of more than $8.5
billion, an 8% increase compared to 2017 adjusted results (non-GAAP)[1].  Volume
growth, combined with core pricing and productivity gains, generated solid
financial performance improvement and more than offset the impact of excess
network costs, higher fuel prices, and other cost hurdles, including state and local
taxes, depreciation, and inflation.  Excess network costs include additional
expenses associated with operational efficiencies resulting in higher Train, Engine
and Yard (TE&Y) labor expenses, fuel consumption inefficiencies, maintenance
costs on a larger, active locomotive fleet, and higher freight car rent expense due
to slower asset turns.  Our 2018 operating ratio was an all-time record 62.7%,
improving 0.1 point from 2017 adjusted results (non-GAAP)[1].  Net income of
nearly $6.0 billion translated into earnings of $7.91 per diluted share.
[1] For comparability purposes, the following table reconciles our full year 2017 reported results under
accounting principles generally accepted in the U.S. (GAAP) to our 2017 adjusted results (non-GAAP)
for tax related items recognized in 2017.  We believe the adjusted results provide relevant information
to our investors as they more accurately reflect on-going financial performance.  In addition, these
measures should be considered in addition to, and not a substitute for operating income, income taxes,
net income, diluted EPS, operating ratio, and effective tax rate.
 
23
 
Millions, Except Per Share Amounts
andOperating Income Net Diluted Operating Effective
Percentages Income Taxes Income EPS Ratio Tax Rate
2017 Reported results* (GAAP) $ 8,106 $(3,080) $10,712 $13.36 61.8 %(40.4) %
Factors Affecting Comparability:
Adjustments for Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act
     Equity-method af filiates (212) (73) (139) (0.17) 1.0 pts - 
     Deferred taxes - 5,935 (5,935) (7.40) - 77.9 
2017 Adjusted results (non-GAAP) $ 7,894 $2,782 $4,638 $5.79 62.8 % 37.5 %
*Adjusted for the retrospective adoption of ASU 2017-07 which was effective January 1, 2018.
·Fuel Prices – Our average price of diesel fuel in 2018 was $2.29 per gallon, an
increase of 27% from 2017, as both crude oil and conversion spreads between
crude oil and diesel increased in 2018. The higher price resulted in increased
operating expenses of $507 million (excluding any impact from year-over-year
volume growth). Gross-ton miles and our fuel consumption rate, computed as
gallons of fuel consumed divided by gross ton-miles, both increased 3%, which
also drove higher fuel expense. 
·Free Cash Flow – Cash generated by operating activities totaled nearly $8.7
billion, yielding free cash flow of $3.0 billion after reductions of $3.4 billion for cash
used in investing activities and $2.3 billion in dividends, which included a 20%
increase in our quarterly dividend per share from $0.665 in the fourth quarter of
2017 to $0.80 in the fourth quarter of 2018. Free cash flow is defined as cash
provided by operating activities less cash used in investing activities and dividends
paid.
Free cash flow is not considered a financial measure under GAAP by SEC
Regulation G and Item 10 of SEC Regulation S-K and may not be defined and
calculated by other companies in the same manner. We believe free cash flow is
important to management and investors in evaluating our financial performance
and measures our ability to generate cash without additional external financings.
Free cash flow should be considered in addition to, rather than as a substitute for,
cash provided by operating activities. The following table reconciles cash provided
by operating activities (GAAP measure) to free cash flow (non-GAAP measure):
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Cash provided by operating activities $8,686 $7,230 $7,525 
Cash used in investing activities (3,411) (3,086) (3,393)
Dividends paid (2,299) (1,982) (1,879)
Free cash flow $2,976 $2,162 $2,253 
2019 Outlook
·Safety – Operating a safe railroad benefits all our constituents: our employees,
customers, shareholders and the communities we serve.  We will continue using a
multi-faceted approach to safety, utilizing technology, risk assessment, training and
employee engagement, quality control, and targeted capital investments.  We will
continue using and expanding the deployment of Total Safety Culture and Courage
to Care throughout our operations, which allows us to identify and implement best
practices for employee and operational safety.  We will continue our efforts to
increase detection of rail defects; improve or close crossings; and educate the
public and law enforcement agencies about crossing safety through a combination
of our own programs (including risk assessment strategies), industry programs
and local community activities across our network.
·Network Operations – In 2019, we will continue to implement our G55+0 and
Unified Plan 2020 initiatives to further increase reliability of our service product,
reduce variability in network operations, and improve resource utilization.  We
began implementation of Phase 1 on October 1, 2018 which included our north to
south Mid-America corridor, and was substantially completed in late 2018.  Phase
1 included approximately 160 changes to our transportation plan in that territory. 
In November of 2018, we began the planning phase of implementation on the
Sunset Route and on the two rail corridors between Los Angeles and
Chicago.  Planning for the third phase, which includes the Pacific Northwest and
Northern California, began in late January of 2019.  We expect full implementation
of all phases of the Unified Plan 2020 by mid-2019.  Beyond the initial
implementation of Unified Plan 2020, we will continue to evaluate the entire
network and make further changes as warranted.
 
24
 
In addition, we are working through a terminal rationalization process to more fully
optimize our train operations and crew resources.  These potential changes,
combined with other G55+0 initiatives, are designed to better align our
management structure and decision making processes in conjunction with our
Unified Plan 2020 operating model.
·Fuel Prices – Fuel price projections for crude oil and natural gas continue to
fluctuate in the current environment.  We again could see volatile fuel prices during
the year, as they are sensitive to global and U.S. domestic demand, refining
capacity, geopolitical events, weather conditions and other factors.  As prices
fluctuate, there will be a timing impact on earnings, as our fuel surcharge
programs trail increases or decreases in fuel price by approximately two months.
Lower fuel prices could have a positive impact on the economy by increasing
consumer discretionary spending that potentially could increase demand for
various consumer products that we transport. Alternatively, lower fuel prices could
likely have a negative impact on other commodities such as coal and domestic
drilling-related shipments.
·Capital Plan – In 2019, we expect our capital plan to be approximately $3.2
billion, flat compared to 2018. The plan includes expenditures to renew and
improve our existing infrastructure as well as new capacity investments designed
to support future business growth and operational efficiency. In addition,
expenditures will be made for locomotive modernization and freight cars. The
capital plan may be revised if business conditions warrant or if new laws or
regulations affect our ability to generate sufficient returns on these investments.
(See further discussion in this Item 7 under Liquidity and Capital Resources –
Capital Plan).
·Financial Expectations – Economic conditions in many of our market sectors
continue to drive uncertainty with respect to our volume levels.  Although we
expect volume to grow in the low single digit range in 2019 compared to 2018,
uncertainties in energy markets and prices, consumer purchases, inflation, and
both domestic and international economies will have an impact.  In the current
environment, we expect continued margin improvement driven by continued
pricing opportunities, ongoing G55+0 productivity initiatives, and full
implementation of our Unified Plan 2020 to better leverage our resources and
strengthen our franchise.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Operating Revenues
% Change % Change
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Freight revenues $21,384 $19,837 $18,601 8 % 7 %
Other subsidiary revenues 881 885 814 - 9 
Accessorial revenues 502 458 455 10 1 
Other 65 60 71 8 (15)
Total $22,832 $21,240 $19,941 7 % 7 %
We generate freight revenues by transporting freight or other materials from our four
commodity groups. Freight revenues vary with volume (carloads) and average revenue
per car (ARC). Changes in price, traffic mix and fuel surcharges drive ARC. We
provide some of our customers with contractual incentives for meeting or exceeding
specified cumulative volumes or shipping to and from specific locations, which we
record as reductions to freight revenues based on the actual or projected future
shipments. We recognize freight revenues as shipments move from origin to
destination. We allocate freight revenues between reporting periods based on the
relative transit time in each reporting period and recognize expenses as we incur them.
Other revenues include revenues earned by our subsidiaries, revenues from commuter
rail operations that we manage, accessorial revenues, which we earn when customers
retain equipment owned or controlled by us or when we perform additional services
such as switching or storage, and miscellaneous contract revenue. We recognize other
revenues as we perform services or meet contractual obligations.
Freight revenues increased 8% year-over-year to $21.4 billion driven by 4% volume
growth, higher fuel surcharge revenue, and core pricing gains, partially offset by
negative mix of traffic. Growth in international
 
25
 
and domestic intermodal, petroleum products, metals, rock, plastics, and industrial
chemical shipments more than offset declines in coal, grain, and frac sand shipments.
Freight revenues increased 7% in 2017 to $19.8 billion driven by volume growth of 2%,
higher fuel surcharge revenue, and core pricing gains. Growth in frac sand, coal, and
intermodal shipments more than offset declines in grain, crude oil, finished vehicles,
and rock shipments.
Our fuel surcharge programs generated freight revenues of $1.7 billion, $966 million,
and $560 million in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Fuel surcharge revenue in
2018 increased $769 million as a result of a 27% increase in fuel price and 4% growth
in carloadings.  Fuel surcharge revenue in 2017 increased $406 million as a result of a
22% increase in fuel price, a 2% growth in carloadings, and the lag impact on fuel
surcharge (it can generally take up to two months for changing fuel prices to affect fuel
surcharge recoveries). 
In 2018, other revenues increased from 2017 driven by higher accessorial revenues
associated with carload and container volume growth.
In 2017, other revenues increased from 2016 due to higher revenues at our
subsidiaries, primarily those that broker intermodal, transload, and refrigerated
warehousing logistics services.
The following tables summarize the year-over-year changes in freight revenues,
revenue carloads, and ARC by commodity type:
Freight Revenues % Change % Change
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Agricultural Products $4,469 $4,303 $4,209 4 % 2 %
Energy 4,608 4,498 3,715 2 21 
Industrial 5,679 5,204 4,964 9 5 
Premium 6,628 5,832 5,713 14 2 
Total $21,384 $19,837 $18,601 8 % 7 %
Revenue Carloads % Change % Change
Thousands 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Agricultural Products 1,124 1,141 1,151 (1)% (1)%
Energy 1,650 1,676 1,510 (2) 11 
Industrial 1,752 1,655 1,656 6  -
Premium [a] 4,382 4,116 4,125 6  -
Total 8,908 8,588 8,442 4 % 2 %
% Change % Change
Average Revenue per Car 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Agricultural Products $3,973 $3,770 $3,657 5 % 3 %
Energy 2,793 2,685 2,461 4 9 
Industrial 3,241 3,145 2,996 3 5 
Premium 1,513 1,417 1,385 7 2 
Average $2,400 $2,310 $2,203 4 % 5 %
[a]For intermodal shipments, each container or trailer equals one carload.
 
26
 
 
Agricultural Products –
Freight revenue from
agricultural products
increased in 2018 compared
to 2017 driven by core pricing
gains and higher fuel
surcharge revenue, partially
offset by a 1% decrease in
volume. Grain shipments
decreased 8% in 2018
compared to 2017 largely due
to lower export wheat
shipments reflecting weaker
U.S. competitiveness in the
global market throughout
2018. Conversely, fertilizer
shipments increased 7% and
grain products shipments
increased 4% versus 2017
driven by continued strength
in potash exports and higher
export ethanol shipments.2018 Agricultural Products Carloads
Freight revenue from agricultural products increased in 2017 compared to 2016 driven
by core pricing gains and higher fuel surcharge revenue, partially offset by a 1%
decrease in volume.  Grain and grain product shipments decreased 3% in 2017
compared to 2016.  Strong export demand for wheat drove volume growth in the first
half of the year, which was more than offset by declines of grain shipments in the
second half of the year due to an abundance of global supply reducing U.S. grain
competitiveness. Conversely, fertilizer shipments increased 7% as a result of
continued strength in potash exports.
 
Energy –  Freight revenue
from energy shipments
increased in 2018 compared
to 2017 due to higher fuel
surcharge revenue and mix
of traffic, which was partially
offset by a 2% decline in
volume.  Coal and coke
shipments, which
represented 73% of energy
shipments in 2017, declined
5% due to a commercial
contract loss and certain UP-
served facility
retirements.  Frac sand
shipments also declined
largely due to regional sand
supplies in the Permian
displacing select shipments
originating from the upper
Midwest.  Conversely,
petroleum products
shipments increased due to
continued strong drilling
activity.2018 Energy Carloads
Volume growth of 11% and higher fuel surcharge revenue drove an increase in freight
revenue from energy shipments in 2017 compared to 2016. Shipments out of the
Powder River Basin (PRB) grew 5% driven by strong growth in the first half of the year
due to higher year-over-year natural gas prices and lower inventory levels at utilities.
Shipments out of Colorado and Utah increased 7% compared to 2016 due to the same
drivers, combined with stronger export demand. In addition, increased shale drilling
activity and proppant intensity per drilling well drove substantial volume growth in frac
sand shipments versus 2016.
 
Industrial – Freight revenue
from industrial shipments
increased in 2018 versus
2017 due to volume growth,
core pricing gains, and higher
fuel surcharge revenue,
which was partially offset by
negative mix of traffic.
Volume grew 6% compared
to 2017 due to stronger
industrial production that2018 Industrial Carloads
drove growth in metals and
ores, construction products,
plastics, and industrial
chemicals shipments. In
addition, lumber shipments
increased due to growth in
end use demand compared
to 2017.
 
Freight revenue from
industrial shipments
increased in 2017 versus
2016 due to core pricing
gains and higher fuel
surcharge revenue. 
 
27
 
Volumes were flat as growth in shipments of metals, waste, and government
shipments were offset by declines in construction materials due to inclement weather
in the West in the first half of the year, combined with decreased construction activity in
Texas and lower industrial chemical shipments. 
 
Premium – Freight revenue
from premium shipments
increased in 2018 compared
to 2017 driven by volume
growth, higher fuel surcharge
revenue, and core pricing
gains, partially offset by
negative mix of
traffic.  Volume grew 6%
driven by 9% growth in
international intermodal,
including newly secured
business in 2018 and a fourth
quarter surge in
shipments.  In addition,
domestic intermodal
shipments, including
containerized automotive
parts, increased as a result of
tighter truck capacity,
increased production at
certain auto parts facilities,
and continued truck-to-rail
conversions. 2018 Premium Carloads
Higher fuel surcharge revenue and core pricing gains drove an increase in freight
revenue from premium shipments in 2017 compared to 2016. Volumes were flat as a
1% growth in international shipments was muted by flat domestic shipments (including
containerized automotive parts) due to available truck capacity during most of 2017,
which offset a strong holiday shipping season in the fourth quarter. In addition,
shipments of finished vehicles fell 7% in 2017 resulting from lower domestic sales and
reduced production for certain manufactures. 
 
Mexico Business – Each of our commodity groups includes revenue from shipments to
and from Mexico. Freight revenue from Mexico business was $2.5 billion in 2018, up
10% compared to 2017, driven by 1% volume growth, fuel surcharge revenue, and
core pricing gains. The increase in volume was driven by higher shipments of corn and
feed grains, coal, and finished vehicles, partially offset by declines in automotive parts
and intermodal shipments.
Freight revenue from Mexico business was $2.3 billion in 2017, up 2% compared to
2016.  Core pricing gains and higher fuel surcharge revenue more than offset the 1%
volume decline. The decrease in volume was driven by lower shipments of automotive
parts, partially offset by growth in coal and refined petroleum products shipments.
 
28
 
Operating Expenses
% Change % Change
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Compensation and benefits $5,056 $4,939 $4,779 2 % 3 %
Fuel 2,531 1,891 1,489 34 27 
Purchased services and materials 2,443 2,363 2,258 3 5 
Depreciation 2,191 2,105 2,038 4 3 
Equipment and other rents 1,072 888 1,137 21 (22)
Other 1,022 948 997 8 (5)
Total $14,315 $13,134 $12,698 9 % 3 %
 
Operating expenses increased
$1,181 million in 2018
compared to 2017 driven by
higher fuel prices, excess
network costs, volume-related
expenses, depreciation, and
inflation. In addition, 2017
results included a $212 million
reduction to rent expense
related to income tax
adjustments at certain equity-
method affiliates.  Productivity
savings, lower management
and administrative wage and
benefit costs, lower locomotive
and freight car lease expenses,
joint facility, and personal injury
costs partially offset these
increases. 
 
Operating expenses increased
$436 million in 2017 compared
to 2016 driven by higher fuel
prices, inflation, $86 million of
expenses related2018 Operating Expenses
to the third quarter workforce reduction plan, depreciation, contract services, and
volume-related costs.  Partially offsetting these increases was a $212 million reduction
to operating expense related to income tax adjustments at certain equity-method
affiliates, continued productivity gains, lower locomotive and freight car lease expense,
and lower environmental, personal injury, and joint facility costs. 
Compensation and Benefits – Compensation and benefits include wages, payroll
taxes, health and welfare costs, pension costs, other postretirement benefits, and
incentive costs. In 2018, expenses increased 2% compared to 2017, due to volume-
related costs,  excess network costs, higher training expenses for trainmen, and wage
inflation.  Lower management and administrative wage and benefit costs partially
offset these increases.
In 2017, expenses increased 3% compared to 2016, driven by general wage and
benefit inflation, $86 million of expenses associated with the workforce reduction plan,
volume-related costs, and higher training expenses for trainmen, which were partially
offset by resource productivity gains.
Fuel – Fuel includes locomotive fuel and gasoline for highway and non-highway
vehicles and heavy equipment. Locomotive diesel fuel prices, which averaged $2.29
per gallon (including taxes and transportation costs) in 2018, compared to $1.81 per
gallon in 2017, increased expenses $507 million. In addition, gross-ton miles and the
fuel consumption rate (c-rate) both increased 3% in 2018, also driving higher fuel
expense compared to 2017. The c-rate is computed as gallons of fuel consumed
divided by gross ton-miles in thousands.
Locomotive diesel fuel prices, which averaged $1.81 per gallon (including taxes and
transportation costs) in 2017, compared to $1.48 per gallon in 2016, increased
expenses $334 million. In addition, fuel costs were higher as gross-ton miles
increased 5% compared to 2016.  The c-rate improved 2% compared to 2016.
Purchased Services and Materials – Expense for purchased services and materials
includes the costs of services purchased from outside contractors and other service
providers (including equipment maintenance and contract expenses incurred by our
subsidiaries for external transportation services); materials used to maintain the
Railroad’s lines, structures, and equipment; costs of operating facilities jointly used by
UPRR and other railroads; transportation and lodging for train crew employees;
trucking and contracting costs for
 
29
 
intermodal containers; leased automobile maintenance expenses; and tools and
supplies. Purchased services and materials increased  3% in 2018 compared to 2017
primarily due to volume-related costs, inflationary cost pressures on transportation-
related contract services incurred at our subsidiaries that broker intermodal and
transload services, and higher locomotive repair costs due to the larger active fleet in
service.  Lower joint facility expenses partially offset these increases.
Purchased services and materials increased 5% in 2017 compared to 2016 primarily
due to volume-related costs (including higher subsidiary contract services) and
Hurricane Harvey-related contract service costs, which were partially offset by lower
joint facility expenses.
Depreciation – The majority of depreciation relates to road property, including rail, ties,
ballast, and other track material.  A higher depreciable asset base increased
depreciation expense in 2018 compared to 2017.
A higher depreciable asset base increased depreciation expense in 2017 compared to
2016. This increase was partially offset by our recent depreciation studies that resulted
in lower depreciation rates for some asset classes.  
Equipment and Other Rents – Equipment and other rents expense primarily includes
rental expense that the Railroad pays for freight cars owned by other railroads or
private companies; freight car, intermodal, and locomotive leases; and office and other
rent expenses. Equity income from certain equity method investments is also
included.  Equipment and other rents expense increased $184 million compared to
2017 largely driven by a $212 million reduction to 2017 rent expense related to income
tax adjustments at certain equity-method affiliates as a result of the lower federal tax
rate implemented January 1, 2018.  Increased car rent expense due to volume growth
and slower network velocity also contributed to the increase.  Lower locomotive and
freight car lease expenses in 2018 partially offset these increases. 
Equipment and other rents expense decreased $249 million compared to 2016.  $212
million of the reduction was due to income tax adjustments at certain equity-method
affiliates. Lower locomotive and freight car lease expense also contributed to the year-
over-year decrease.  Conversely, increased car rent expense due to volume growth in
certain markets partially offset these decreases.
Other – Other expenses include state and local taxes, freight, equipment and property
damage, utilities, insurance, personal injury, environmental, employee travel,
telephone and cellular, computer software, bad debt, and other general expenses. 
Other expenses increased 8% in 2018 compared to 2017 as a result of higher state
and local taxes and environmental expenses related to our operating properties. 
Lower personal injury expense, an insurance reimbursement for lost revenue and
expenses incurred during Hurricane Harvey in 2017, and reduced costs for destroyed
equipment owned by third parties and lower freight damage expense partially offset
these increases.
 
Other expenses decreased 5% in 2017 compared to 2016 as a result of lower
environmental and personal injury expenses, and higher bad debt expense in 2016
resulting from a customer bankruptcy.  Conversely, increased costs associated with
destroyed equipment owned by third parties, and higher property and damaged freight
costs partially offset these decreases. 
Non-Operating Items
% Change % Change
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 v
20172017 v
2016
Other income $ 94 $ 245 $ 221 (62)% 11 %
Interest expense (870) (719) (698) 21 3 
Income tax benefit/(expense) (1,775) 3,080 (2,533) U F
Other Income – Other income decreased in 2018 compared to 2017 largely as a result
of a $65 million gain on a litigation settlement for back rent and a $57 million real
estate gain, both recognized in the third quarter of 2017.  In addition, an $85 million
expense associated with early-extinguishment of outstanding debentures and
mortgage bonds recognized in the first quarter of 2018 also contributed to the
decrease.  Higher interest income earned in 2018 partially offset these decreases.
Other income increased in 2017 compared to 2016 primarily as a result of a $65
million gain on a litigation settlement for back rent and a $57 million real estate sale
gain, both recognized in the third quarter of 2017.  Rental income also increased in
2017 compared to 2016.
 
30
 
Interest Expense – Interest expense increased in 2018 compared to 2017 due to an
increased weighted-average debt level of $20.1 billion in 2018 from $15.9 billion in
2017, partially offset by the impact of a lower effective interest rate of 4.4% in 2018
compared to 4.6 % in 2017.
Interest expense increased in 2017 compared to 2016 due to an increased weighted-
average debt level of $15.9 billion in 2017 from $15.0 billion in 2016, partially offset by
the impact of a lower effective interest rate of 4.6% in 2017 compared to 4.7% in 2016.
Income Taxes – Income tax expense was $1.8 billion in 2018 compared to a benefit of
$3.1 billion in 2017.  The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act was enacted on December 22, 2017
and reduced the federal income tax rate from 35% to 21% effective January 1,
2018.  Consequently, we remeasured our deferred tax assets and liabilities, resulting
in a $5.9 billion non-cash reduction in our income tax expense in 2017. 
Our effective tax rate for 2018 was 22.9% compared to (40.4)% in 2017.  The 2018
effective tax rate declined due to decreases in the corporate state income tax rates in
Iowa and Missouri.  The 2017 rate was substantially reduced by the impact of the Tax
Act, which resulted in a $5.9 billion non-cash reduction in our 2017 tax expense.
  
OTHER OPERATING/PERFORMANCE AND FINANCIAL STATISTICS
We report a number of key performance measures weekly to the AAR.  We provide
this data on our website at www.up.com/investor/aar-stb_reports/index.htm.
Operating/Performance Statistics
Railroad performance measures are included in the table below:
% Change % Change
2018 2017 2016 2018 v 2017 2017 v 2016
Average train speed (miles per hour) 24.5 25.4 26.6 (4)% (5)%
Average terminal dwell time (hours) 29.6 30.3 28.1 (2)% 8 %
Gross ton-miles (billions) 928.6 898.7 856.9 3 % 5 %
Revenue ton-miles (billions) 474.0 466.7 440.1 2 % 6 %
Operating ratio 62.7 61.8 63.7 0.9 pts (1.9)pts
Employees (average) 41,967 41,992 42,919  -% (2)%
Average Train Speed – Average train speed is calculated by dividing train miles by
hours operated on our main lines between terminals.  Average train speed, as reported
to the AAR, declined 4% in 2018 compared to 2017 largely driven by network
congestion on key routes and terminals combined with high freight car inventory levels
during the first half of the year, somewhat offset by implementation of the first phase of
our Unified Plan 2020 in late third quarter 2018.  Continued implementation and testing
of PTC across a larger portion of our network also negatively impacted overall average
train speed throughout the year.    
Average train speed declined 5% in 2017 compared to 2016 as disruptions across our
network, including the impact of Hurricane Harvey, negatively impacted network
fluidity.  Continued implementation and testing of Positive Train Control across a
growing number of routes in our network combined with operational challenges also
negatively impacted overall average train speed.
Average Terminal Dwell Time – Average terminal dwell time is the average time that a
rail car spends at our terminals. Lower average terminal dwell time improves asset
utilization and service. Average terminal dwell time decreased 2% in 2018 compared to
2017 driven by an 18% improvement in the fourth quarter compared to the same
period in 2017.  Implementation of the first phase of our Unified Plan 2020 in late-third
quarter 2018 drove the improvement, more than offsetting the impact of network
congestion and high inventory levels experienced in the first half of the year.
Average terminal dwell time increased 8% in 2017 compared to 2016 resulting from
network disruptions and operational challenges which negatively impacted network
fluidity.
Gross and Revenue Ton-Miles – Gross ton-miles are calculated by multiplying the
weight of loaded and empty freight cars by the number of miles hauled. Revenue ton-
miles are calculated by multiplying the weight of freight by the number of tariff
miles.  Gross ton-miles and revenue ton-miles increased 3% and
 
31
 
2%, respectively in 2018 compared to 2017, resulting from a 4% increase in carloads.
Changes in commodity mix drove the variances in year-over-year increases between
gross ton-miles, revenue ton-miles, and carloads.
Gross ton-miles and revenue ton-miles increased 5% and 6%, respectively in 2017
compared to 2016, resulting from a 2% increase in carloads. Changes in commodity
mix drove the variances in year-over-year increases between gross ton-miles, revenue
ton-miles, and carloads.
Operating Ratio – Operating ratio is our operating expenses reflected as a percentage
of operating revenue.  Our operating ratio increased 0.9 points to 62.7% in 2018
compared to 2017.  Income tax adjustments recognized in 2017 at our equity-method
affiliates resulted in one point of the increase.  Core pricing gains and volume growth,
mostly offset by excess network costs, higher fuel prices, and inflation, drove 0.1 point
of operating ratio improvement.
Our operating ratio improved 1.9 points to 61.8% in 2017 compared to 2016.  Income
tax adjustments recognized in 2017 at our equity-method affiliates drove one point of
the improvement.  Core pricing gains, volume growth, and productivity savings more
than offset higher inflation, higher fuel prices, and other expenses to drive 0.9 points of
operating ratio improvement.
Employees – Employee levels were flat in 2018 compared to 2017 as a smaller capital
workforce and fewer management and administrative personnel offset the impact of
4% volume growth, which contributed to an increase in TE&Y employees.
Employee levels decreased 2% in 2017 compared to 2016, driven by productivity
gains, a smaller capital workforce, and fewer management and administrative
personnel, which more than offset the impact of 2% volume growth.
Return on Average Common Shareholders’ Equity
Millions, Except Percentages 2018 2017 2016 
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Average equity $22,640 $22,394 $20,317 
Return on average common shareholders' equity 26.4% 47.8% 20.8% 
Return on Invested Capital as Adjusted (ROIC)
Millions, Except Percentages 2018 2017 2016 
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Interest expense 870 719 698 
Interest on average present value of operating leases 82 105 121 
Taxes on interest (218) (309) (306)
Net operating profit after taxes as adjusted (a) $6,700 $11,227 $4,746 
Average equity $22,640 $22,394 $20,317 
Average debt 19,668 15,976 14,604 
Average present value of operating leases 2,206 2,288 2,581 
Average invested capital as adjusted (b) $44,514 $40,658 $37,502 
Return on invested capital as adjusted (a/b) 15.1% 27.6% 12.7% 
ROIC is considered a non-GAAP financial measure by SEC Regulation G and Item 10
of SEC Regulation S-K, and may not be defined and calculated by other companies in
the same manner. We believe this measure is important to management and investors
in evaluating the efficiency and effectiveness of our long-term capital investments.  In
addition, we currently use ROIC as a performance criteria in determining certain
elements of equity compensation for our executives. ROIC should be considered in
addition to, rather than as a substitute for, other information provided in accordance
with GAAP. The most comparable GAAP measure is Return on Average Common
Shareholders’ Equity. The tables above provide reconciliations from return on average
common shareholders’ equity to ROIC.  At December 31, 2018, in transition to the
adoption of the new lease accounting standard on January 1, 2019, the incremental
borrowing rate on operating leases was 3.7%.  At December 31, 2017 and December
31, 2016, operating
 
32
 
leases were discounted using our effective interest rate on debt of 4.6% and 4.7%,
respectively.  Our 2018 ROIC of 15.1% decreased compared to 2017, largely as a
result of the income tax benefit recognized in 2017 related to the $5.9 billion reduction
in our deferred tax liability (See Note 8 of the Consolidated Financial Statements for
additional information).    
Net Return on Invested Capital as Adjusted (Net ROIC)
The table below reconciles ROIC as previously calculated to Net ROIC for items
affecting comparability.
2018 2017 2016 
Return on invested capital as adjusted 15.1% 27.6% 12.7% 
Factors Affecting Comparability:
Adjustments for Tax Cuts and Jobs Act [a] N/A (13.9) N/A
Net Return on Invested Capital as Adjusted 15.1% 13.7% 12.7% 
[a]Adjustments remove the impact of $5.9 billion and $139 million from both 12/31/17 Net Income and
12/31/17 Shareholders’ Equity.
Net ROIC is considered a non-GAAP financial measure by SEC Regulation G and
Item 10 of SEC Regulation S-K, and may not be defined and calculated by other
companies in the same manner. We believe this measure is important to management
and investors in evaluating the efficiency and effectiveness of our long-term capital
investments. We use Net ROIC to demonstrate year over year comparability for
significant items. Net ROIC should be considered in addition to, rather than as a
substitute for, other information provided in accordance with GAAP. The most
comparable GAAP measure is Return on Average Common Shareholders’ Equity. 
Adjusted Debt / Adjusted EBITDA
Millions, Except Ratios Dec. 31, Dec. 31, Dec. 31,
for the T welve Months Ended 2018 2017 2016 
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Less:
Other income 94 245 221 
Add:
Income tax expense/(benefit) 1,775 (3,080) 2,533 
Depreciation 2,191 2,105 2,038 
Interest expense 870 719 698 
EBITDA $10,708 $10,211 $9,281 
Interest on present value of operating leases 84 98 114 
Adjusted EBITDA  (a) $10,792 $10,309 $9,395 
Debt $22,391 $16,944 $15,007 
Net present value of operating leases 2,271 2,140 2,435 
Unfunded pension and OPEB, 
net of taxes of $135, $238, and $261 456 396 436 
Adjusted debt (b) $25,118 $19,480 $17,878 
Adjusted debt / Adjusted EBITDA  (b/a) 2.3 1.9 1.9 
Adjusted debt to Adjusted EBITDA (earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation,
amortization and interest on present value of operating leases) is considered a non-
GAAP financial measure by SEC Regulation G and Item 10 of SEC Regulation S-K
and may not be defined and calculated by other companies in the same manner. We
believe this measure is important to management and investors in evaluating the
Company’s ability to sustain given debt levels (including leases) with the cash
generated from operations. In addition, a comparable measure is used by rating
agencies when reviewing the Company’s credit rating. Adjusted debt to Adjusted
EBITDA should be considered in addition to, rather than as a substitute for, net
income. The table above provides reconciliations from net income to adjusted debt to
adjusted EBITDA. At December 31, 2018, in transition to the adoption of the new lease
accounting standard on January 1, 2019, the incremental borrowing rate on operating
leases was 3.7%.  At December 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, operating leases
were discounted using our effective interest rate on debt of 4.6% and 4.7%,
respectively.
 
33
 
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
At December 31, 2018, we had a working capital deficit. At December 31, 2017, we
had a working capital surplus. The deficit at 2018 year-end was primarily due to an
increase in upcoming debt maturities. As past years indicate, it is not unusual for us to
have a working capital deficit; however, we believe it is not an indication of a lack of
liquidity.  We also maintain adequate resources, including our credit facility, and when
necessary, access to capital markets to meet any foreseeable cash requirements.
As of December 31, 2018, our principal sources of liquidity included cash, cash
equivalents, our receivables securitization facility, and our revolving credit facility, as
well as the availability of commercial paper and other sources of financing through the
capital markets. We had $2.0 billion of committed credit available under our credit
facility, with no borrowings outstanding as of December 31, 2018. We did not draw on
our current facility or previous facility at any time during 2018. The value of the
outstanding undivided interest held by investors under the $650 million capacity
receivables securitization facility was $400 million as of December 31, 2018. Our
access to this receivables securitization facility may be reduced or restricted if our
bond ratings fall to certain levels below investment grade. If our bond rating were to
deteriorate, it could have an adverse impact on our liquidity. Access to commercial
paper as well as other capital market financings is dependent on market conditions.
Deterioration of our operating results or financial condition due to internal or external
factors could negatively impact our ability to access capital markets as a source of
liquidity. Access to liquidity through the capital markets is also dependent on our
financial stability. We expect that we will continue to have access to liquidity through
any or all of the following sources or activities: (i) increasing the size or utilization of
our receivables securitization, (ii) issuing commercial paper, (iii) entering into bank
loans, outside of our revolving credit facility, or (iv) issuing bonds or other debt
securities to public or private investors based on our assessment of the current
condition of the credit markets. The Company’s $2.0 billion revolving credit facility is
intended to support the issuance of commercial paper by UPC and also serves as an
additional source of liquidity to fund short term needs. The Company currently does
not intend to make any borrowings under this facility.
Cash Flows
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Cash provided by operating activities $8,686 $7,230 $7,525 
Cash used in investing activities (3,411) (3,086) (3,393)
Cash used in financing activities (5,222) (4,146) (4,246)
Net change in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 53 $ (2)$ (114)
Operating Activities
Cash provided by operating activities increased in 2018 compared to 2017 due
primarily to lower federal income tax payments.
 
Cash provided by operating activities decreased in 2017 compared to 2016 due to the
timing of tax payments in 2016 related to bonus depreciation on capital spending.  The
decrease was mostly offset by higher income in 2017 compared to 2016.
The Tax Act was enacted on December 22, 2017. The Tax Act extended 100% bonus
depreciation effective September 27, 2017 through 2022, and phases out bonus
deprecation by 2027.    
Investing Activities
Higher capital investments increased cash used in investing activities in 2018
compared to 2017.
Lower capital investments and short-term investment purchases decreased cash used
in investing activities in 2017 compared to 2016.
 
34
 
The following tables detail cash capital investments and track statistics for the years
ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Rail and other track material $ 608 $ 619 $ 628 
Ties 444 480 494 
Ballast 216 231 235 
Other [a] 576 503 480 
Total road infrastructure replacements 1,844 1,833 1,837 
Line expansion and other capacity projects 286 124 153 
Commercial facilities 234 189 152 
Total capacity and commercial facilities 520 313 305 
Locomotives and freight cars [b] 716 607 854 
Positive train control 158 336 371 
Technology and other 199 149 138 
Total cash capital investments $3,437 $3,238 $3,505 
[a]Other includes bridges and tunnels, signals, other road assets, and road work equipment.
[b]Locomotives and freight cars include early lease buyouts of $290 million in 2018, $173 million in 2017,
and $90 million in 2016.
2018 2017 2016 
Track miles of rail replaced 700 731 791 
Track miles of rail capacity expansion 39 11 52 
New ties installed (thousands) 4,285 4,026 4,482 
Miles of track surfaced 9,466 11,071 11,764 
Capital Plan –  In 2019, we expect our capital plan to be approximately $3.2 billion,
which may be revised if business conditions or the regulatory environment affect our
ability to generate sufficient returns on these investments. While asset replacements
will fluctuate as part of our renewal strategy, we expect to use 75% to 80% of our
capital investments to renew and improve existing capital assets. We will continue to
balance investment in our network infrastructure and terminal capacity as appropriate,
including new capacity investments designed to support future business growth and
operational efficiency. Significant investments will be made for locomotive
modernization and freight cars.
We expect to fund our 2019 cash capital plan by using some or all of the following:
cash generated from operations, proceeds from the sale or lease of various operating
and non-operating properties, proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt, and cash
on hand. Our annual capital plan is a critical component of our long-term strategic
plan. We expect our plan will enhance the long-term value of the Company for our
shareholders by providing sufficient resources to (i) replace and improve our existing
track infrastructure to provide safe and fluid operations, (ii) increase network efficiency
by adding or improving facilities and track, and (iii) make investments that meet
customer demand and take advantage of opportunities for long-term growth.
 
Financing Activities
Cash used in financing activities increased in 2018 compared to 2017. Increases of
$4,212 million in share repurchase programs, $317 million in dividends paid and $896
million in debt repaid more than offset increases of $4,157 million in debt issued and
$194 million in net issuances of commercial paper.
Cash used in financing activities decreased in 2017 compared to 2016. An increase of
$908 million in common shares purchased and an increase of $103 million in dividends
paid was more than offset by an increase of $752 million in debt issued, a decrease of
$173 million in debt repaid, and a decrease of $191 million in debt exchange costs.
See Note 15 of the Consolidated Financial Statements for a description of all our
outstanding financing arrangements and significant new borrowings. 
 
35
 
Share Repurchase Programs
Effective January 1, 2017, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to
120 million shares of our common stock by December 31, 2020, replacing our previous
repurchase program. As of December 31, 2018, we repurchased a total of $31.4 billion
of our common stock since the commencement of our repurchase programs in 2007.
The table below represents shares repurchased in 2018 under this repurchase
program.
Number of Shares
Purchased Average Price Paid
2018 2017 2018 2017 
First quarter 9,259,004 7,531,300 $132.84 $106.55 
Second quarter [a] 33,229,992 7,788,283 142.74 109.10 
Third quarter 2,239,405 11,801,755 151.94 106.69 
Fourth quarter [b] 12,490,632 9,231,510 153.04 119.37 
Total 57,219,033 36,352,848 $143.75 $110.40 
Remaining number of shares that may be repurchased under current
authority26,428,119 
[a]Includes initial delivery of 19,870,292 shares repurchased under accelerated share repurchase
programs.
[b]Includes 4,457,356 shares received upon settlement of accelerated share repurchase programs.    
Management's assessments of market conditions and other pertinent facts guide the
timing and volume of all repurchases. We expect to fund any share repurchases under
this program through cash generated from operations, the sale or lease of various
operating and non-operating properties, debt issuances, and cash on hand. Open
market repurchases are recorded in treasury stock at cost, which includes any
applicable commissions and fees.
From January 1, 2019, through February 7, 2019, we repurchased 3.4 million shares
at an aggregate cost of approximately $521 million.
On February 7, 2019, the Board of Directors approved a new share repurchase
authorization, enabling the Company to buy up to 150 million of its common shares by
March 31, 2022. The new authorization is effective April 1, 2019, and replaces the
current authorization, which will now expire on March 31, 2019.
Accelerated Share Repurchase Programs – On June 14, 2018, the Company
established accelerated share repurchase programs (ASRs) with two financial
institutions to repurchase shares of our common stock. Under these ASRs, we paid a
pre-specified amount of $3.6 billion and received an initial delivery of 19,870,292
shares on June 15, 2018. Upon settlement of the ASRs, we received 4,457,356
additional shares in the fourth quarter of 2018. The final number of shares
repurchased under the ASRs was based on the volume weighted average stock price
of the Company’s common stock during the ASR term, less a negotiated discount. 
ASRs are accounted for as equity transactions, and at the time of receipt, shares are
included in treasury stock at fair market value as of the corresponding initiation or
settlement date. The Company reflects shares received as a repurchase of common
stock in the weighted average common shares outstanding calculation for basic and
diluted earnings per share.
Contractual Obligations and Commercial Commitments
As described in the notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements and as referenced
in the tables below, we have contractual obligations and commercial commitments that
may affect our financial condition. Based on our assessment of the underlying
provisions and circumstances of our contractual obligations and commercial
commitments, including material sources of off-balance sheet and structured finance
arrangements, other than the risks that we and other similarly situated companies face
with respect to the condition of the capital markets (as described in Item 1A of Part II of
this report),  there is no known trend, demand, commitment, event, or uncertainty that
is reasonably likely to occur that would have a material adverse effect on our
consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity. In addition, our
commercial obligations, financings, and commitments are customary transactions that
are similar to those of other comparable corporations, particularly within the
transportation industry.
 
36
 
The following tables identify material obligations and commitments as of December 31,
2018:
Payments Due by December 31,
Contractual Obligations After
Millions Total2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2023 Other
Debt [a] $38,253 $2,256 $1,679 $1,926 $1,556 $2,028 $28,808 $  -
Operating leases [b] 2,646 419 378 303 272 234 1,040  -
Capital lease obligations [c] 898 148 155 159 142 94 200  -
Purchase obligations [d] 3,311 1,915 967 265 49 30 49 36 
Other post retirement benefits
[e]477 50 49 49 48 48 233  -
Income tax contingencies [f] 174 99  -  -  -  -  - 75 
Total contractual obligations $45,759 $4,887 $3,228 $2,702 $2,067 $2,434 $30,330 $111 
[a]Excludes capital lease obligations of $754 million, as well as unamortized discount and deferred
issuance costs of $(817) million. Includes an interest component of $15,799 million.
[b]Includes leases for locomotives, freight cars, other equipment, and real estate.
[c]Represents total obligations, including interest component of $144 million.
[d]Purchase obligations include locomotive maintenance contracts; purchase commitments for fuel
purchases, locomotives, ties, ballast, and rail; and agreements to purchase other goods and
services.  For amounts where we cannot reasonably estimate the year of settlement, they are reflected
in the Other column.
[e]Includes estimated other post retirement, medical, and life insurance payments, payments made under
the unfunded pension plan for the next ten years.
[f]Future cash flows for income tax contingencies reflect the recorded liabilities and assets for
unrecognized tax benefits, including interest and penalties, as of December 31, 2018.  For amounts
where the year of settlement is uncertain, they are reflected in the Other column.
Amount of Commitment Expiration per Period
Other Commercial Commitments After
Millions Total2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2023 
Credit facilities [a] $2,000 $  -$  -$  -$  -$2,000 $  -
Receivables securitization facility [b] 650 650  -  -  -  -  -
Guarantees [c] 22 7 5 5 5  -  -
Standby letters of credit [d] 18 16 2  -  -  -  -
Total commercial commitments $2,690 $673 $ 7 $ 5 $ 5 $2,000 $  -
[a]None of the credit facility was used as of December 31, 2018.
[b]$400 million of the receivables securitization facility was utilized as of December 31, 2018, which is
accounted for as debt. The full program matures in July 2019.
[c]Includes guaranteed obligations related to our affiliated operations.
[d]None of the letters of credit were drawn upon as of December 31, 2018.
 
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
Guarantees – At December 31, 2018, and 2017, we were contingently liable for $22
million and $33 million in guarantees. The fair value of these obligations as of both
December 31, 2018, and 2017, was $0. We entered into these contingent guarantees
in the normal course of business, and they include guaranteed obligations related to
our affiliated operations. The final guarantee expires in 2022. We are not aware of any
existing event of default that would require us to satisfy these guarantees. We do not
expect that these guarantees will have a material adverse effect on our consolidated
financial condition, results of operations, or liquidity.
 
OTHER MATTERS
Labor Agreements –  Approximately 85% of our full-time employees are represented
by 14 major rail unions. Pursuant to the Railway Labor Act (RLA), our collective
bargaining agreements are subject to modification every five years. The most recent
round of negotiations started on January 1, 2015, and throughout 2017 and 2018, we
concluded new agreements with all 14 major rail unions. Existing agreements remain
in effect until new agreements are ratified or until the RLA procedures are
exhausted.  The RLA procedures include mediation, potential arbitration, cooling-off
periods, and the possibility of Presidential Emergency Boards and Congressional
intervention. The next round of negotiations begins with the service of RLA Section 6
notices on or about November 1, 2019 related to years 2019-2023. Contract
 
37
 
negotiations historically continue for an extended period of time, and work stoppages
during negotiations are rare.
Inflation – Long periods of inflation significantly increase asset replacement costs for
capital-intensive companies. As a result, assuming that we replace all operating assets
at current price levels, depreciation charges (on an inflation-adjusted basis) would be
substantially greater than historically reported amounts.
Sensitivity Analyses – The sensitivity analyses that follow illustrate the economic
effect that hypothetical changes in interest rates could have on our results of
operations and financial condition. These hypothetical changes do not consider other
factors that could impact actual results.
At December 31, 2018, we had variable-rate debt representing approximately 3.8% of
our total debt. If variable interest rates average one percentage point higher in 2019
than our December 31, 2018 variable rate, which was approximately 3.3%, our interest
expense would increase by approximately $8.5 million. This amount was determined
by considering the impact of the hypothetical interest rate on the balances of our
variable-rate debt at December 31, 2018.
Market risk for fixed-rate debt is estimated as the potential increase in fair value
resulting from a hypothetical one percentage point decrease in interest rates as of
December 31, 2018, and amounts to an increase of approximately $2.4 billion to the
fair value of our debt at December 31, 2018. We estimated the fair values of our fixed-
rate debt by considering the impact of the hypothetical interest rates on quoted market
prices and current borrowing rates.
Accounting Pronouncements – See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Asserted and Unasserted Claims – Various claims and lawsuits are pending against
us and certain of our subsidiaries. We cannot fully determine the effect of all asserted
and unasserted claims on our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or
liquidity. To the extent possible, we have recorded a liability where asserted and
unasserted claims are considered probable and where such claims can be reasonably
estimated. We do not expect that any known lawsuits, claims, environmental costs,
commitments, contingent liabilities, or guarantees will have a material adverse effect
on our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity after taking
into account liabilities and insurance recoveries previously recorded for these matters.
Gain Contingency – UPRR filed multiple claims with the IRS for refunds of railroad
retirement taxes (Railroad Retirement Taxes) paid on (i) certain stock awards to its
employees and (ii) certain bonus payments it made to labor agreement employees
during the years 1991 – 2017. In 2016, the U.S. District Court for the District of
Nebraska (the District Court) denied UPRR recovery of these Railroad Retirement
Taxes. UPRR appealed this denial to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the 8th Circuit (8th
Circuit) and the 8th Circuit ruled in favor of UPRR and remanded the case to the
District Court. The IRS appealed the 8th Circuit ruling to the U.S. Supreme Court. In
June 2018, a similar case for another railroad was decided by the U.S. Supreme Court
against the IRS and in favor of that railroad (Wisconsin Central LTD., Et. Al. v. U.S.).
As a result, the U.S. Supreme Court denied the IRS request to appeal the 8th Circuit
ruling. On November 28, 2018 the District Court issued an order granting summary
judgment to UPRR pursuant to the mandate of the 8th Circuit. UPRR, the Department
of Justice (DOJ), and the IRS have since agreed upon the tax refund amounts owed
UPRR and its employees. UPRR’s employer refund of $78 million will be recognized
as a reduction of compensation and benefit expenses and approximately $30 million of
interest will be recognized in other income. UPRR expects to receive the refunds in
2019, but the refunds may be received in multiple portions at different times. UPRR is
in the process of seeking consent from approximately 75,000 current and former
employees to obtain their employee share of the refunds.  UPRR anticipates having
this consent process completed in the first half of 2019, but further actions by the IRS
and Railroad Retirement Board may delay completion until later in 2019. 
These refund claims are considered gain contingencies and no refund amounts have
been recorded in the Consolidated Financial Statements as of December 31, 2018.
The claims will be recorded when a final judgment from the District Court has been
issued and all IRS requirements for UPRR’s refunds have been fulfilled.
Indemnities – Our maximum potential exposure under indemnification arrangements,
including certain tax indemnifications, can range from a specified dollar amount to an
unlimited amount, depending on the nature of the transactions and the agreements.
Due to uncertainty as to whether claims will be made or how they will be resolved, we
cannot reasonably determine the probability of an adverse claim or reasonably
estimate
 
38
 
any adverse liability or the total maximum exposure under these indemnification
arrangements. We do not have any reason to believe that we will be required to make
any material payments under these indemnity provisions.
Climate Change – Although climate change could have an adverse impact on our
operations and financial performance in the future (see Risk Factors under Item 1A of
this report), we are currently unable to predict the manner or severity of such impact.
However, we continue to take steps and explore opportunities to reduce the impact of
our operations on the environment, including investments in new technologies, using
training programs to reduce fuel consumption, and changing our operations to
increase fuel efficiency.
 
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Our Consolidated Financial Statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP.
The preparation of these financial statements requires estimation and judgment that
affect the reported amounts of revenues, expenses, assets, and liabilities. We base
our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that we
believe are reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for
making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily
apparent from other sources. The following critical accounting policies are a subset of
our significant accounting policies described in Note 2 to the Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data, Item 8. These critical accounting policies affect significant areas
of our financial statements and involve judgment and estimates. If these estimates
differ significantly from actual results, the impact on our Consolidated Financial
Statements may be material.
Personal Injury – The cost of personal injuries to employees and others related to our
activities is charged to expense based on estimates of the ultimate cost and number of
incidents each year. We use an actuarial analysis to measure the expense and liability,
including unasserted claims. The Federal Employers’ Liability Act (FELA) governs
compensation for work-related accidents. Under FELA, damages are assessed based
on a finding of fault through litigation or out-of-court settlements. We offer a
comprehensive variety of services and rehabilitation programs for employees who are
injured at work.
Our personal injury liability is not discounted to present value due to the uncertainty
surrounding the timing of future payments. Approximately 94% of the recorded liability
is related to asserted claims and approximately 6% is related to unasserted claims at
December 31, 2018. Because of the uncertainty surrounding the ultimate outcome of
personal injury claims, it is reasonably possible that future costs to settle these claims
may range from approximately $271 million to $297 million. We record an accrual at
the low end of the range as no amount of loss within the range is more probable than
any other.  Estimates can vary over time due to evolving trends in litigation.
Our personal injury liability activity was as follows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Beginning balance $ 285 $ 290 $ 318 
Current year accruals 74 77 75 
Changes in estimates for prior years (16) (7) (29)
Payments (72) (75) (74)
Ending balance at December 31 $ 271 $ 285 $ 290 
Current portion, ending balance at December 31 $ 72 $ 66 $ 62 
Our personal injury claims activity was as follows:
2018 2017 2016 
Open claims, beginning balance 2,090 2,157 2,404 
New claims 3,188 3,024 2,453 
Settled or dismissed claims (3,253) (3,091) (2,700)
Open claims, ending balance at December 31 2,025 2,090 2,157 
 
39
 
We reassess our estimated insurance recoveries annually and have recognized an
asset for estimated insurance recoveries at December 31, 2018, and 2017.  Any
changes to recorded insurance recoveries are included in the above table in the
Changes in estimates for prior years category.
Environmental Costs – We are subject to federal, state, and local environmental laws
and regulations. We have identified 334 sites at which we are or may be liable for
remediation costs associated with alleged contamination or for violations of
environmental requirements. This includes 33 sites that are the subject of actions
taken by the U.S. government, 21 of which are currently on the Superfund National
Priorities List. Certain federal legislation imposes joint and several liability for the
remediation of identified sites; consequently, our ultimate environmental liability may
include costs relating to activities of other parties, in addition to costs relating to our
own activities at each site.
When we identify an environmental issue with respect to property owned, leased, or
otherwise used in our business, we perform, with assistance of our consultants,
environmental assessments on the property. We expense the cost of the assessments
as incurred. We accrue the cost of remediation where our obligation is probable and
such costs can be reasonably estimated. Our environmental liability is not discounted
to present value due to the uncertainty surrounding the timing of future payments.
Our environmental liability activity was as follows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Beginning balance $ 196 $ 212 $ 190 
Accruals 84 45 84 
Payments (57) (61) (62)
Ending balance at December 31 $ 223 $ 196 $ 212 
Current portion, ending balance at December 31 $ 59 $ 57 $ 55 
Our environmental site activity was as follows:
2018 2017 2016 
Open sites, beginning balance 315 292 290 
New sites 91 77 85 
Closed sites (72) (54) (83)
Open sites, ending balance at December 31 334 315 292 
The environmental liability includes future costs for remediation and restoration of
sites, as well as ongoing monitoring costs, but excludes any anticipated recoveries
from third parties. Cost estimates are based on information available for each site,
financial viability of other potentially responsible parties, and existing technology, laws,
and regulations. The ultimate liability for remediation is difficult to determine because
of the number of potentially responsible parties, site-specific cost sharing
arrangements with other potentially responsible parties, the degree of contamination
by various wastes, the scarcity and quality of volumetric data related to many of the
sites, and the speculative nature of remediation costs. Estimates of liability may vary
over time due to changes in federal, state, and local laws governing environmental
remediation. Current obligations are not expected to have a material adverse effect on
our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity.
Property and Depreciation – Our railroad operations are highly capital intensive, and
our large base of homogeneous, network-type assets turns over on a continuous
basis.  Each year we develop a capital program for the replacement of assets and for
the acquisition or construction of assets that enable us to enhance our operations or
provide new service offerings to customers.  Assets purchased or constructed
throughout the year are capitalized if they meet applicable minimum units of property
criteria.  Properties and equipment are carried at cost and are depreciated on a
straight-line basis over their estimated service lives, which are measured in years,
except for rail in high-density traffic corridors (i.e., all rail lines except for those subject
to abandonment, and yard and switching tracks) for which lives are measured in
millions of gross tons per mile of track.  We use the group method of depreciation in
which all items with similar characteristics, use, and expected lives are grouped
together in asset classes, and are depreciated using composite depreciation
rates.  The group method of depreciation treats each asset class as a pool of
resources, not as singular items.  We currently have more than 60 depreciable asset
classes, and we may increase or decrease the number of asset classes due to
changes in technology, asset strategies, or other factors.
 
40
 
We determine the estimated service lives of depreciable railroad property by means of
depreciation studies.  We perform depreciation studies at least every three years for
equipment and every six years for track assets (i.e., rail and other track material, ties,
and ballast) and other road property.  Our depreciation studies take into account the
following factors:
·Statistical analysis of historical patterns of use and retirements of each of our
asset classes;
·Evaluation of any expected changes in current operations and the outlook for
continued use of the assets;
·Evaluation of technological advances and changes to maintenance practices; and
·Expected salvage to be received upon retirement.
For rail in high-density traffic corridors, we measure estimated service lives in millions
of gross tons per mile of track.  It has been our experience that the lives of rail in high-
density traffic corridors are closely correlated to usage (i.e., the amount of weight
carried over the rail).  The service lives also vary based on rail weight, rail condition
(e.g., new or secondhand), and rail type (e.g., straight or curve).  Our depreciation
studies for rail in high-density traffic corridors consider each of these factors in
determining the estimated service lives.  For rail in high-density traffic corridors, we
calculate depreciation rates annually by dividing the number of gross ton-miles carried
over the rail (i.e., the weight of loaded and empty freight cars, locomotives and
maintenance of way equipment transported over the rail) by the estimated service lives
of the rail measured in millions of gross tons per mile.  Rail in high-density traffic
corridors accounts for approximately 70 percent of the historical cost of rail and other
track material.  Based on the number of gross ton-miles carried over our rail in high
density traffic corridors during 2018, the estimated service lives of the majority of this
rail ranged from approximately 19 years to approximately 41 years.  For all other
depreciable assets, we compute depreciation based on the estimated service lives of
our assets as determined from the analysis of our depreciation studies.  Changes in
the estimated service lives of our assets and their related depreciation rates are
implemented prospectively.
Estimated service lives of depreciable railroad property may vary over time due to
changes in physical use, technology, asset strategies, and other factors that will have
an impact on the retirement profiles of our assets.  We are not aware of any specific
factors that are reasonably likely to significantly change the estimated service lives of
our assets.  Actual use and retirement of our assets may vary from our current
estimates, which would impact the amount of depreciation expense recognized in
future periods.
Changes in estimated useful lives of our assets due to the results of our depreciation
studies could significantly impact future periods’ depreciation expense and have a
material impact on our Consolidated Financial Statements.  If the estimated useful
lives of all depreciable assets were increased by one year, annual depreciation
expense would decrease by approximately $70 million.  If the estimated useful lives of
all depreciable assets were decreased by one year, annual depreciation expense
would increase by approximately $75 million.  Our 2018 depreciation studies have
resulted in lower depreciation rates for some asset classes. These lower rates will
partially offset the impact of a projected higher depreciable asset base, resulting in an
increase in total depreciation expense by approximately 3% in 2019 versus 2018.
Under group depreciation, the historical cost (net of salvage) of depreciable property
that is retired or replaced in the ordinary course of business is charged to accumulated
depreciation and no gain or loss is recognized.  The historical cost of certain track
assets is estimated by multiplying the current replacement cost of track assets by a
historical index factor derived from (i) inflation indices published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics and (ii) the estimated useful lives of the assets as determined by our
depreciation studies.  The indices were selected because they closely correlate with
the major costs of the properties comprising the applicable track asset
classes.  Because of the number of estimates inherent in the depreciation and
retirement processes and because it is impossible to precisely estimate each of these
variables until a group of property is completely retired, we continually monitor the
estimated service lives of our assets and the accumulated depreciation associated
with each asset class to ensure our depreciation rates are appropriate.  In addition, we
determine if the recorded amount of accumulated depreciation is deficient (or in
excess) of the amount indicated by our depreciation studies.  Any deficiency (or
excess) is amortized as a component of depreciation expense over the remaining
service lives of the applicable classes of assets.
For retirements of depreciable railroad properties that do not occur in the normal
course of business, a gain or loss may be recognized if the retirement meets each of
the following three conditions: (i) it is unusual, (ii) it is material in amount, and (iii) it
varies significantly from the retirement profile identified through our depreciation
studies.  During the last three fiscal years, no gains or losses were recognized due to
the retirement of depreciable railroad properties.  A gain or loss is recognized in other
income when we sell land or dispose of assets that are not part of our railroad
operations.
 
41
 
Income Taxes – We account for income taxes by recording taxes payable or
refundable for the current year and deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected
future tax consequences of events that have been recognized in our financial
statements or tax returns. These expected future tax consequences are measured
based on current tax law; the effects of future tax legislation are not
anticipated.  Future tax legislation, such as a change in the corporate tax rate, could
have a material impact on our financial condition, results of operations, or liquidity.  For
example, a permanent 1% increase in future income tax rates would increase our
deferred tax liability by approximately $450 million.  Similarly, a permanent 1%
decrease in future income tax rates would decrease our deferred tax liability by
approximately $450 million.
When appropriate, we record a valuation allowance against deferred tax assets to
reflect that these tax assets may not be realized. In determining whether a valuation
allowance is appropriate, we consider whether it is more likely than not that all or some
portion of our deferred tax assets will not be realized, based on management’s
judgments using available evidence for purposes of estimating whether future taxable
income will be sufficient to realize a deferred tax asset. In 2018 and 2017, there were
no valuation allowances.
We recognize tax benefits that are more likely than not to be sustained upon
examination by tax authorities. The amount recognized is measured as the largest
amount of benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely to be realized upon settlement.
A liability for “unrecognized tax benefits” is recorded for any tax benefits claimed in our
tax returns that do not meet these recognition and measurement standards.
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits – We use an actuarial analysis to
measure the liabilities and expenses associated with providing pension and medical
and life insurance benefits (OPEB) to eligible employees. In order to use actuarial
methods to value the liabilities and expenses, we must make several assumptions.
The critical assumptions used to measure pension obligations and expenses are the
discount rates and expected rate of return on pension assets. For OPEB, the critical
assumptions are the discount rates and health care cost trend rate.
We evaluate our critical assumptions at least annually, and selected assumptions are
based on the following factors:
·We measure the service cost and interest cost components of our net periodic
benefit cost by using individual spot rates matched with separate cash flows for
each future year. Discount rates are based on a Mercer yield curve of high quality
corporate bonds (rated AA by a recognized rating agency).
·Expected return on plan assets is based on our asset allocation mix and our
historical return, taking into consideration current and expected market conditions.
·Health care cost trend rate is based on our historical rates of inflation and
expected market conditions.
The following tables present the key assumptions used to measure net periodic
pension and OPEB cost/(benefit) for 2019 and the estimated impact on 2019 net
periodic pension and OPEB cost/(benefit) relative to a change in those assumptions:
Assumptions Pension OPEB
Discount rate for benefit obligations 4.23% 4.17% 
Discount rate for interest on benefit obligations 3.94% 3.84% 
Discount rate for service cost 4.33% 4.32% 
Discount rate for interest on service cost 4.30% 4.27% 
Expected return on plan assets 7.00% N/A
Compensation increase 4.19% N/A
Health care cost trend rate:
     Pre-65 current N/A 6.09% 
     Pre-65 level in 2038 N/A 4.50% 
Sensitivities Increase in Expense
Millions Pension OPEB
0.25% decrease in discount rates $ 13 $  -
0.25% increase in compensation scale $ 10 N/A
0.25% decrease in expected return on plan assets $ 10 N/A
1% increase in health care cost trend rate N/A $ 3 
 
42
 
The following table presents the net periodic pension and OPEB cost for the years
ended December 31:
Est.
Millions 2019 2018 2017 2016 
Net periodic pension cost $ 39 $ 71 $ 115 $ 43 
Net periodic OPEB cost 19 23 22 13 
 
CAUTIONARY INFORMATION
Certain statements in this report, and statements in other reports or information filed or
to be filed with the SEC (as well as information included in oral statements or other
written statements made or to be made by us), are, or will be, forward-looking
statements as defined by the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934. These forward-looking statements and information include, without limitation,
(A) statements in the Chairman’s letter preceding Part I; statements regarding planned
capital expenditures under the caption “2019 Capital Plan” in Item 2 of Part I;
statements regarding dividends in Item 5 of Part II; and statements and information set
forth under the captions “2019 Outlook”; “Liquidity and Capital Resources”; and
“Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits” in this Item 7 of Part II, and (B) any other
statements or information in this report (including information incorporated herein by
reference) regarding: expectations as to financial performance, revenue growth and
cost savings;  the time by which goals, targets, or objectives will be
achieved;  projections, predictions, expectations, estimates, or forecasts as to our
business, financial and operational results, future economic performance, and general
economic conditions;  expectations as to operational or service performance or
improvements;  expectations as to the effectiveness of steps taken or to be taken to
improve operations and/or service, including capital expenditures for infrastructure
improvements and equipment acquisitions, any strategic business acquisitions, and
modifications to our transportation plans, including implementation of
PTC;  expectations as to existing or proposed new products and services;
expectations as to the impact of any new regulatory activities or legislation on our
operations or financial results;  estimates of costs relating to environmental
remediation and restoration; estimates and expectations regarding tax matters;
expectations that claims, litigation, environmental costs, commitments, contingent
liabilities, labor negotiations or agreements, or other matters will not have a material
adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity
and any other similar expressions concerning matters that are not historical
facts.  Forward-looking statements may be identified by their use of forward-looking
terminology, such as “believes,” “expects,” “may,” “should,” “would,” “will,” “intends,”
“plans,” “estimates,” “anticipates,” “projects” and similar words, phrases or
expressions.
Forward-looking statements should not be read as a guarantee of future performance
or results, and will not necessarily be accurate indications of the times that, or by
which, such performance or results will be achieved. Forward-looking statements and
information are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual performance
or results to differ materially from those expressed in the statements and
information.  Forward-looking statements and information reflect the good faith
consideration by management of currently available information, and may be based on
underlying assumptions believed to be reasonable under the circumstances. However,
such information and assumptions (and, therefore, such forward-looking statements
and information) are or may be subject to variables or unknown or unforeseeable
events or circumstances over which management has little or no influence or
control.  The Risk Factors in Item 1A of this report could affect our future results and
could cause those results or other outcomes to differ materially from those expressed
or implied in any forward-looking statements or information. To the extent
circumstances require or we deem it otherwise necessary, we will update or amend
these risk factors in a Form 10-Q, Form 8-K or subsequent Form 10-K.  All forward-
looking statements are qualified by, and should be read in conjunction with, these Risk
Factors.
Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date the statement was made. We
assume no obligation to update forward-looking information to reflect actual results,
changes in assumptions or changes in other factors affecting forward-looking
information. If we do update one or more forward-looking statements, no inference
should be drawn that we will make additional updates with respect thereto or with
respect to other forward-looking statements.
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
Information concerning market risk sensitive instruments is set forth under
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations – Other Matters, Item 7.
****************************************
 
43
 
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Index to Consolidated Financial Statements Page
 
 Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 45 
 
 Consolidated Statements of Income
 For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 46 
 
 Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
 For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 46 
 
 Consolidated Statements of Financial Position
 At December 31, 2018 and 2017 47 
 
 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
 For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 48 
 
 Consolidated Statements of Changes in Common Shareholders’ Equity
 For the Years Ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 49 
 
 Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 50 
 
 
44
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Union Pacific Corporation
Omaha, Nebraska
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated statements of financial position of
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies (the "Corporation") as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of income,
comprehensive income, changes in common shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for
each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes
and the schedule listed in the Table of Contents at Part IV, Item 15 (collectively
referred to as the “financial statements”). In our opinion, the financial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Corporation as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for
each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the Corporation's internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established
in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated February
8, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion on the Corporation's internal control over
financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Corporation's management.
Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Corporation's financial statements
based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and
are required to be independent with respect to the Corporation in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities
and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those
standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance
about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due
to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles
used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Omaha, Nebraska
February 8, 2019
We have served as the Corporation’s auditor since 1967.
 
45
 
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
Millions, Except Per Share Amounts,  
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 
Operating revenues:
     Freight revenues $21,384 $19,837 $18,601 
     Other revenues 1,448 1,403 1,340 
Total operating revenues 22,832 21,240 19,941 
Operating expenses:
     Compensation and benefits 5,056 4,939 4,779 
     Fuel 2,531 1,891 1,489 
     Purchased services and materials 2,443 2,363 2,258 
     Depreciation 2,191 2,105 2,038 
     Equipment and other rents 1,072 888 1,137 
     Other 1,022 948 997 
Total operating expenses 14,315 13,134 12,698 
Operating income 8,517 8,106 7,243 
Other income (Note 7) 94 245 221 
Interest expense (870) (719) (698)
Income before income taxes 7,741 7,632 6,766 
Income tax benefit/(expense) (Note 8) (1,775) 3,080 (2,533)
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Share and Per Share (Note 9):
     Earnings per share - basic $ 7.95 $13.42 $ 5.09 
     Earnings per share - diluted $ 7.91 $13.36 $ 5.07 
     W eighted average number of shares - basic 750.9 798.4 832.4 
     W eighted average number of shares - diluted 754.3 801.7 835.4 
Dividends declared per share $ 3.06 $ 2.48 $2.255 
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
Millions,     
for the Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Other comprehensive income/(loss):
     Defined benefit plans 62 103 (29)
     Foreign currency translation (36) 28 (48)
Total other comprehensive income/(loss) [a] 26 131 (77)
Comprehensive income $5,992 $10,843 $4,156 
[a]Net of deferred taxes of $(22) million, $(61) million, $49 million, and during 2018, 2017, and 2016,
respectively.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
46
 
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF FINANCIAL POSITION
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
Millions, Except Share and Per Share Amounts
as of December 31, 2018 2017 
Assets
Current assets:
     Cash and cash equivalents $1,273 $1,275 
     Short-term investments (Note 14) 60 90 
     Accounts receivable, net (Note 11) 1,755 1,493 
     Materials and supplies 742 749 
     Other current assets 333 399 
Total current assets 4,163 4,006 
Investments 1,912 1,809 
Net properties (Note 12) 52,679 51,605 
Other assets 393 386 
Total assets $59,147 $57,806 
Liabilities and Common Shareholders' Equity
Current liabilities:
     Accounts payable and other current liabilities (Note 13) $3,160 $3,139 
     Debt due within one year (Note 15) 1,466 800 
Total current liabilities 4,626 3,939 
Debt due after one year (Note 15) 20,925 16,144 
Deferred income taxes (Note 8) 11,302 10,936 
Other long-term liabilities 1,871 1,931 
Commitments and contingencies (Notes 17 and 18)
Total liabilities 38,724 32,950 
Common shareholders' equity:
     Common shares, $2.50  par value, 1,400,000,000  authorized;
     1,111,739,781  and 1,111,371,304  issued; 725,056,690  and
780,917,756
     outstanding, respectively 2,779 2,778 
     Paid-in-surplus 4,449 4,476 
     Retained earnings 45,284 41,317 
     Treasury stock (30,674) (22,574)
     Accumulated other comprehensive loss (Note 10) (1,415) (1,141)
Total common shareholders' equity 20,423 24,856 
Total liabilities and common shareholders' equity $59,147 $57,806 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
47
 
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
Millions, for the Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 
Operating Activities
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to cash provided  
by operating activities:
  Depreciation 2,191 2,105 2,038 
  Deferred and other income taxes 338 (5,067) 831 
  Net gain on non-operating asset dispositions (30) (111) (94)
  Other operating activities, net 347 (282) (228)
  Changes in current assets and liabilities:
     Accounts receivable, net (262) (235) 98 
     Materials and supplies 7 (32) 19 
     Other current assets (24) 9 22 
     Accounts payable and other current liabilities (125) 182 232 
     Income and other taxes 278 (51) 374 
Cash provided by operating activities 8,686 7,230 7,525 
Investing Activities
Capital investments (3,437) (3,238) (3,505)
Purchases of short-term investments (Note 14) (90) (120) (580)
Maturities of short-term investments (Note 14) 90 90 520 
Proceeds from asset sales 63 168 129 
Other investing activities, net (37) 14 43 
Cash used in investing activities (3,411) (3,086) (3,393)
Financing Activities
Share repurchase programs (Note 19) (8,225) (4,013) (3,105)
Debt issued (Note 15) 6,892 2,735 1,983 
Dividends paid (2,299) (1,982) (1,879)
Debt repaid (1,736) (840) (1,013)
Net issuance of commercial paper 194  -  -
Debt exchange  -  - (191)
Other financing activities, net (48) (46) (41)
Cash used in financing activities (5,222) (4,146) (4,246)
Net change in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 53 (2) (114)
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash at beginning of
year1,275 1,277 1,391 
Cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash at end of year $1,328 $1,275 $1,277 
Supplemental Cash Flow Information
  Non-cash investing and financing activities:
     Term loan renewals $ 250 $  -$  -
     Capital investments accrued but not yet paid 205 366 223 
     Capital lease financings 12 19  -
  Cash paid during the year for:
     Income taxes, net of refunds $(1,205) $(2,112) $(1,347)
     Interest, net of amounts capitalized (728) (666) (652)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
48
 
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN COMMON SHAREHOLDERS'
EQUITY
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
MillionsCommon
SharesTreasury
SharesCommon
SharesPaid-in-
SurplusRetained
EarningsTreasury
StockAOCI
[a] Total
Balance at
January 1,
20161,110.4 (261.2) $   2,776 $   4,417 $   30,233 $   (15,529) $   (1,195) $    20,702 
Net income  -  - 4,233 - - 4,233 
Other
comprehensive
loss -  -  - - (77) (77)
Conversion,
stock option
   exercises,
forfeitures, and
other0.6 1.1 1 4  - 53 - 58 
Share
repurchase
programs
   (Note 19) -(35.1)  -  -  - (3,105) - (3,105)
Cash dividends
declared
   ($2.255 per
share) -  -  -  - (1,879) - - (1,879)
Balance at
December 31,
20161,111.0 (295.2) $   2,777 $   4,421 $   32,587 $   (18,581) $   (1,272) $    19,932 
Net income  -  -10,712 - -10,712 
Other
comprehensive
income -  -  - - 131 131 
Conversion,
stock option
   exercises,
forfeitures, and
other0.4 1.1 1 55  - 20 - 76 
Share
repurchase
programs
   (Note 19) -(36.4)  -  -  - (4,013) - (4,013)
Cash dividends
declared
   ($2.48 per
share) -  -  -  - (1,982) - - (1,982)
Balance at
December 31,
20171,111.4 (330.5) $   2,778 $   4,476 $   41,317 $   (22,574) $   (1,141) $    24,856 
Net income  -  - 5,966 - - 5,966 
Other
comprehensive
income -  -  - - 26 26 
Conversion,
stock option
   exercises,
forfeitures, and
other0.3 1.1 1 65  - 33 - 99 
Share
repurchase
programs
   (Note 19) -(57.2)  - (92)  - (8,133) - (8,225)
Cash dividends
declared
   ($3.06 per
share) -  -  -  - (2,299) - - (2,299)
Reclassification
due to ASU
   2018-02
adoption (Note
3) -  - 300 - (300)  -
Balance at
December 31,
20181,111.7 (386.6) $   2,779 $   4,449 $   45,284 $   (30,674) $   (1,415) $    20,423 
[a]AOCI = Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income/(Loss) (Note 10)
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
49
 
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
For purposes of this report, unless the context otherwise requires, all references herein
to the “Corporation”, “Company”, “UPC”, “we”, “us”, and “our” mean Union Pacific
Corporation and its subsidiaries, including Union Pacific Railroad Company, which will
be separately referred to herein as “UPRR” or the “Railroad”.
 
1. Nature of Operations
Operations and Segmentation – We are a Class I railroad operating in the U.S. Our
network includes 32,236 route miles, linking Pacific Coast and Gulf Coast ports with
the Midwest and Eastern U.S. gateways and providing several corridors to key
Mexican gateways. We own 26,039 miles and operate on the remainder pursuant to
trackage rights or leases. We serve the western two-thirds of the country and maintain
coordinated schedules with other rail carriers for the handling of freight to and from the
Atlantic Coast, the Pacific Coast, the Southeast, the Southwest, Canada, and Mexico.
Export and import traffic is moved through Gulf Coast and Pacific Coast ports and
across the Mexican and Canadian borders.
The Railroad, along with its subsidiaries and rail affiliates, is our one reportable
operating segment. Although we provide and analyze revenue by commodity group,
we treat the financial results of the Railroad as one segment due to the integrated
nature of our rail network. Our operating revenues are primarily derived from contracts
with customers for the transportation of freight from origin to destination.  Effective
January 1, 2018, the Company reclassified its six commodity groups into four:
Agricultural Products, Energy, Industrial, and Premium.  The following table represents
a disaggregation of our freight and other revenues:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Agricultural Products $4,469 $4,303 $4,209 
Energy 4,608 4,498 3,715 
Industrial 5,679 5,204 4,964 
Premium 6,628 5,832 5,713 
Total freight revenues $21,384 $19,837 $18,601 
Other subsidiary revenues 881 885 814 
Accessorial revenues 502 458 455 
Other 65 60 71 
Total operating revenues $22,832 $21,240 $19,941 
Although our revenues are principally derived from customers domiciled in the U.S.,
the ultimate points of origination or destination for some products we transport are
outside the U.S. Each of our commodity groups includes revenue from shipments to
and from Mexico. Included in the above table are freight revenues from our Mexico
business which amounted to $2.5 billion in 2018, $2.3 billion in 2017, and $2.2 billion
in 2016.
Basis of Presentation – The Consolidated Financial Statements are presented in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the U.S. (GAAP) as
codified in the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) Accounting Standards
Codification (ASC).
 
2. Significant Accounting Policies
Principles of Consolidation – The Consolidated Financial Statements include the
accounts of Union Pacific Corporation and all of its subsidiaries. Investments in
affiliated companies (20% to 50% owned) are accounted for using the equity method
of accounting. All intercompany transactions are eliminated. We currently have no less
than majority-owned investments that require consolidation under variable interest
entity requirements.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash – Cash equivalents consist of
investments with original maturities of three months or less.  Amounts included in
restricted cash represent those required to be set aside by contractual agreement.
 
50
 
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted
cash reported within the Consolidated Statements of Financial Position that sum to the
total of the same such amounts shown on the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,273 $ 1,275 $ 1,277 
Restricted cash equivalents in other current
assets42  -  -
Restricted cash equivalents in other assets 13  -  -
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted
cash
equivalents shown on the Statement of Cash
Flows:$ 1,328 $ 1,275 $ 1,277 
Accounts Receivable – Accounts receivable includes receivables reduced by an
allowance for doubtful accounts. The allowance is based upon historical losses, credit
worthiness of customers, and current economic conditions.  Receivables not expected
to be collected in one year and the associated allowances are classified as other
assets in our Consolidated Statements of Financial Position.
Investments – Investments represent our investments in affiliated companies (20% to
50% owned) that are accounted for under the equity method of accounting and
investments in companies (less than 20% owned) accounted for under the cost
method of accounting.  The results of operations for our equity method investments
that are integral to our operations are recorded in operating expenses.
Materials and Supplies – Materials and supplies are carried at the lower of average
cost or net realizable value.
Property and Depreciation – Properties and equipment are carried at cost and are
depreciated on a straight-line basis over their estimated service lives, which are
measured in years, except for rail in high-density traffic corridors (i.e., all rail lines
except for those subject to abandonment, and yard and switching tracks), for which
lives are measured in millions of gross tons per mile of track.  We use the group
method of depreciation in which all items with similar characteristics, use, and
expected lives are grouped together in asset classes, and are depreciated using
composite depreciation rates.  The group method of depreciation treats each asset
class as a pool of resources, not as singular items.  We determine the estimated
service lives of depreciable railroad assets by means of depreciation studies.  Under
the group method of depreciation, no gain or loss is recognized when depreciable
property is retired or replaced in the ordinary course of business.
Impairment of Long-lived Assets – We review long-lived assets, including
identifiable intangibles, for impairment when events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable. If impairment
indicators are present and the estimated future undiscounted cash flows are less than
the carrying value of the long-lived assets, the carrying value is reduced to the
estimated fair value as measured by the discounted cash flows.
Revenue Recognition – Freight revenues are derived from contracts with customers.
We account for a contract when it has approval and commitment from both parties, the
rights of the parties are identified, payment terms are identified, the contract has
commercial substance, and collectability of consideration is probable. Our contracts
include private agreements, private rate/letter quotes, public circulars/tariffs, and
interline/foreign agreements. The performance obligation in our contracts is typically
delivering a specific commodity from a place of origin to a place of destination and our
commitment begins with the tendering and acceptance of a freight bill of lading and is
satisfied upon delivery at destination. We consider each freight shipment to be a
distinct performance obligation.
We recognize freight revenues over time as freight moves from origin to destination.
The allocation of revenue between reporting periods is based on the relative transit
time in each reporting period with expenses recognized as incurred. Outstanding
performance obligations related to freight moves in transit totaled $123 million at
December 31, 2018 and $154 million at December 31, 2017 and are expected to be
recognized in the next quarter as we satisfy our remaining performance obligations
and deliver freight to destination. The transaction price is generally specified in a
contract and may be dependent on the commodity, origin/destination, and route.
Customer incentives, which are primarily provided for shipping a specified cumulative
volume or shipping to/from specific locations, are recorded as a reduction to operating
revenues based on actual or projected future customer shipments.
 
51
 
Under typical payment terms, our customers pay us after each performance obligation
is satisfied and there are no material contract assets or liabilities associated with our
freight revenues. Outstanding freight receivables are presented in our Consolidated
Statement of Financial Position as Accounts Receivables, net.
Freight revenue related to interline transportation services that involve other railroads
are reported on a net basis. The portion of the gross amount billed to customers that is
remitted by the Company to another party is not reflected as freight revenue.
Other revenues consist primarily of revenues earned by our other subsidiaries
(primarily logistics and commuter rail operations) and accessorial revenues. Other
subsidiary revenues are generally recognized over time as shipments move from origin
to destination. The allocation of revenue between reporting periods is based on the
relative transit time in each reporting period with expenses recognized as incurred.
Accessorial revenues are recognized at a point in time as performance obligations are
satisfied.
Translation of Foreign Currency – Our portion of the assets and liabilities related to
foreign investments are translated into U.S. dollars at the exchange rates in effect at
the balance sheet date. Revenue and expenses are translated at the average rates of
exchange prevailing during the year. Unrealized gains or losses are reflected within
common shareholders’ equity as accumulated other comprehensive income or loss.
Fair Value Measurements – We use a fair value hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs to
valuation techniques used to measure fair value into three broad levels.  The level in
the fair value hierarchy within which the fair value measurement in its entirety falls is
determined based on the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value
measurement in its entirety.  These levels include:
Level 1:  Quoted market prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
Level 2:  Observable market-based inputs or unobservable inputs that are
corroborated by market data.
Level 3:  Unobservable inputs that are not corroborated by market data.
We have applied fair value measurements to our short term investments, pension plan
assets and short- and long-term debt.
Stock-Based Compensation – We have several stock-based compensation plans
under which employees and non-employee directors receive stock options, nonvested
retention shares, and nonvested stock units. We refer to the nonvested shares and
stock units collectively as “retention awards”. We have elected to issue treasury shares
to cover option exercises and stock unit vestings, while new shares are issued when
retention shares are granted.
We measure and recognize compensation expense for all stock-based awards made
to employees and directors, including stock options. Compensation expense is based
on the calculated fair value of the awards as measured at the grant date and is
expensed ratably over the service period of the awards (generally the vesting period).
The fair value of retention awards is the closing stock price on the date of grant, while
the fair value of stock options is determined by using the Black-Scholes option pricing
model.
Earnings Per Share – Basic earnings per share are calculated on the weighted-
average number of common shares outstanding during each period. Diluted earnings
per share include shares issuable upon exercise of outstanding stock options and
stock-based awards where the conversion of such instruments would be dilutive.
Income Taxes – We account for income taxes by recording taxes payable or
refundable for the current year and deferred tax assets and liabilities for the expected
future tax consequences of events that have been recognized in our financial
statements or tax returns. These expected future tax consequences are measured
based on current tax law; the effects of future tax legislation are not
anticipated.  Future tax legislation, such as a change in the corporate tax rate, could
have a material impact on our financial condition, results of operations, or liquidity.
When appropriate, we record a valuation allowance against deferred tax assets to
reflect that these tax assets may not be realized. In determining whether a valuation
allowance is appropriate, we consider whether it is more likely than not that all or some
portion of our deferred tax assets will not be realized, based on management’s
judgments using available evidence for purposes of estimating whether future taxable
income will be sufficient to realize a deferred tax asset.
 
52
 
We recognize tax benefits that are more likely than not to be sustained upon
examination by tax authorities. The amount recognized is measured as the largest
amount of benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely to be realized upon settlement.
A liability for “unrecognized tax benefits” is recorded for any tax benefits claimed in our
tax returns that do not meet these recognition and measurement standards.
Pension and Postretirement Benefits – We incur certain employment-related
expenses associated with pensions and postretirement health benefits. In order to
measure the expense associated with these benefits, we must make various
assumptions including discount rates used to value certain liabilities, expected return
on plan assets used to fund these expenses, compensation increases, employee
turnover rates, anticipated mortality rates, and expected future health care costs. The
assumptions used by us are based on our historical experience as well as current facts
and circumstances. We use an actuarial analysis to measure the expense and liability
associated with these benefits.
Personal Injury – The cost of injuries to employees and others on our property is
charged to expense based on estimates of the ultimate cost and number of incidents
each year. We use an actuarial analysis to measure the expense and liability. Our
personal injury liability is not discounted to present value. Legal fees and incidental
costs are expensed as incurred.
Environmental – When environmental issues have been identified with respect to
property currently or formerly owned, leased, or otherwise used in the conduct of our
business, we perform, with the assistance of our consultants, environmental
assessments on such property. We expense the cost of the assessments as incurred.
We accrue the cost of remediation where our obligation is probable and such costs
can be reasonably estimated. We do not discount our environmental liabilities when
the timing of the anticipated cash payments is not fixed or readily determinable. Legal
fees and incidental costs are expensed as incurred.
Use of Estimates – The preparation of our Consolidated Financial Statements in
conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and assumptions that
affect certain reported assets and liabilities, and the disclosure of certain contingent
assets and liabilities as of the date of the consolidated financial statements, as well as
the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting period. Actual
future results may differ from such estimates.
 
3. Accounting Pronouncements
In May 2014, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2014-09 (ASU 2014-
09), Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606).  ASU 2014-09 supersedes
the revenue recognition guidance in Topic 605, Revenue Recognition.  The core
principle of the guidance is that an entity should recognize revenue to depict the
transfer of promised goods and services to customers in an amount that reflects the
consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled in the exchange for those
goods or services. This may require the use of more judgment and estimates in order
to correctly recognize the revenue expected as an outcome of each specific
performance obligation. Additionally, this guidance requires the disclosure of the
nature, amount, and timing of revenue arising from contracts so as to aid in the
understanding of the users of financial statements.
Effective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted ASU 2014-09 using the modified
retrospective transition method. The Company analyzed its freight and other revenues
and recognizes freight revenues as freight moves from origin to destination and
recognizes other revenues as identified performance obligations are satisfied. We also
analyzed freight and other revenues in the context of the new guidance on principal
versus agent considerations and evaluated the required new disclosures. The ASU did
not have an impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations, or
cash flows.
In January 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-01 (ASU
2016-01), Recognition and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities
(Subtopic 825-10). ASU 2016-01 provides guidance for the recognition, measurement,
presentation, and disclosure of financial instruments. Effective January 1, 2018, the
Company adopted the ASU and it did not have an impact on our consolidated financial
position, results of operations, or cash flows.
In March 2017, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2017-07 (ASU
2017-07), Improving the Presentation of Net Periodic Pension Cost and Net Periodic
Postretirement Benefit Cost (Topic 715). ASU 2017-07 requires the service cost
component be reported separately from the other components of net benefit costs in
the income statement, provides explicit guidance on the presentation of the service
cost component and the other components of net benefit cost in the income statement,
and allows only the
 
53
 
service cost component of net benefit cost to be eligible for capitalization. Effective
January 1, 2018, we adopted the standard on a retrospective basis. As a result of the
adoption, only service costs are recorded within compensation and benefits expense,
and the other components of net benefit costs are now recorded within other income.
The impact of ASU 2017-07 adoption is shown in the following table:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Increase/(decrease) in operating income $ (13) $ 45 $ (29)
Increase/(decrease) in other income 13 (45) 29 
On February 14, 2018, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update 2018-02, (ASU
2018-02), Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income, which allows entities the option to reclassify from
accumulated other comprehensive income (AOCI) to retained earnings the income tax
effects that remain stranded in AOCI resulting from the application of the Tax Act. ASU
2018-02 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2018. Early adoption
of the ASU is permitted. We adopted ASU 2018-02 during the first quarter of 2018. As
a result of this adoption, we elected to reclassify $300 million from AOCI to retained
earnings. We adopted the policy that future income tax effects that are stranded in
AOCI will be released only when the entire portfolio of the type of item is liquidated.
In February 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-02 (ASU
2016-02), Leases (Subtopic 842). ASU 2016-02 will require companies to recognize
lease assets and lease liabilities on the balance sheet and disclose key information
about leasing arrangements. For public companies, this standard is effective for
annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2018, and early adoption is
permitted. We have implemented an enterprise-wide lease management system to
support the new reporting requirements, and effective January 1, 2019, the Company
adopted ASU 2016-02. We elected an initial application date of January 1, 2019 and
will not recast comparative periods in transition to the new standard.  In addition, we
elected certain practical expedients which permit us not to reassess whether existing
contracts are or contain leases, to not reassess the lease classification of any existing
leases, to not reassess initial direct costs for any existing leases, and to not separate
lease components for all classes of underlying assets.  We also made an accounting
policy election to keep leases with an initial term of 12 months or less off of the
balance sheet for all classes of underlying assets. Adoption of the new standard
resulted in an increase in the Company’s assets and liabilities of approximately $2
billion.    The ASU did not have an impact on our consolidated results of operations or
cash flows. 
4. Workforce Reduction Plans
On October 23, 2018, we announced the elimination of one operating region and five
service units as part of a broader effort to more closely align operating resources with
the Company’s long term strategic initiatives. This resulted in the reduction of
approximately 330 management employees in the fourth quarter of 2018.  In addition,
approximately 140 agreement positions were reduced as part of ongoing initiatives. 
On August 16, 2017, the Company approved and commenced a management and
administrative personnel reorganization plan (the “Plan”) furthering its on-going efforts
to increase efficiency and more effectively align Company resources. The Plan
implemented productivity initiatives identified during a Company-wide organizational
review that included the reduction of approximately 460 management positions and
250 agreement positions during the third and fourth quarters of 2017.
These workforce reductions resulted in pretax charges recognized within
compensation and benefits expense and other income in our Consolidated Statements
of Income. The charges consisted of management employee termination benefits,
including pension expenses, severance costs, and acceleration of equity
compensation expense as shown in the following table:
 
54
 
Millions
for the Years Ended December 31,2018 2017 
Compensation and benefits expense
        Severance $ 23 $ 12 
        Equity compensation 2 5 
Other income
        Pension  - 69 
Total expense $ 25 $ 86 
 
The 2017 workforce reduction plan included an enhanced pension benefit which
resulted in a curtailment loss of $20 million and a special termination benefit of $49
million as a result of a remeasurement as of September 30, 2017. In accordance with
ASU 2017-07, both of these charges were recorded within other income.
The actions associated with the above workforce reductions are substantially
complete, however we expect future workforce reductions may result in additional
charges (that we cannot currently, reasonably estimate) as management continues to
analyze the Company’s cost structure and evaluate other restructuring and cost
reduction opportunities that will further align with the Company’s long-term strategic
priorities.
5. Stock Options and Other Stock Plans
In April 2000, the shareholders approved the Union Pacific Corporation 2000 Directors
Plan (Directors Plan) whereby 2,200,000 shares of our common stock were reserved
for issuance to our non-employee directors. Under the Directors Plan, each non-
employee director, upon his or her initial election to the Board of Directors, received a
grant of 4,000 retention shares or retention stock units. In July 2018, the Board of
Directors eliminated the retention grant for directors newly elected in 2018 and all
future years. As of December 31, 2018,  36,000 restricted shares were outstanding
under the Directors Plan.
The Union Pacific Corporation 2004 Stock Incentive Plan (2004 Plan) was approved
by shareholders in April 2004. The 2004 Plan reserved 84,000,000 shares of our
common stock for issuance, plus any shares subject to awards made under previous
plans that were outstanding on April 16, 2004, and became available for regrant
pursuant to the terms of the 2004 Plan. Under the 2004 Plan, non-qualified options,
stock appreciation rights, retention shares, stock units, and incentive bonus awards
may be granted to eligible employees of the Corporation and its subsidiaries. Non-
employee directors are not eligible for awards under the 2004 Plan. As of December
31, 2018,  1,088,670 options and 0 retention shares and stock units were outstanding
under the 2004 Plan.  We no longer grant any stock options or other stock or unit
awards under this plan.
The Union Pacific Corporation 2013 Stock Incentive Plan (2013 Plan) was approved
by shareholders in May 2013. The 2013 Plan reserved 78,000,000 shares of our
common stock for issuance, plus any shares subject to awards made under previous
plans as of February 28, 2013, that are subsequently cancelled, expired, forfeited or
otherwise not issued under previous plans.  Under the 2013 Plan, non-qualified
options, incentive stock options, retention shares, stock units, and incentive bonus
awards may be granted to eligible employees of the Corporation and its subsidiaries.
Non-employee directors are not eligible for awards under the 2013 Plan. As of
December 31, 2018,  4,081,360 options and 3,163,005 retention shares and stock
units were outstanding under the 2013 Plan. 
Pursuant to the above plans 70,730,692;  72,151,415;  and 73,745,250; shares of our
common stock were authorized and available for grant at December 31, 2018, 2017,
and 2016, respectively.
Stock-Based Compensation – We have several stock-based compensation plans
under which employees and non-employee directors receive stock options, nonvested
retention shares, and nonvested stock units. We refer to the nonvested shares and
stock units collectively as “retention awards”. We have elected to issue treasury shares
to cover option exercises and stock unit vestings, while new shares are issued when
retention shares are granted.
 
55
 
Information regarding stock-based compensation appears in the table below:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Stock-based compensation, before tax:
     Stock options $ 17 $ 19 $ 16 
     Retention awards 79 84 66 
Total stock-based compensation, before tax $ 96 $ 103 $ 82 
Excess tax benefits from equity compensation plans $ 28 $ 44 $ 28 
Stock Options – We estimate the fair value of our stock option awards using the
Black-Scholes option pricing model. The table below shows the annual weighted-
average assumptions used for valuation purposes:
Weighted-A verage Assumptions 2018 2017 2016 
Risk-free interest rate 2.6% 2.0% 1.3% 
Dividend yield 2.3% 2.3% 2.9% 
Expected life (years) 5.3 5.3 5.1 
Volatility 21.1% 21.7% 23.2% 
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of options granted $21.70 $18.19 $11.36 
The risk-free rate is based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect at the time of
grant; the expected dividend yield is calculated as the ratio of dividends paid per share
of common stock to the stock price on the date of grant; the expected life is based on
historical and expected exercise behavior; and expected volatility is based on the
historical volatility of our stock price over the expected life of the option.
A summary of stock option activity during 2018 is presented below:
Options
(thous.)Weighted-
Average
Exercise
PriceWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual T ermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2018 5,630 $83.37 5.8 yrs. $ 286 
Granted 800 124.86 N/A N/A
Exercised (1,128) 70.88 N/A N/A
Forfeited or expired (132) 101.01 N/A N/A
Outstanding at December 31, 2018 5,170 $92.06 5.4 yrs. $ 239 
Vested or expected to vest
     at December 31, 20185,118 $91.89 5.4 yrs. $ 237 
Options exercisable at December 31,
20183,429 $84.27 4.1 yrs. $ 185 
Stock options are granted at the closing price on the date of grant, have ten-year
contractual terms, and vest no later than three years from the date of grant. None of
the stock options outstanding at December 31, 2018, are subject to performance or
market-based vesting conditions.
At December 31, 2018, there was $17 million of unrecognized compensation expense
related to nonvested stock options, which is expected to be recognized over a
weighted-average period of 0.9 years. Additional information regarding stock option
exercises appears in the following table:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Intrinsic value of stock options exercised $ 83 $ 88 $ 52 
Cash received from option exercises 76 59 39 
Treasury shares repurchased for employee payroll taxes (20) (18) (15)
Tax benefit realized from option exercises 21 34 20 
Aggregate grant-date fair value of stock options vested 19 20 19 
 
56
 
Retention Awards – The fair value of retention awards is based on the closing price of
the stock on the grant date. Dividends and dividend equivalents are paid to
participants during the vesting periods.
Changes in our retention awards during 2018 were as follows:
Shares
(thous.)Weighted-A verage
Grant-Date Fair
Value
Nonvested at January 1, 2018 2,313 $95.04 
Granted 542 125.51 
Vested (664) 88.79 
Forfeited (121) 103.07 
Nonvested at December 31, 2018 2,070 $104.55 
Retention awards are granted at no cost to the employee or non-employee director
and vest over periods lasting up to four years. At December 31, 2018, there was $91
million of total unrecognized compensation expense related to nonvested retention
awards, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.6
years.
Performance Retention Awards – In February 2018, our Board of Directors approved
performance stock unit grants. The basic terms of these performance stock units are
identical to those granted in February 2017, except for different annual return on
invested capital (ROIC) performance targets.  The plan also includes relative operating
income growth (OIG) as a modifier compared to the companies included in the S&P
500 Industrials Index. We define ROIC as net operating profit adjusted for interest
expense (including interest on the present value of operating leases) and taxes on
interest divided by average invested capital adjusted for the present value of operating
leases. The modifier can be up to +/- 25% of the award earned based on the ROIC
achieved, but not to exceed the maximum number of shares granted.
Stock units awarded to selected employees under these grants are subject to
continued employment for 37 months and the attainment of certain levels of ROIC,
modified for the relative OIG. We expense the fair value of the units that are probable
of being earned based on our forecasted ROIC over the 3-year performance period,
and with respect to the third year of the plan, the relative OIG modifier. We measure
the fair value of these performance stock units based upon the closing price of the
underlying common stock as of the date of grant, reduced by the present value of
estimated future dividends. Dividend equivalents are paid to participants only after the
units are earned.
The assumptions used to calculate the present value of estimated future dividends
related to the February 2018 grant were as follows:
2018 
Dividend per share per quarter $ 0.73 
Risk-free interest rate at date of grant 2.3% 
Changes in our performance retention awards during 2018 were as follows:
Shares
(thous.)Weighted-A verage
Grant-Date Fair
Value
Nonvested at January 1, 2018 1,138 $92.92 
Granted 348 117.80 
Vested (95) 111.96 
Unearned (201) 114.97 
Forfeited (98) 93.06 
Nonvested at December 31, 2018 1,092 $95.12 
At December 31, 2018, there was $42 million of total unrecognized compensation
expense related to nonvested performance retention awards, which is expected to be
recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.2 years. This expense is subject to
achievement of the performance measures established for the performance stock unit
grants.
 
 
57
 
6. Retirement Plans
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
Pension Plans – We provide defined benefit retirement income to eligible non-union
employees through qualified and non-qualified (supplemental) pension plans. Qualified
and non-qualified pension benefits are based on years of service and the highest
compensation during the latest years of employment, with specific reductions made for
early retirements.  Non-union employees hired on or after January 1, 2018 are no
longer eligible for pension benefits, but are eligible for an enhanced 401(k) plan as
described below in other retirement programs. 
Other Postretirement Benefits (OPEB) – We provide medical and life insurance
benefits for eligible retirees hired before January 1, 2004. These benefits are funded
as medical claims and life insurance premiums are paid.
Funded Status
We are required by GAAP to separately recognize the overfunded or underfunded
status of our pension and OPEB plans as an asset or liability. The funded status
represents the difference between the projected benefit obligation (PBO) and the fair
value of the plan assets. Our non-qualified (supplemental) pension plan is unfunded by
design. The PBO of the pension plans is the present value of benefits earned to date
by plan participants, including the effect of assumed future compensation increases.
The PBO of the OPEB plan is equal to the accumulated benefit obligation, as the
present value of the OPEB liabilities is not affected by compensation increases. Plan
assets are measured at fair value. We use a December 31 measurement date for plan
assets and obligations for all our retirement plans.
Changes in our PBO and plan assets were as follows for the years ended December
31:
Funded Status Pension OPEB
Millions 2018 2017 2018 2017 
Projected Benefit Obligation
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of
year$4,529 $4,110 $ 330 $ 334 
Service cost 105 90 2 2 
Interest cost 145 142 10 10 
Plan curtailment cost  - 20  - (1)
Special termination cost  - 49  -  -
Actuarial (gain)/loss (371) 382 (20) 7 
Gross benefits paid (227) (264) (24) (22)
Projected benefit obligation at end of year $4,181 $4,529 $ 298 $ 330 
Plan Assets
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $4,224 $3,748 $  -$  -
Actual (loss)/return on plan assets (139) 716  -  -
Voluntary funded pension plan contributions  -  -  -  -
Non-qualified plan benefit contributions 29 24 24 22 
Gross benefits paid (227) (264) (24) (22)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $3,887 $4,224 $  -$  -
Funded status at end of year $ (294) $ (305) $ (298) $ (330)
Amounts recognized in the statement of financial position as of December 31, 2018,
and 2017 consist of:
Pension OPEB
Millions 2018 2017 2018 2017 
Noncurrent assets $ 172 $ 196 $  -$  -
Current liabilities (28) (27) (22) (23)
Noncurrent liabilities (438) (474) (276) (307)
Net amounts recognized at end of year $ (294) $ (305) $ (298) $ (330)
 
58
 
Pre-tax amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss) as of
December 31, 2018, and 2017 consist of:
2018 2017
Millions Pension OPEB Total Pension OPEB Total
Prior service cost $  -$  -$  -$  -$ (1)$ (1)
Net actuarial loss (1,480) (90) (1,570) (1,533) (120) (1,653)
Total $(1,480) $ (90) $(1,570) $(1,533) $(121) $(1,654)
Pre-tax changes recognized in other comprehensive income/(loss) during 2018, 2017,
and 2016 were as follows:
Pension OPEB
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017 2016 
Net actuarial (loss)/gain $ (40) $ 67 $(112) $ 20 $ (6)$ (16)
Amortization of:
     Prior service cost/(credit)  -  -  - 1 1 (9)
     Actuarial loss 93 81 83 10 9 10 
Total $ 53 $ 148 $ (29) $ 31 $ 4 $ (15)
Amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss) expected to be
amortized into net periodic cost during 2019:
Millions Pension OPEB Total
Prior service credit $  -$  -$  -
Net actuarial loss (63) (7) (70)
Total $ (63) $ (7)$ (70)
Underfunded Accumulated Benefit Obligation – The accumulated benefit obligation
(ABO) is the present value of benefits earned to date, assuming no future
compensation growth. The underfunded accumulated benefit obligation represents the
difference between the ABO and the fair value of plan assets. At December 31, 2018,
and 2017, the non-qualified (supplemental) plan ABO was $446 million and $481
million, respectively.
The following table discloses only the PBO, ABO, and fair value of plan assets for
pension plans where the accumulated benefit obligation is in excess of the fair value of
the plan assets as of December 31:
Underfunded Accumulated Benefit Obligation
Millions 2018 2017 
Projected benefit obligation $ 465 $ 501 
Accumulated benefit obligation $ 446 $ 481 
Fair value of plan assets  -  -
Underfunded accumulated benefit obligation $ (446) $ (481)
The ABO for all defined benefit pension plans was $3.9 billion and $4.2 billion at
December 31, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
 
59
 
Assumptions – The weighted-average actuarial assumptions used to determine benefit
obligations at December 31:
Pension OPEB
Percentages 2018 2017 2018 2017 
Discount rate 4.23% 3.62% 4.17% 3.53% 
Compensation increase 4.19% 4.20% N/A N/A
Health care cost trend rate (employees under
65)N/A N/A 5.87% 6.09% 
Ultimate health care cost trend rate N/A N/A 4.50% 4.50% 
Year ultimate trend rate reached N/A N/A 2038 2038 
Expense
Both pension and OPEB expense are determined based upon the annual service cost
of benefits (the actuarial cost of benefits earned during a period) and the interest cost
on those liabilities, less the expected return on plan assets. The expected long-term
rate of return on plan assets is applied to a calculated value of plan assets that
recognizes changes in fair value over a five-year period. This practice is intended to
reduce year-to-year volatility in pension expense, but it can have the effect of delaying
the recognition of differences between actual returns on assets and expected returns
based on long-term rate of return assumptions. Differences in actual experience in
relation to assumptions are not recognized in net income immediately, but are deferred
in accumulated other comprehensive income and, if necessary, amortized as pension
or OPEB expense.
The workforce reduction plan initiated in the third quarter of 2017 included a
curtailment loss of $20 million and a special termination benefit of $49 million as a
result of a remeasurement as of September 30, 2017, due to the eliminated future
service for approximately 460 management employees. 
The components of our net periodic pension and OPEB cost were as follows for the
years ended December 31:
Pension OPEB
Millions 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017 2016 
Net Periodic Benefit Cost:
     Service cost $ 105 $ 90 $ 84 $ 2 $ 2 $ 1 
     Interest cost 145 142 143 10 10 11 
     Expected return on plan
assets(272) (267) (267)  -  -  -
     Plan curtailment cost  - 20  -  -  -  -
     Special termination cost  - 49  -  -  -  -
Amortization of:
     Prior service cost/(credit)  -  -  - 1 1 (9)
     Actuarial loss 93 81 83 10 9 10 
Net periodic benefit cost $ 71 $ 115 $ 43 $ 23 $ 22 $ 13 
Assumptions – The weighted-average actuarial assumptions used to determine
expense were as follows:
Pension OPEB
Percentages 2018 2017 2016 2018 2017 2016 
Discount rate for benefit obligations 3.62% 4.09% 4.37% 3.54% 3.89% 4.13% 
Discount rate for interest on benefit
obligations3.27% 3.47% 3.65% 3.14% 3.25% 3.34% 
Discount rate for service cost 3.77% 4.41% 4.69% 3.71% 4.25% 4.59% 
Discount rate for interest on service cost 3.72% 4.27% 4.55% 3.64% 4.11% 4.44% 
Expected return on plan assets 7.00% 7.00% 7.50% N/A N/A N/A
Compensation increase 4.19% 4.13% 4.20% N/A N/A N/A
Health care cost trend rate (employees
under 65)N/A N/A N/A 6.09% 6.31% 6.52% 
Ultimate health care cost trend rate N/A N/A N/A 4.50% 4.50% 4.50% 
Year ultimate trend reached N/A N/A N/A 2038 2038 2038 
 
60
 
Beginning in 2016, we measure the service cost and interest cost components of our
net periodic benefit cost by using individual spot discount rates matched with separate
cash flows for each future year. The discount rates were based on a yield curve of high
quality corporate bonds.  The expected return on plan assets is based on our asset
allocation mix and our historical return, taking into account current and expected
market conditions. The actual return/(loss) on pension plan assets, net of fees, was
approximately (2)% in 2018, 19% in 2017, and 8% in 2016.
Assumed health care cost trend rates have an effect on the expense and liabilities
reported for health care plans. The assumed health care cost trend rate is based on
historical rates and expected market conditions. The 2019 assumed health care cost
trend rate for employees under 65 is 5.87%.  It is assumed the rate will decrease
gradually to an ultimate rate of 4.5% in 2038 and will remain at that level.  A one-
percentage point change in the assumed health care cost trend rates would have the
following effects on OPEB:
MillionsOne % pt.
IncreaseOne % pt.
Decrease
Effect on total service and interest cost components $ 1 $ (1)
Effect on accumulated benefit obligation 21 (17)
Cash Contributions
The following table details our cash contributions for the qualified pension plans and
the benefit payments for the non-qualified (supplemental) pension and OPEB plans:
Pension
Millions QualifiedNon-
qualified OPEB
2018 $  -$ 29 $ 24 
2017  - 24 22 
Our policy with respect to funding the qualified plans is to fund at least the minimum
required by law and not more than the maximum amount deductible for tax purposes.
All contributions made to the qualified pension plans were voluntary and were made
with cash generated from operations.
The non-qualified pension and OPEB plans are not funded and are not subject to any
minimum regulatory funding requirements. Benefit payments for each year represent
supplemental pension payments and claims paid for medical and life insurance. We
anticipate our 2019 supplemental pension and OPEB payments will be made from
cash generated from operations.
Benefit Payments
The following table details expected benefit payments for the years 2019 through
2028:
Millions Pension OPEB
2019 $ 223 $ 22 
2020 220 21 
2021 218 20 
2022 217 20 
2023 217 19 
Years 2024 - 2028 1,113 86 
 
61
 
Asset Allocation Strategy
Our pension plan asset allocation at December 31, 2018, and 2017, and target
allocation for 2019, are as follows:
Percentage of Plan
Assets
Target December 31,
Allocation 2019 2018 2017 
Equity securities 60% to 70% 56% 69% 
Debt securities 25% to 35% 36 22 
Real estate 2% to 8% 6 5 
Commodities N/A 2 4 
Total 100% 100% 
The investment strategy for pension plan assets is to maintain a broadly diversified
portfolio designed to achieve our target average long-term rate of return of 7.0%. While
we believe we can achieve a long-term average rate of return of 7.0%, we cannot be
certain that the portfolio will perform to our expectations. Assets are strategically
allocated among equity, debt, and other investments in order to achieve a
diversification level that reduces fluctuations in investment returns. Asset allocation
target ranges for equity, debt, and other portfolios are evaluated at least every three
years with the assistance of an independent consulting firm. Actual asset allocations
are monitored monthly, and rebalancing actions are executed at least quarterly, as
needed.
The pension plan investments are held in a Master Trust. The majority of pension plan
assets are invested in equity securities because equity portfolios have historically
provided higher returns than debt and other asset classes over extended time horizons
and are expected to do so in the future. Correspondingly, equity investments also
entail greater risks than other investments.  Equity risks are balanced by investing a
significant portion of the plans’ assets in high quality debt securities. The average
credit rating of the debt portfolio exceeded A at both December 31, 2018 and 2017.
The debt portfolio is also broadly diversified and invested primarily in U.S. Treasury,
mortgage, and corporate securities. The weighted-average maturity of the debt
portfolio was 13 years at both December 31, 2018 and 2017.
The investment of pension plan assets in securities issued by UPC is explicitly
prohibited by the plan for both the equity and debt portfolios, other than through index
fund holdings.
Fair Value Measurements
The pension plan assets are valued at fair value. The following is a description of the
valuation methodologies used for the investments measured at fair value, including the
general classification of such instruments pursuant to the valuation hierarchy.
Temporary Cash Investments – These investments consist of U.S. dollars and
foreign currencies held in master trust accounts at The Northern Trust Company (the
Trustee).  Foreign currencies held are reported in terms of U.S. dollars based on
currency exchange rates readily available in active markets. These temporary cash
investments are classified as Level 1 investments.
Registered Investment Companies – Registered Investment Companies are entities
primarily engaged in the business of investing in securities and are registered with the
Securities and Exchange Commission. The Plan’s holdings of Registered Investment
Companies include both public and private fund vehicles. The public vehicles are
exchange-traded funds (stocks), which are classified as Level 1 investments. The
private vehicles (bonds) do not have published pricing and are valued using Net Asset
Value (NAV).
Federal Government Securities – Federal Government Securities consist of bills,
notes, bonds, and other fixed income securities issued directly by the U.S. Treasury or
by government-sponsored enterprises. These assets are valued using a bid evaluation
process with bid data provided by independent pricing sources.  Federal Government
Securities are classified as Level 2 investments.
Bonds and Debentures – Bonds and debentures consist of debt securities issued by
U.S. and non-U.S. corporations as well as state and local governments.  These assets
are valued using a bid evaluation
 
62
 
process with bid data provided by independent pricing sources.  Corporate, state, and
municipal bonds and debentures are classified as Level 2 investments.
Corporate Stock – This investment category consists of common and preferred stock
issued by U.S. and non-U.S. corporations.  Most common shares are traded actively
on exchanges and price quotes for these shares are readily available. Common stock
is classified as a Level 1 investment.  Preferred shares included in this category are
valued using a bid evaluation process with bid data provided by independent pricing
sources.  Preferred stock is classified as a Level 2 investment.
Venture Capital and Buyout Partnerships – This investment category is comprised
of interests in limited partnerships that invest primarily in privately-held
companies.  Due to the private nature of the partnership investments, pricing inputs
are not readily observable.  Asset valuations are developed by the general partners
that manage the partnerships.  These valuations are based on the application of public
market multiples to private company cash flows, market transactions that provide
valuation information for comparable companies, and other methods.  The fair value
recorded by the Plan is calculated using each partnership’s NAV.
Real Estate Funds – Most of the Plan’s real estate investments are primarily interests
in private real estate investment trusts, partnerships, limited liability companies, and
similar structures. Valuations for the holdings in this category are not based on readily
observable inputs and are primarily derived from property appraisals. The fair value
recorded by the Plan is calculated using the NAV for each investment.
Collective Trust and Other Funds – Collective trust and other funds are comprised of
shares or units in commingled funds and limited liability companies that are not
publicly traded.  The underlying assets in these entities (U.S. stock funds, non-U.S.
stock funds, commodity funds, hedge funds, and short term investment funds) are
publicly traded on exchanges and price quotes for the assets held by these funds are
readily available.  The fair value recorded by the Plan is calculated using NAV for each
investment.
As of December 31, 2018, the pension plan assets measured at fair value on a
recurring basis were as follows:
Quoted
Prices Significant
in Active Other Significant
Markets for Observable Unobservable
Identical
Inputs Inputs Inputs
Millions (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3) Total
Plan assets at fair value:
     Temporary cash investments $ 21 $  - $  -$ 21 
     Registered investment companies
[a]1  -  - 1 
     Federal government securities  - 191  - 191 
     Bonds and debentures  - 538  - 538 
     Corporate stock 1,355 12  - 1,367 
Total plan assets at fair value $1,377 $741 $  -$2,118 
Plan assets at NA V:
     Registered investment companies
[b]378 
     Venture capital and buyout
partnerships443 
     Real estate funds 222 
     Collective trust and other funds 745 
Total plan assets at NA V $1,788 
Other assets/(liabilities) [c] (19)
Total plan assets $3,887 
[a]Registered investment companies measured at fair value are stock investments.
[b]Registered investment companies measured at NAV include bond investments.
[c]Other assets include accrued receivables, net payables, and pending broker settlements.
 
63
 
As of December 31, 2017, the pension plan assets measured at fair value on a
recurring basis were as follows:
Quoted
Prices Significant
in Active Other Significant
Markets for Observable Unobservable
Identical
Inputs Inputs Inputs
Millions (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3) Total
Plan assets at fair value:
     Temporary cash investments $ 27 $  - $  -$ 27 
     Registered investment companies
[a]4  -  - 4 
     Federal government securities  - 182  - 182 
     Bonds and debentures  - 389  - 389 
     Corporate stock 1,171 8  - 1,179 
Total plan assets at fair value $1,202 $579 $  -$1,781 
Plan assets at NA V:
     Registered investment companies
[b]329 
     Venture capital and buyout
partnerships358 
     Real estate funds 226 
     Collective trust and other funds 1,552 
Total plan assets at NA V $2,465 
Other assets/(liabilities) [c] (22)
Total plan assets $4,224 
[a]Registered investment companies measured at fair value are stock investments.
[b]Registered investment companies measured at NAV include bond investments.
[c]Other assets include accrued receivables, net payables, and pending broker settlements.
For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, there were no significant transfers
in or out of Levels 1, 2, or 3.
The Master Trust’s investments in limited partnerships and similar structures (used to
invest in private equity and real estate) are valued at fair value based on their
proportionate share of the partnerships’ fair value as recorded in the limited
partnerships’ audited financial statements. The limited partnerships allocate gains,
losses and expenses to the partners based on the ownership percentage as described
in the partnership agreements. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Master Trust had
future commitments for additional contributions to private equity partnerships totaling
$248 million and $359 million, respectively, and to real estate partnerships and funds
totaling $54 million and $67 million, respectively.
Other Retirement Programs
401(k)/Thrift Plan – For non-union employees hired prior to January 1, 2018, and
eligible union employees for whom we make matching contributions, we provide a
defined contribution plan (401(k)/thrift plan). We match 50 cents for each dollar
contributed by employees up to the first 6% of compensation contributed. Our plan
contributions were $18 million in 2018, $19 million in 2017, and $19 million in
2016.  For non-union employees hired on or after January 1, 2018, we match dollar-
for-dollar, up to the first 6% of compensation contributed, in addition to contributing an
annual amount of 3% of the employee’s annual base salary.
Railroad Retirement System – All Railroad employees are covered by the Railroad
Retirement System (the System). Contributions made to the System are expensed as
incurred and amounted to approximately $710 million in 2018, $672 million in 2017,
and $671 million in 2016.
Collective Bargaining Agreements –  Under collective bargaining agreements, we
participate in multi-employer benefit plans that provide certain postretirement health
care and life insurance benefits for eligible union employees.  Premiums paid under
these plans are expensed as incurred and amounted to $50 million in 2018, $60
million in 2017, and $50 million in 2016. 
 
64
 
7. Other Income
Other income included the following for the years ended December 31:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Rental income [a] $ 122 $ 178 $ 96 
Early extinguishment of debt [b] (85)  -  -
Net gain on non-operating asset dispositions [c] [d] 30 111 94 
Interest income 30 16 11 
Net periodic pension and OPEB 13 (45) 29 
Non-operating environmental costs and other (16) (15) (9)
Total $ 94 $ 245 $ 221 
[a]2017 includes $65 million related to a favorable litigation settlement in the third quarter.
[b]2018 includes an $85 million debt extinguishment charge for the early redemption of certain bonds and
debentures in the first quarter (Note 15).
[c]2017 includes $26 million and $57 million related to a real estate sale in the first quarter and in the third
quarter, respectively.
[d]2016 includes $17 million and $50 million related to a real estate sale in the first quarter and second
quarter, respectively.
 
8. Income Taxes
Components of income tax expense were as follows for the years ended December
31:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Current tax expense:
     Federal $1,144 $1,750 $1,518 
     State 287 235 176 
     Foreign 5 2 8 
Total current tax expense 1,436 1,987 1,702 
Deferred and other tax expense:
     Federal 344 (5,260) 692 
     State 5 183 139 
     Foreign (10) 10  -
Total deferred and other tax expense/(benefit) [a] 339 (5,067) 831 
Total income tax expense/(benefit) $1,775 $(3,080) $2,533 
[a]2017 includes a $(5,935) million adjustment to income tax expense resulting from the Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act. Of this amount, $(5,965) million is a federal income tax benefit and $30 million is a state
income tax expense.
For the years ended December 31, reconciliations between statutory and effective tax
rates are as follows:
Tax Rate Percentages 2018 2017 2016 
Federal statutory tax rate 21.0 % 35.0 % 35.0 %
State statutory rates, net of federal benefits 3.9 3.1 3.1 
Adjustment for Tax Cuts and Jobs Act  - (77.8)  -
Excess tax benefits from equity compensation plans (0.4) (0.6) (0.4)
Other deferred tax adjustments (0.6) 0.4  -
Tax credits (0.1) 0.1 (0.5)
Other (0.9) (0.6) 0.2 
Effective tax rate 22.9 % (40.4) % 37.4 %
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are recorded for the expected future tax
consequences of events that are reported in different periods for financial reporting
and income tax purposes.  The majority of our deferred tax assets relate to deductions
that already have been claimed for financial reporting purposes but not for tax
purposes.  The majority of our deferred tax liabilities relate to differences between the
tax bases and financial reporting amounts of our land and depreciable property, due to
accelerated tax depreciation (including bonus depreciation), revaluation of assets in
purchase accounting transactions, and differences in capitalization methods.
 
65
 
On December 22, 2017, The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act) was enacted. The
Tax Act made significant changes to federal tax law, including a reduction in the federal
income tax rate from 35% to 21% effective January 1, 2018, 100% bonus depreciation
for certain capital expenditures, stricter limits on deductions for interest and certain
executive compensation, and a one-time transition tax on previously deferred earnings
of certain foreign subsidiaries. As a result of our initial analysis of the Tax Act and
existing implementation guidance, we remeasured our deferred tax assets and
liabilities and computed our transition tax liability net of offsetting foreign tax credits.
This resulted in a $5.9 billion reduction in our income tax expense in the fourth quarter
of 2017. We also recorded a $212 million reduction to our operating expense related to
income tax adjustments at equity-method affiliates in the fourth quarter of 2017.
The SEC provided guidance in SAB 118 on accounting for the tax effects of the Tax
Act. In accordance with that guidance, some of the income tax effects recorded in
2017 were provisional, including those related to our analysis of 100% bonus
depreciation for certain capital expenditures, stricter limits on deductions for certain
executive compensation, the one-time transition tax, and the reduction to our operating
expense related to income tax adjustments at equity-method affiliates. The accounting
for the income tax effects could have been adjusted during 2018 as a result of
continuing analysis of the Tax Act; additional implementation guidance from the
Internal Revenue Service (IRS), state tax authorities, the SEC, the FASB, or the Joint
Committee on Taxation; and new information from domestic or foreign equity affiliates.
We had no material adjustments to our accounting for the Tax Act during 2018.
In the second quarter of 2018, Iowa and Missouri enacted legislation to reduce their
corporate tax rates for future years resulting in a $31 million reduction of our deferred
tax expense.
In July of 2017, Illinois enacted legislation to increase its corporate income tax rate
effective July 1, 2017.  In the third quarter of 2017, we increased our deferred tax
expense by $33 million to reflect the increased tax rate.
Deferred income tax (liabilities)/assets were comprised of the following at December
31:
Millions 2018 2017 
Deferred income tax liabilities:
   Property $(11,590) $(11,262)
   Other (213) (197)
Total deferred income tax liabilities (11,803) (11,459)
Deferred income tax assets:
   Accrued wages 46 46 
   Accrued casualty costs 148 147 
   Stock compensation 44 46 
   Retiree benefits 138 141 
   Credits  - 1 
   Other 125 142 
Total deferred income tax assets $ 501 $ 523 
Net deferred income tax liability $(11,302) $(10,936)
When appropriate, we record a valuation allowance against deferred tax assets to
reflect that these tax assets may not be realized. In determining whether a valuation
allowance is appropriate, we consider whether it is more likely than not that all or some
portion of our deferred tax assets will not be realized based on management’s
judgments using available evidence for purposes of estimating whether future taxable
income will be sufficient to realize a deferred tax asset. In 2018 and 2017, there were
no valuation allowances.
Tax benefits are recognized only for tax positions that are more likely than not to be
sustained upon examination by tax authorities. The amount recognized is measured as
the largest amount of benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely to be realized upon
settlement. Unrecognized tax benefits are tax benefits claimed in our tax returns that
do not meet these recognition and measurement standards.
 
66
 
A reconciliation of changes in unrecognized tax benefits liabilities/(assets) from the
beginning to the end of the reporting period is as follows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Unrecognized tax benefits at January 1 $ 179 $ 125 $ 94 
Increases for positions taken in current year 30 38 31 
Increases for positions taken in prior years 9 51 10 
Decreases for positions taken in prior years (30) (56) (20)
Refunds from/(payments to) and settlements with taxing
authorities21 64 4 
Increases/(decreases) for interest and penalties 4  - 6 
Lapse of statutes of limitations (39) (43)  -
Unrecognized tax benefits at December 31 $ 174 $ 179 $ 125 
We recognize interest and penalties as part of income tax expense. Total accrued
liabilities for interest and penalties were $8 million at both December 31, 2018, and
2017. Total interest and penalties recognized as part of income tax expense (benefit)
were ($1) million for 2018, ($3) million for 2017, and $5 million for 2016.
The IRS is examining UPC’s 2016 tax return. The statute of limitations has run for all
years prior to 2015. In 2017, UPC amended its 2013 income tax return, primarily to
claim deductions resulting from the resolution of prior year IRS examinations. The IRS
and Joint Committee on Taxation have completed their review of the 2013 return, and
in the second quarter of 2018 we received a refund of $19 million.
In 2016, UPC amended its 2011 and 2012 income tax returns to claim deductions
resulting from the resolution of IRS examinations for years prior to 2011. The IRS and
Joint Committee on Taxation reviewed these amended returns.  In the third quarter of
2017, we received a refund of $62 million, consisting of $60 million of tax and $2
million of interest.
Several state tax authorities are examining our state income tax returns for years 2015
through 2016.
We do not expect our unrecognized tax benefits to change significantly in the next 12
months.
The portion of our unrecognized tax benefits that relates to permanent changes in tax
and interest would reduce our effective tax rate, if recognized. The remaining
unrecognized tax benefits relate to tax positions for which only the timing of the benefit
is uncertain. Recognition of the tax benefits with uncertain timing would reduce our
effective tax rate only through a reduction of accrued interest and penalties.  The
unrecognized tax benefits that would reduce our effective tax rate are as follows: 
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Unrecognized tax benefits that would reduce the ef fective
tax rate$ 63 $ 83 $ 31 
Unrecognized tax benefits that would not reduce the
effective tax rate111 96 94 
Total unrecognized tax benefits $ 174 $ 179 $ 125 
 
 
67
 
9. Earnings Per Share
The following table provides a reconciliation between basic and diluted earnings per
share for the years ended December 31:
Millions, Except Per Share Amounts 2018 2017 2016 
Net income $5,966 $10,712 $4,233 
Weighted-average number of shares outstanding:    
    Basic 750.9 798.4 832.4 
    Dilutive ef fect of stock options 1.9 1.8 1.5 
    Dilutive ef fect of retention shares and units 1.5 1.5 1.5 
Diluted 754.3 801.7 835.4 
Earnings per share – basic $ 7.95 $13.42 $ 5.09 
Earnings per share – diluted $ 7.91 $13.36 $ 5.07 
Common stock options totaling 0.3 million, 1.6 million, and 2.0 million for 2018, 2017,
and 2016, respectively, were excluded from the computation of diluted earnings per
share because the exercise prices of these options exceeded the average market
price of our common stock for the respective periods, and the effect of their inclusion
would be anti-dilutive.
 
10. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income/(Loss)
Reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss) were as
follows (net of tax):
MillionsDefined
benefit
plansForeign
currency
translation Total
Balance at January 1, 2018 $(1,029) $ (112) $(1,141)
Other comprehensive income/(loss) before
reclassifications(1) (36) (37)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income/(loss) [a]63  - 63 
Net year-to-date other comprehensive income/(loss),
net of taxes of $(22)  million62 (36) 26 
Reclassification due to ASU 2018-02 adoption (Note 3) (225) (75) (300)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $(1,192) $ (223) $(1,415)
Balance at January 1, 2017 $(1,132) $ (140) $(1,272)
Other comprehensive income/(loss) before
reclassifications2 28 30 
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income/(loss) [a]101  - 101 
Net year-to-date other comprehensive income/(loss),
net of taxes of $(61)  million103 28 131 
Balance at December 31, 2017 $(1,029) $ (112) $(1,141)
[a]The accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss) reclassification components are 1) prior service
cost/(benefit) and 2) net actuarial loss which are both included in the computation of net periodic
pension cost.  See Note 6 Retirement Plans for additional details.
 
11. Accounts Receivable
Accounts receivable includes freight and other receivables reduced by an allowance
for doubtful accounts. The allowance is based upon historical losses, credit worthiness
of customers, and current economic conditions. At both December 31, 2018, and 2017,
our accounts receivable were reduced by $3 million. Receivables not expected to be
collected in one year and the associated allowances are classified as other
 
68
 
assets in our Consolidated Statements of Financial Position. At December 31, 2018,
and 2017, receivables classified as other assets were reduced by allowances of
$27 million and $17 million, respectively.
Receivables Securitization Facility – The Railroad maintains a $650 million, 3-year
receivables securitization facility (the Receivables Facility), maturing in July 2019.
Under the Receivables Facility, the Railroad sells most of its eligible third-party
receivables to Union Pacific Receivables, Inc. (UPRI), a consolidated, wholly-owned,
bankruptcy-remote subsidiary that may subsequently transfer, without recourse, an
undivided interest in accounts receivable to investors. The investors have no recourse
to the Railroad’s other assets except for customary warranty and indemnity claims.
Creditors of the Railroad do not have recourse to the assets of UPRI.
The amount outstanding under the Receivables Facility was $400 million and $500
million at December 31, 2018, and December 31, 2017, respectively. The Receivables
Facility was supported by $1.4 billion and $1.1 billion of accounts receivable as
collateral at December 31, 2018, and December 31, 2017, respectively, which, as a
retained interest, is included in accounts receivable, net in our Consolidated
Statements of Financial Position.
The outstanding amount the Railroad is allowed to maintain under the Receivables
Facility, with a maximum of $650 million, may fluctuate based on the availability of
eligible receivables and is directly affected by business volumes and credit risks,
including receivables payment quality measures such as default and dilution ratios. If
default or dilution ratios increase one percent, the allowable outstanding amount under
the Receivables Facility would not materially change.
The costs of the Receivables Facility include interest, which will vary based on
prevailing benchmark and commercial paper rates, program fees paid to participating
banks, commercial paper issuance costs, and fees of participating banks for unused
commitment availability.  The costs of the Receivables Facility are included in interest
expense and were $15 million,  $6 million, and $7 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016,
respectively.
 
12. Properties
The following tables list the major categories of property and equipment, as well as the
weighted-average estimated useful life for each category (in years):
Millions, Except Estimated Useful Life Accumulated Net Book Estimated
As of December 31, 2018 Cost Depreciation Value Useful Life
Land $5,264 $      N/A $5,264 N/A
Road:
     Rail and other track material 16,785 6,156 10,629 43 
     Ties 10,409 3,025 7,384 34 
     Ballast 5,561 1,595 3,966 34 
     Other roadway [a] 19,584 3,766 15,818 48 
Total road 52,339 14,542 37,797 N/A
Equipment:
     Locomotives 9,792 3,861 5,931 19 
     Freight cars 2,229 929 1,300 24 
     W ork equipment and other 1,040 301 739 19 
Total equipment 13,061 5,091 7,970 N/A
Technology and other 1,117 493 624 12 
Construction in progress 1,024  - 1,024 N/A
Total $72,805 $20,126 $52,679 N/A
[a]Other roadway includes grading, bridges and tunnels, signals, buildings, and other road assets.
 
69
 
Millions, Except Estimated Useful Life Accumulated Net Book Estimated
As of December 31, 2017 Cost Depreciation Value Useful Life
Land $5,258 $      N/A $5,258 N/A
Road:
     Rail and other track material 16,327 5,929 10,398 43 
     Ties 10,132 2,881 7,251 33 
     Ballast 5,406 1,509 3,897 34 
     Other roadway [a] 18,972 3,482 15,490 47 
Total road 50,837 13,801 37,036 N/A
Equipment:
     Locomotives 9,686 3,697 5,989 19 
     Freight cars 2,255 983 1,272 24 
     W ork equipment and other 936 267 669 19 
Total equipment 12,877 4,947 7,930 N/A
Technology and other 1,105 460 645 11 
Construction in progress 736  - 736 N/A
Total $70,813 $19,208 $51,605 N/A
[a]Other roadway includes grading, bridges and tunnels, signals, buildings, and other road assets.
Property and Depreciation – Our railroad operations are highly capital intensive, and
our large base of homogeneous, network-type assets turns over on a continuous
basis.  Each year we develop a capital program for the replacement of assets and for
the acquisition or construction of assets that enable us to enhance our operations or
provide new service offerings to customers.  Assets purchased or constructed
throughout the year are capitalized if they meet applicable minimum units of property
criteria.  Properties and equipment are carried at cost and are depreciated on a
straight-line basis over their estimated service lives, which are measured in years,
except for rail in high-density traffic corridors (i.e., all rail lines except for those subject
to abandonment, and yard and switching tracks) for which lives are measured in
millions of gross tons per mile of track.  We use the group method of depreciation in
which all items with similar characteristics, use, and expected lives are grouped
together in asset classes, and are depreciated using composite depreciation
rates.  The group method of depreciation treats each asset class as a pool of
resources, not as singular items.  We currently have more than 60 depreciable asset
classes, and we may increase or decrease the number of asset classes due to
changes in technology, asset strategies, or other factors.
We determine the estimated service lives of depreciable railroad assets by means of
depreciation studies.  We perform depreciation studies at least every three years for
equipment and every six years for track assets (i.e., rail and other track material, ties,
and ballast) and other road property.  Our depreciation studies take into account the
following factors:
·Statistical analysis of historical patterns of use and retirements of each of our
asset classes;
·Evaluation of any expected changes in current operations and the outlook for
continued use of the assets;
·Evaluation of technological advances and changes to maintenance practices; and
·Expected salvage to be received upon retirement.
For rail in high-density traffic corridors, we measure estimated service lives in millions
of gross tons per mile of track.  It has been our experience that the lives of rail in high-
density traffic corridors are closely correlated to usage (i.e., the amount of weight
carried over the rail).  The service lives also vary based on rail weight, rail condition
(e.g., new or secondhand), and rail type (e.g., straight or curve).  Our depreciation
studies for rail in high-density traffic corridors consider each of these factors in
determining the estimated service lives.  For rail in high-density traffic corridors, we
calculate depreciation rates annually by dividing the number of gross ton-miles carried
over the rail (i.e., the weight of loaded and empty freight cars, locomotives and
maintenance of way equipment transported over the rail) by the estimated service lives
of the rail measured in millions of gross tons per mile.  For all other depreciable assets,
we compute depreciation based on the estimated service lives of our assets as
determined from the analysis of our depreciation studies.  Changes in the estimated
service lives of our assets and their related depreciation rates are implemented
prospectively.
 
70
 
Under group depreciation, the historical cost (net of salvage) of depreciable property
that is retired or replaced in the ordinary course of business is charged to accumulated
depreciation and no gain or loss is recognized.  The historical cost of certain track
assets is estimated by multiplying the current replacement cost of track assets by a
historical index factor derived from (i) inflation indices published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics and (ii) the estimated useful lives of the assets as determined by our
depreciation studies.  The indices were selected because they closely correlate with
the major costs of the properties comprising the applicable track asset
classes.  Because of the number of estimates inherent in the depreciation and
retirement processes and because it is impossible to precisely estimate each of these
variables until a group of property is completely retired, we continually monitor the
estimated service lives of our assets and the accumulated depreciation associated
with each asset class to ensure our depreciation rates are appropriate. In addition, we
determine if the recorded amount of accumulated depreciation is deficient (or in
excess) of the amount indicated by our depreciation studies. Any deficiency (or
excess) is amortized as a component of depreciation expense over the remaining
service lives of the applicable classes of assets.
For retirements of depreciable railroad properties that do not occur in the normal
course of business, a gain or loss may be recognized if the retirement meets each of
the following three conditions: (i) is unusual, (ii) is material in amount, and (iii) varies
significantly from the retirement profile identified through our depreciation studies.  A
gain or loss is recognized in other income when we sell land or dispose of assets that
are not part of our railroad operations.
When we purchase an asset, we capitalize all costs necessary to make the asset
ready for its intended use.  However, many of our assets are self-constructed.  A large
portion of our capital expenditures is for replacement of existing track assets and other
road properties, which is typically performed by our employees, and for track line
expansion and other capacity projects.  Costs that are directly attributable to capital
projects (including overhead costs) are capitalized.  Direct costs that are capitalized as
part of self-constructed assets include material, labor, and work equipment.  Indirect
costs are capitalized if they clearly relate to the construction of the asset.
Normal repairs and maintenance are expensed as incurred, while costs incurred that
extend the useful life of an asset, improve the safety of our operations or improve
operating efficiency are capitalized. These costs are allocated using appropriate
statistical bases. Total expense for repairs and maintenance incurred was $2.5 billion
for 2018, $2.5 billion for 2017, and $2.3 billion for 2016.
Assets held under capital leases are recorded at the lower of the net present value of
the minimum lease payments or the fair value of the leased asset at the inception of
the lease. Amortization expense is computed using the straight-line method over the
shorter of the estimated useful lives of the assets or the period of the related lease.
 
13. Accounts Payable and Other Current Liabilities
Dec. 31, Dec. 31,
Millions 2018 2017 
Accounts payable $ 872 $1,013 
Income and other taxes payable 694 547 
Accrued wages and vacation 384 384 
Interest payable 317 220 
Accrued casualty costs 211 194 
Equipment rents payable 107 110 
Other 575 671 
Total accounts payable and other current liabilities $3,160 $3,139 
 
14. Financial Instruments
Short-Term Investments – All of the Company’s short-term investments consist of
time deposits and government agency securities. These investments are considered
level 2 investments and are valued at amortized cost, which approximates fair value.
On November 1, 2018, $30 million of the Company’s $90 million in short-term
investments were placed into a trust for the purpose of providing collateral for payment
of certain other long-term liabilities, and as such were reclassified as other assets. All
short-term investments have a maturity of less than one year and are classified as
held-to-maturity.  There were no transfers out of Level 2 during the year ended
December 31, 2018.
 
71
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments – The fair value of our short- and long-term debt
was estimated using a market value price model, which utilizes applicable U.S.
Treasury rates along with current market quotes on comparable debt securities. All of
the inputs used to determine the fair market value of the Corporation’s long-term debt
are Level 2 inputs and obtained from an independent source. At December 31, 2018,
the fair value of total debt was $21.9 billion, approximately $0.5 billion less than the
carrying value.  At December 31, 2017, the fair value of total debt was $18.2 billion,
approximately $1.3 billion more than the carrying value. The fair value of the
Corporation’s debt is a measure of its current value under present market conditions. It
does not impact the financial statements under current accounting rules. At December
31, 2018, and 2017, approximately $0 and $155 million, respectively of debt securities
contained call provisions that allow us to retire the debt instruments prior to final
maturity at par, without the payment of fixed call premiums.  The fair value of our cash
equivalents approximates their carrying value due to the short-term maturities of these
instruments.
 
15. Debt
Total debt as of December 31, 2018, and 2017, is summarized below:
Millions 2018 2017 
Notes and debentures, 1.8% to 7.9% due through 2067 $20,627 $15,096 
Equipment obligations, 2.6% to 6.7% due through 2031 969 1,018 
Capitalized leases, 3.1% to 8.0% due through 2028 754 892 
Receivables Securitization (Note 11) 400 500 
Term loans - floating rate, due in 2019 250 250 
Commercial paper , 2.6%  to 2.8% due in 2019 200  -
Medium-term notes, 9.3%  to 10.0% due through 2020 8 18 
Mortgage bonds, redeemed March 15, 2018  - 57 
Unamortized discount and deferred issuance costs (817) (887)
Total debt 22,391 16,944 
Less: current portion (1,466) (800)
Total long-term debt $20,925 $16,144 
Debt Maturities – The following table presents aggregate debt maturities as of
December 31, 2018, excluding market value adjustments:
Millions
2019 $ 1,467 
2020 981 
2021 1,267 
2022 913 
2023 1,396 
Thereafter 17,184 
Total principal 23,208 
Unamortized discount and deferred issuance costs (817)
Total debt $22,391 
Equipment Encumbrances – Equipment with a carrying value of approximately $1.8
billion and $2.0 billion at December 31, 2018, and 2017, respectively, served as
collateral for capital leases and other types of equipment obligations in accordance
with the secured financing arrangements utilized to acquire or refinance such railroad
equipment.
Debt Redemption – Effective as of March 15, 2018, we redeemed, in entirety, the
Missouri Pacific 5% Income Debentures due 2045, the Chicago and Eastern Illinois
5% Income Debentures due 2054, and the Missouri Pacific 4.75% General Mortgage
Income Bonds Series A due 2020 and Series B due 2030. The debentures had
principal outstanding of $96 million and $2 million, respectively, and the bonds had
principal outstanding of $30 million and $27 million, respectively. The bonds and
debentures were assumed by the Railroad in the 1982 acquisition of the Missouri
Pacific Railroad Company, with a weighted average interest rate of 4.9%. The carrying
value of all four bonds and debentures at the time of redemption was $70 million,
 
72
 
due to fair value purchase accounting adjustments related to the acquisition. The
redemption resulted in an early extinguishment charge of $85 million in the first quarter
of 2018.
Credit Facilities – During the second quarter of 2018, we replaced our $1.7 billion
revolving credit facility, which was scheduled to expire in May 2019, with a new $2.0
billion facility that expires in June 2023 (the Facility). The Facility is based on
substantially similar terms as those in the previous credit facility. At December 31,
2018, we had $2.0 billion of credit available under our revolving credit facility, which is
designated for general corporate purposes and supports the issuance of commercial
paper. We did not draw on either facility at any time during 2018. Commitment fees
and interest rates payable under the Facility are similar to fees and rates available to
comparably rated, investment-grade borrowers. The Facility allows for borrowings at
floating rates based on London Interbank Offered Rates, plus a spread, depending
upon credit ratings for our senior unsecured debt. The prior facility required UPC to
maintain a debt-to-net-worth coverage ratio. The new five-year facility requires UPC to
maintain a debt-to-EBITDA (earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation, and
amortization) coverage ratio.
The definition of debt used for purposes of calculating the debt-to-EBITDA coverage
ratio includes, among other things, certain credit arrangements, capital leases,
guarantees, unfunded and vested pension benefits under Title IV of ERISA, and
unamortized debt discount and deferred debt issuance costs. At December 31, 2018,
the Company was in compliance with the debt-to-EBITDA coverage ratio, which allows
us to carry up to $37.9 billion of debt (as defined in the Facility), and we had $23.2
billion of debt (as defined in the Facility) outstanding at that date.  The Facility does not
include any other financial restrictions, credit rating triggers (other than rating-
dependent pricing), or any other provision that could require us to post collateral. The
Facility also includes a $150 million cross-default provision and a change-of-control
provision.
During 2018, we issued $8.5 billion and repaid $8.3 billion of commercial paper with
maturities ranging from 1 to 34 days, and at December 31, 2018, and 2017, we had
$200 million and $0 commercial paper outstanding, respectively. Our revolving credit
facility supports our outstanding commercial paper balances, and, unless we change
the terms of our commercial paper program, our aggregate issuance of commercial
paper will not exceed the amount of borrowings available under the Facility.
In May 2018, we entered into a short-term bilateral line of credit agreement with $1.0
billion of credit available. During the three months ended June 30, 2018, we drew and
repaid $750 million. The line of credit matured in August 2018. We used the proceeds
for general corporate purposes, including the repurchase of common stock pursuant to
our share repurchase programs.
Shelf Registration Statement and Significant New Borrowings – We filed an
automatic shelf registration statement with the SEC that became effective on February
12, 2018 (the Shelf). The Board of Directors authorized the issuance of up to $6 billion
of debt securities, replacing the prior Board authorization in July 2016, which had
$1.55 billion of authority remaining. Under our Shelf registration, we may issue, from
time to time, any combination of debt securities, preferred stock, common stock, or
warrants for debt securities or preferred stock in one or more offerings.
During 2018, we issued the following unsecured, fixed-rate debt securities under our
current shelf registration:
Date Description of Securities
June 8, 2018 $600  million of 3.200%  Notes due June 8, 2021
$650  million of 3.500%  Notes due June 8, 2023
$500  million of 3.750%  Notes due July 15, 2025
$1.5 billion of 3.950% Notes due September 10, 2028
$750 million of 4.375% Notes due September 10, 2038
$1.5 billion of 4.500% Notes due September 10, 2048
$500 million of 4.800% Notes due September 10, 2058
We used the net proceeds from the offerings for general corporate purposes, including
the repurchase of common stock pursuant to our share repurchase programs. These
debt securities include change-of-control provisions. 
On July 26, 2018, the Board of Directors renewed its authorization for the Company to
issue up to $6.0 billion of debt securities under the Shelf. This authorization replaces
the original Board authorization in
 
73
 
February 2018 which had no remaining authority. At December 31, 2018, we had
remaining authority to issue up to $6.0 billion of debt securities under our shelf
registration.
Receivables Securitization Facility – As of December 31, 2018, and 2017, we
recorded $400 million and $500 million, respectively, of borrowings under our
Receivables Facility, as secured debt. (See further discussion of our receivables
securitization facility in Note 11).
 
16. Variable Interest Entities
We have entered into various lease transactions in which the structure of the leases
contain variable interest entities (VIEs). These VIEs were created solely for the
purpose of doing lease transactions (principally involving railroad equipment and
facilities) and have no other activities, assets or liabilities outside of the lease
transactions.  Within these lease arrangements, we have the right to purchase some or
all of the assets at fixed prices. Depending on market conditions, fixed-price purchase
options available in the leases could potentially provide benefits to us; however, these
benefits are not expected to be significant.
We maintain and operate the assets based on contractual obligations within the lease
arrangements, which set specific guidelines consistent within the railroad industry. As
such, we have no control over activities that could materially impact the fair value of
the leased assets. We do not hold the power to direct the activities of the VIEs and,
therefore, do not control the ongoing activities that have a significant impact on the
economic performance of the VIEs. Additionally, we do not have the obligation to
absorb losses of the VIEs or the right to receive benefits of the VIEs that could
potentially be significant to the VIEs.
We are not considered to be the primary beneficiary and do not consolidate these VIEs
because our actions and decisions do not have the most significant effect on the VIE’s
performance and our fixed-price purchase options are not considered to be potentially
significant to the VIEs.  The future minimum lease payments associated with the VIE
leases totaled $1.7 billion as of December 31, 2018.
 
17. Leases
We lease certain locomotives, freight cars, and other property. The Consolidated
Statements of Financial Position as of December 31, 2018, and 2017 included $1,454
million, net of $912 million of accumulated depreciation, and $1,635 million, net of
$953 million of accumulated depreciation, respectively, for properties held under
capital leases. A charge to income resulting from the depreciation for assets held
under capital leases is included within depreciation expense in our Consolidated
Statements of Income. Future minimum lease payments for operating and capital
leases with initial or remaining non-cancelable lease terms in excess of one year as of
December 31, 2018, were as follows:
MillionsOperating
LeasesCapital
Leases
2019 $ 419 $ 148 
2020 378 155 
2021 303 159 
2022 272 142 
2023 234 94 
Later years 1,040 200 
Total minimum lease payments $2,646 $ 898 
Amount representing interest N/A (144)
Present value of minimum lease payments N/A $ 754 
Approximately 97% of capital lease payments relate to locomotives. Rent expense for
operating leases with terms exceeding one month was $397 million in 2018, $480
million in 2017, and $535 million in 2016. When cash rental payments are not made on
a straight-line basis, we recognize variable rental expense on a straight-line basis over
the lease term. Contingent rentals and sub-rentals are not significant.
 
18. Commitments and Contingencies
Asserted and Unasserted Claims – Various claims and lawsuits are pending against
us and certain of our subsidiaries. We cannot fully determine the effect of all asserted
and unasserted claims on our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or
liquidity. To the extent possible, we have recorded
 
74
 
a liability where asserted and unasserted claims are considered probable and where
such claims can be reasonably estimated. We do not expect that any known lawsuits,
claims, environmental costs, commitments, contingent liabilities, or guarantees will
have a material adverse effect on our consolidated results of operations, financial
condition, or liquidity after taking into account liabilities and insurance recoveries
previously recorded for these matters.
Personal Injury – The cost of personal injuries to employees and others related to our
activities is charged to expense based on estimates of the ultimate cost and number of
incidents each year. We use an actuarial analysis to measure the expense and liability,
including unasserted claims. The Federal Employers’ Liability Act (FELA) governs
compensation for work-related accidents. Under FELA, damages are assessed based
on a finding of fault through litigation or out-of-court settlements. We offer a
comprehensive variety of services and rehabilitation programs for employees who are
injured at work.
Our personal injury liability is not discounted to present value due to the uncertainty
surrounding the timing of future payments. Approximately 94% of the recorded liability
is related to asserted claims and approximately 6% is related to unasserted claims at
December 31, 2018. Because of the uncertainty surrounding the ultimate outcome of
personal injury claims, it is reasonably possible that future costs to settle these claims
may range from approximately $271 million to $297 million. We record an accrual at
the low end of the range as no amount of loss within the range is more probable than
any other.  Estimates can vary over time due to evolving trends in litigation.
Our personal injury liability activity was as follows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Beginning balance $ 285 $ 290 $ 318 
Current year accruals 74 77 75 
Changes in estimates for prior years (16) (7) (29)
Payments (72) (75) (74)
Ending balance at December 31 $ 271 $ 285 $ 290 
Current portion, ending balance at December 31 $ 72 $ 66 $ 62 
We reassess our estimated insurance recoveries annually and have recognized an
asset for estimated insurance recoveries at December 31, 2018, and 2017.  Any
changes to recorded insurance recoveries are included in the above table in the
Changes in estimates for prior years category.
Environmental Costs – We are subject to federal, state, and local environmental laws
and regulations. We have identified 334 sites at which we are or may be liable for
remediation costs associated with alleged contamination or for violations of
environmental requirements. This includes 33 sites that are the subject of actions
taken by the U.S. government, 21 of which are currently on the Superfund National
Priorities List. Certain federal legislation imposes joint and several liability for the
remediation of identified sites; consequently, our ultimate environmental liability may
include costs relating to activities of other parties, in addition to costs relating to our
own activities at each site.
When we identify an environmental issue with respect to property owned, leased, or
otherwise used in our business, we perform, with assistance of our consultants,
environmental assessments on the property. We expense the cost of the assessments
as incurred. We accrue the cost of remediation where our obligation is probable and
such costs can be reasonably estimated. Our environmental liability is not discounted
to present value due to the uncertainty surrounding the timing of future payments.
Our environmental liability activity was as follows:
Millions 2018 2017 2016 
Beginning balance $ 196 $ 212 $ 190 
Accruals 84 45 84 
Payments (57) (61) (62)
Ending balance at December 31 $ 223 $ 196 $ 212 
Current portion, ending balance at December 31 $ 59 $ 57 $ 55 
 
75
 
The environmental liability includes future costs for remediation and restoration of
sites, as well as ongoing monitoring costs, but excludes any anticipated recoveries
from third parties. Cost estimates are based on information available for each site,
financial viability of other potentially responsible parties, and existing technology, laws,
and regulations. The ultimate liability for remediation is difficult to determine because
of the number of potentially responsible parties, site-specific cost sharing
arrangements with other potentially responsible parties, the degree of contamination
by various wastes, the scarcity and quality of volumetric data related to many of the
sites, and the speculative nature of remediation costs. Estimates of liability may vary
over time due to changes in federal, state, and local laws governing environmental
remediation. Current obligations are not expected to have a material adverse effect on
our consolidated results of operations, financial condition, or liquidity.
Insurance – The Company has a consolidated, wholly-owned captive insurance
subsidiary (the captive), that provides insurance coverage for certain risks including
FELA claims and property coverage which are subject to reinsurance.  The captive
entered into annual reinsurance treaty agreements that insure workers compensation,
general liability, auto liability and FELA risk. The captive cedes a portion of its FELA
exposure through the treaty and assumes a proportionate share of the entire risk.  The
captive receives direct premiums, which are netted against the Company’s premium
costs in other expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Income. The treaty
agreements provide for certain protections against the risk of treaty participants’ non-
performance, and we do not believe our exposure to treaty participants’ non-
performance is material at this time. We record both liabilities and reinsurance
receivables using an actuarial analysis based on historical experience in our
Consolidated Statements of Financial Position. Effective January 2019, the captive
insurance subsidiary will no longer participate in the reinsurance treaty
agreement.  The Company established a trust in the fourth quarter of 2018 for the
purpose of providing collateral as required under the reinsurance treaty agreement for
prior years’ participation. 
Guarantees – At December 31, 2018, and 2017, we were contingently liable for $22
million and $33 million, respectively, in guarantees. The fair value of these obligations
as of both December 31, 2018, and 2017 was $0. We entered into these contingent
guarantees in the normal course of business, and they include guaranteed obligations
related to our affiliated operations. The final guarantee expires in 2022. We are not
aware of any existing event of default that would require us to satisfy these
guarantees. We do not expect that these guarantees will have a material adverse
effect on our consolidated financial condition, results of operations, or liquidity.
Indemnities – We are contingently obligated under a variety of indemnification
arrangements, although in some cases the extent of our potential liability is limited,
depending on the nature of the transactions and the agreements. Due to uncertainty
as to whether claims will be made or how they will be resolved, we cannot reasonably
determine the probability of an adverse claim or reasonably estimate any adverse
liability or the total maximum exposure under these indemnification arrangements. We
do not have any reason to believe that we will be required to make any material
payments under these indemnity provisions. 
Gain Contingency – UPRR filed multiple claims with the IRS for refunds of railroad
retirement taxes (Railroad Retirement Taxes) paid on (i) certain stock awards to its
employees and (ii) certain bonus payments it made to labor agreement employees
during the years 1991 – 2017. In 2016, the U.S. District Court for the District of
Nebraska (the District Court) denied UPRR recovery of these Railroad Retirement
Taxes. UPRR appealed this denial to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the 8th Circuit (8th
Circuit) and the 8th Circuit ruled in favor of UPRR and remanded the case to the
District Court. The IRS appealed the 8th Circuit ruling to the U.S. Supreme Court. In
June 2018, a similar case for another railroad was decided by the U.S. Supreme Court
against the IRS and in favor of that railroad (Wisconsin Central LTD., Et. Al. v. U.S.).
As a result, the U.S. Supreme Court denied the IRS request to appeal the 8th Circuit
ruling. On November 28, 2018 the District Court issued an order granting summary
judgment to UPRR pursuant to the mandate of the 8th Circuit. UPRR, the Department
of Justice (DOJ), and the IRS have since agreed upon the tax refund amounts owed
UPRR and its employees. UPRR’s employer refund of $78 million will be recognized
as a reduction of compensation and benefit expenses and approximately $30 million of
interest will be recognized in other income. UPRR expects to receive the refunds in
2019, but the refunds may be received in multiple portions at different times. UPRR is
in the process of seeking consent from approximately 75,000 current and former
employees to obtain their employee share of the refunds.  UPRR anticipates having
this consent process completed in the first half of 2019, but further actions by the IRS
and Railroad Retirement Board may delay completion until later in 2019. 
These refund claims are considered gain contingencies and no refund amounts have
been recorded in the Consolidated Financial Statements as of December 31, 2018.
The claims will be recorded when a final
 
76
 
judgment from the District Court has been issued and all IRS requirements for UPRR’s
refunds have been fulfilled.
19. Share Repurchase Programs
Effective January 1, 2017, our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to
120 million shares of our common stock by December 31, 2020, replacing our previous
repurchase program. As of December 31, 2018, we repurchased a total of $31.4 billion
of our common stock since the commencement of our repurchase programs in 2007.
The table below represents shares repurchased under this repurchase program.
Number of Shares
Purchased Average Price Paid
2018 2017 2018 2017 
First quarter 9,259,004 7,531,300 $132.84 $106.55 
Second quarter [a] 33,229,992 7,788,283 142.74 109.10 
Third quarter 2,239,405 11,801,755 151.94 106.69 
Fourth quarter [b] 12,490,632 9,231,510 153.04 119.37 
Total 57,219,033 36,352,848 $143.75 $110.40 
Remaining number of shares that may be repurchased under current
authority26,428,119 
[a]Includes initial delivery of 19,870,292 shares repurchased under accelerated share repurchase
programs.
[b]Includes 4,457,356 shares received upon settlement of accelerated share repurchase programs.    
Management's assessments of market conditions and other pertinent factors guide the
timing and volume of all repurchases. We expect to fund any share repurchases under
this program through cash generated from operations, the sale or lease of various
operating and non-operating properties, debt issuances, and cash on hand. Open
market repurchases are recorded in treasury stock at cost, which includes any
applicable commissions and fees.
From January 1, 2019, through February 7, 2019, we repurchased 3.4 million shares
at an aggregate cost of approximately $521 million.
On February 7, 2019, the Board of Directors approved a new share repurchase
authorization, enabling the Company to buy up to 150 million of its common shares by
March 31, 2022. The new authorization is effective April 1, 2019, and replaces the
current authorization, which will now expire on March 31, 2019.
Accelerated Share Repurchase Programs – On June 14, 2018, the Company
established accelerated share repurchase programs (ASRs) with two financial
institutions to repurchase shares of our common stock. Under these ASRs, we paid a
pre-specified amount of $3.6 billion and received an initial delivery of 19,870,292
shares on June 15, 2018. Upon settlement of the ASRs, we received 4,457,356
additional shares in the fourth quarter of 2018. The final number of shares
repurchased under the ASRs was based on the volume weighted average stock price
of the Company’s common stock during the ASR term, less a negotiated discount. 
ASRs are accounted for as equity transactions, and at the time of receipt, shares are
included in treasury stock at fair market value as of the corresponding initiation or
settlement date. The Company reflects shares received as a repurchase of common
stock in the weighted average common shares outstanding calculation for basic and
diluted earnings per share.
20. Related Parties
UPRR and other North American railroad companies jointly own TTX Company
(TTX).  UPRR has a 36.79% economic and voting interest in TTX while the other North
American railroads own the remaining interest.  In accordance with ASC 323
Investments - Equity Method and Joint Venture, UPRR applies the equity method of
accounting to our investment in TTX.
TTX is a railcar pooling company that owns railcars and intermodal wells to serve
North America’s railroads.  TTX assists railroads in meeting the needs of their
customers by providing railcars in an efficient, pooled environment.  All railroads have
the ability to utilize TTX railcars through car hire by renting railcars at stated rates.
 
77
 
UPRR had $1.3 billion and $1.2 billion recognized as investments related to TTX in our
Consolidated Statements of Financial Position as of December 31, 2018, and 2017,
respectively. TTX car hire expenses of $429 million in 2018, $388 million in 2017, and
$368 million in 2016 are included in equipment and other rents in our Consolidated
Statements of Income.  In addition, UPRR had accounts payable to TTX of $66 million
and $69 million at December 31, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
 
21. Selected Quarterly Data (Unaudited)
Millions, Except Per Share Amounts
2018 Mar. 31 Jun. 30 Sep. 30 Dec. 31
Operating revenues $5,475 $5,672 $5,928 $5,757 
Operating income 1,939 2,099 2,269 2,210 
Net income 1,310 1,509 1,593 1,554 
Net income per share:
     Basic 1.69 1.98 2.16 2.13 
     Diluted 1.68 1.98 2.15 2.12 
Millions, Except Per Share Amounts
2017 Mar. 31 Jun. 30 Sep. 30 Dec. 31
Operating revenues $5,132 $5,250 $5,408 $5,450 
Operating income 1,788 1,998 2,073 2,247 
Net income 1,072 1,168 1,194 7,278 
Net income per share:
     Basic 1.32 1.45 1.50 9.29 
     Diluted 1.32 1.45 1.50 9.25 
Per share net income for the four quarters combined may not equal the per share net
income for the year due to rounding.
 
 
78
 
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and
Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures
As of the end of the period covered by this report, the Corporation carried out an
evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of the Corporation’s
management, including the Corporation’s Chief Executive Officer (CEO) and Executive
Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (CFO), of the effectiveness of the design
and operation of the Corporation’s disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to
Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15. In designing and evaluating the disclosure
controls and procedures, management recognized that any controls and procedures,
no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable assurance of
achieving the desired control objectives. Based upon that evaluation, the CEO and the
CFO concluded that, as of the end of the period covered by this report, the
Corporation’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective to provide reasonable
assurance that information required to be disclosed in our Exchange Act reports is
recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified by
the SEC, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to
management, including the CEO and CFO, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions
regarding required disclosure.
Additionally, the CEO and CFO determined that there were no changes to the
Corporation’s internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act
Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) during the last fiscal quarter that materially affected, or
are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Corporation’s internal control over
financial reporting.
 
79
 
MANAGEMENT’S ANNUAL REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL
REPORTING
The management of Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies (the
Corporation) is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control
over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)).
The Corporation’s internal control system was designed to provide reasonable
assurance to the Corporation’s management and Board of Directors regarding the
preparation and fair presentation of published financial statements.
All internal control systems, no matter how well designed, have inherent limitations.
Therefore, even those systems determined to be effective can provide only reasonable
assurance with respect to financial statement preparation and presentation.
The Corporation’s management assessed the effectiveness of the Corporation’s
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018. In making this
assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated
Framework (2013). Based on our assessment, management believes that, as of
December 31, 2018, the Corporation’s internal control over financial reporting is
effective based on those criteria.
The Corporation’s independent registered public accounting firm has issued an
attestation report on the effectiveness of the Corporation’s internal control over
financial reporting. This report appears on the next page.
February 7, 2019
 
80
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Union Pacific Corporation
Omaha, Nebraska
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Union Pacific
Corporation and Subsidiary Companies (the "Corporation") as of December 31, 2018,
based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(COSO). In our opinion, the Corporation maintained, in all material respects, effective
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria
established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated statements of
financial position of the Corporation as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related
consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, changes in common
shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2018, and the related notes and the schedule listed in the Table of
Contents at Part IV, Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “financial statements”) and
our report dated February 8, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial
statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Corporation’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control
over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report
on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion
on the Corporation’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Corporation in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those
standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance
about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all
material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control
over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and
evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the
assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in
the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our
opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide
reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation
of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes
those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the
assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the
company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention
or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to
future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Omaha, Nebraska
February 8, 2019
 
81
 
Item 9B. Other Information
None.
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance
(a)Directors of Registrant.
Information as to the names, ages, positions and offices with UPC, terms of office,
periods of service, business experience during the past five years and certain
other directorships held by each director or person nominated to become a
director of UPC is set forth in the Election of Directors segment of the Proxy
Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
Information concerning our Audit Committee and the independence of its
members, along with information about the audit committee financial expert(s)
serving on the Audit Committee, is set forth in the Audit Committee segment of the
Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
(b)Executive Officers of Registrant.
Information concerning the executive officers of UPC and its subsidiaries is
presented in Part I of this report under Executive Officers of the Registrant and
Principal Executive Officers of Subsidiaries.
(c)Section 16(a) Compliance.
Information concerning compliance with Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 is set forth in the Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting
Compliance segment of the Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by
reference.
(d)Code of Ethics for Chief Executive Officer and Senior Financial Officers of
Registrant.
The Board of Directors of UPC has adopted the UPC Code of Ethics for the Chief
Executive Officer and Senior Financial Officers (the Code). A copy of the Code
may be found on the Internet at our website www.up.com/investor/governance. We
intend to disclose any amendments to the Code or any waiver from a provision of
the Code on our website.
Item 11. Executive Compensation
Information concerning compensation received by our directors and our named
executive officers is presented in the Compensation Discussion and Analysis,
Summary Compensation Table, Grants of Plan-Based Awards in Fiscal Year 2018,
Outstanding Equity Awards at 2018 Fiscal Year-End, Option Exercises and Stock
Vested in Fiscal Year 2018, Pension Benefits at 2018 Fiscal Year-End, Nonqualified
Deferred Compensation at 2018 Fiscal Year-End, Potential Payments Upon
Termination or Change in Control and Director Compensation in Fiscal Year 2018
segments of the Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference. Additional
information regarding compensation of directors, including Board committee members,
is set forth in the By-Laws of UPC and the Stock Unit Grant and Deferred
Compensation Plan for the Board of Directors, both of which are included as exhibits
to this report. Information regarding the Compensation and Benefits Committee is set
forth in the Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation and
Compensation Committee Report segments of the Proxy Statement and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and
Related Stockholder Matters
Information as to the number of shares of our equity securities beneficially owned by
each of our directors and nominees for director, our named executive officers, our
directors and executive officers as a group, and certain beneficial owners is set forth in
the Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management segment of the
Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
82
 
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director
Independence
Information on related transactions is set forth in the Certain Relationships and
Related Transactions and Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider
Participation segments of the Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by
reference. We do not have any relationship with any outside third party that would
enable such a party to negotiate terms of a material transaction that may not be
available to, or available from, other parties on an arm’s-length basis.
Information regarding the independence of our directors is set forth in the Director
Independence segment of the Proxy Statement and is incorporated herein by
reference.
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services
Information concerning the fees billed by our independent registered public accounting
firm and the nature of services comprising the fees for each of the two most recent
fiscal years in each of the following categories: (i) audit fees, (ii) audit-related fees, (iii)
tax fees, and (iv) all other fees, is set forth in the Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm’s Fees and Services segment of the Proxy Statement and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Information concerning our Audit Committee’s policies and procedures pertaining to
pre-approval of audit and non-audit services rendered by our independent registered
public accounting firm is set forth in the Audit Committee segment of the Proxy
Statement and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
83
 
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules
(a)    Financial Statements, Financial Statement Schedules, and Exhibits:
(1)    Financial Statements
The financial statements filed as part of this filing are listed on the index to the
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data, Item 8, on page 44.
(2)    Financial Statement Schedules
Schedule II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
Schedules not listed above have been omitted because they are not applicable or
not required or the information required to be set forth therein is included in the
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data, Item 8, or notes thereto.
(3)    Exhibits
Exhibits are listed in the exhibit index beginning on page 87. The exhibits include
management contracts, compensatory plans and arrangements required to be
filed as exhibits to the Form 10-K by Item 601 (10) (iii) of Regulation S-K.
 
84
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on this 8th day of February, 2019.
UNION PACIFIC CORPORATION  
   
By/s/ Lance M. Fritz  
 Lance M. Fritz,  
 Chairman, President and  
 Chief Executive Officer  
 Union Pacific Corporation  
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has
been signed below, on this 8th day of February, 2019, by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated.
PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER  
AND DIRECTOR:    
    
 By/s/ Lance M. Fritz  
  Lance M. Fritz,  
  Chairman, President and  
  Chief Executive Officer  
  Union Pacific Corporation  
PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER:  
    
 By/s/ Robert M. Knight, Jr.  
  Robert M. Knight, Jr.,  
  Executive Vice President and  
  Chief Financial Officer  
PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING
OFFICER:  
    
 By/s/ Todd M. Rynaski  
  Todd M. Rynaski,  
  Vice President and Controller  
DIRECTORS:
Andrew H. Card, Jr.* Jane H. Lute*
Erroll B. Davis, Jr.* Michael R. McCarthy*
William J. DeLaney* Thomas F. McLarty III*
David B. Dillon* Bhavesh V. Patel*
Deborah C. Hopkins* Jose H. Villarreal*
 
 
 
* ByRhonda S. Ferguson  
Rhonda S. Ferguson, Attorney-in-fact 
 
85
 
SCHEDULE II – VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Union Pacific Corporation and Subsidiary Companies
Millions, for the Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 
Accrued casualty costs:
     Balance, beginning of period $ 684 $ 716 $ 736 
     Charges to expense 202 167 202 
     Cash payments and other reductions (177) (199) (222)
Balance, end of period $ 709 $ 684 $ 716 
Accrued casualty costs are presented in the
Consolidated Statements of Financial Position as follows:
     Current $ 211 $ 194 $ 185 
     Long-term 498 490 531 
Balance, end of period $ 709 $ 684 $ 716 
 
 
86
 
UNION PACIFIC CORPORATION
Exhibit Index
  
Exhibit No. Description
Filed with this Statement
10(a) Form of Performance Stock Unit Agreement dated February 7,
2019.
10(b) Form of Stock Unit Agreement for Executives dated February 7,
2019.
10(c) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Executives
dated February 7, 2019.
21 List of the Corporation’s significant subsidiaries and their
respective states of incorporation.
23 Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm’s Consent.
24 Powers of attorney executed by the directors of UPC.
31(a) Certifications Pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a), of the Exchange Act,
as Adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002 - Lance M. Fritz.
31(b) Certifications Pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a), of the Exchange Act,
as Adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002 - Robert M. Knight, Jr.
32 Certifications Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 -
Lance M. Fritz and Robert M. Knight, Jr.
101 eXtensible Business Reporting Language (XBRL) documents
submitted electronically: 101.INS (XBRL Instance Document),
101.SCH (XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document),
101.CAL (XBRL Calculation Linkbase Document), 101.LAB
(XBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document), 101.DEF (XBRL
Taxonomy Definition Linkbase Document) and 101.PRE (XBRL
Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document). The following
financial and related information from Union Pacific Corporation’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2018 (filed with the SEC on February 8, 2019), is formatted in
XBRL and submitted electronically herewith:  (i) Consolidated
Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017 and 2016, (ii) Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive
Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016,
(iii) Consolidated Statements of Financial Position at December
31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, (iv) Consolidated Statements
of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016, (v) Consolidated Statements of Changes in Common
Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017 and 2016, and (vi) the Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
  
 
Incorporated by Reference
3(a) Restated Articles of Incorporation of UPC, as amended and
restated through June 27, 2011, and as further amended May 15,
2014, are incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 3(a) to the
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2014.
3(b) By-Laws of UPC, as amended, effective November 19, 2015, are
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to the
Corporation’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated November 19,
2015.
 
87
 
4(a) Indenture, dated as of December 20, 1996, between UPC and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as successor to
Citibank, N.A., as Trustee, is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to UPC’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No.
333-18345).
4(b) Indenture, dated as of April 1, 1999, between UPC and The Bank
of New York, as successor to JP Morgan Chase Bank, formerly
The Chase Manhattan Bank, as Trustee, is incorporated herein
by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to UPC’s Registration Statement on
Form S-3 (No. 333-75989).
4(c) Form of 3.200% Note due 2021 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(d) Form of 3.500% Note due 2023 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(e) Form of 3.750% Note due 2025 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(f) Form of 3.950% Note due 2028 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(g) Form of 4.375% Note due 2038 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(h) Form of 4.500% Note due 2048 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.6 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
4(i) Form of 4.800% Note due 2058 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 4.7 to the Corporation’s Current Report on
Form 8-K dated June 8, 2018.
 Certain instruments evidencing long-term indebtedness of UPC
are not filed as exhibits because the total amount of securities
authorized under any single such instrument does not exceed
10% of the Corporation’s total consolidated assets. UPC agrees
to furnish the Commission with a copy of any such instrument
upon request by the Commission.
10(d) Supplemental Thrift Plan (409A Grandfathered Component) of
Union Pacific Corporation, as amended March 1, 2013, is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(d) to the
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2013.
10(e) Supplemental Pension Plan for Officers and Managers (409A
Grandfathered Component) of Union Pacific Corporation and
Affiliates, as amended February 1, 2013, and March 1, 2013 is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(f) to the
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2013.
10(f) Union Pacific Corporation Key Employee Continuity Plan, as
amended February 6, 2014, is incorporated herein by reference
to Exhibit 10(d) to the Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10(g) Union Pacific Corporation Executive Incentive Plan, effective
May 5, 2005, amended and restated effective January 1, 2009, is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(g) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2008.
10(h) Deferred Compensation Plan (409A Grandfathered Component)
of Union Pacific Corporation, as amended March 1, 2013, is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(b) to the
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2013.
 
88
 
10(i) Deferred Compensation Plan (409A Non-Grandfathered
Component) of Union Pacific Corporation, as amended
December 17, 2013, is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10(e) to the Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10(j) Union Pacific Corporation 2000 Directors Plan, effective as of
April 21, 2000, as amended November 16, 2006, January 30,
2007 and January 1, 2009 is incorporated herein by reference to
Exhibit 10(j) to the Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 2008.
10(k) Union Pacific Corporation Stock Unit Grant and Deferred
Compensation Plan for the Board of Directors (409A Non-
Grandfathered Component), effective as of January 1, 2009 is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(k) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2008.
10(l) Union Pacific Corporation Stock Unit Grant and Deferred
Compensation Plan for the Board of Directors (409A
Grandfathered Component), as amended and restated in its
entirety, effective as of January 1, 2009 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 10(l) to the Corporation’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008.
10(m) Union Pacific Corporation 2013 Stock Incentive Plan, effective
May 16, 2013, is incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 4.3
to the Corporation’s Form S-8 dated May 17, 2013.
10(n) UPC 2004 Stock Incentive Plan amended March 1, 2013, is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(g) to the
Corporation’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2013.
10(o) Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement, dated as
of July 12, 1996, among UPC, UP Holding Company, Inc., Union
Pacific Merger Co. and Southern Pacific Rail Corporation (SP) is
incorporated herein by reference to Annex J to the Joint Proxy
Statement/Prospectus included in Post-Effective Amendment No.
2 to UPC’s Registration Statement on Form S-4 (No. 33-64707).
10(p) Agreement, dated September 25, 1995, among UPC, UPRR,
Missouri Pacific Railroad Company (MPRR), SP, Southern
Pacific Transportation Company (SPT), The Denver & Rio
Grande Western Railroad Company (D&RGW), St. Louis
Southwestern Railway Company (SLSRC) and SPCSL Corp.
(SPCSL), on the one hand, and Burlington Northern Railroad
Company (BN) and The Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway
Company (Santa Fe), on the other hand, is incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.11 to UPC’s Registration Statement on
Form S-4 (No. 33-64707).
10(q) Supplemental Agreement, dated November 18, 1995, between
UPC, UPRR, MPRR, SP, SPT, D&RGW, SLSRC and SPCSL, on
the one hand, and BN and Santa Fe, on the other hand, is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10.12 to UPC’s
Registration Statement on Form S-4 (No. 33-64707).
10(r) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Executives is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(c) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012.
10(s) Form of Stock Unit Agreement for Executives is incorporated
herein by reference to Exhibit 10(b) to the Corporation’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012.
10(t) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement for Executives is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(c) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2013.
 
89
 
10(u) Form of Stock Unit Agreement for Executives is incorporated
herein by reference to Exhibit 10(b) to the Corporation’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2013.
10(v) Form of 2016 Long Term Plan Stock Unit Agreement is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(a) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2015.
10(w) Form of 2017 Long Term Plan Stock Unit Agreement is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(a) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2016.
10(x) Form of 2018 Long Term Plan Stock Unit Agreement is
incorporated herein by reference to Exhibit 10(a) to the
Corporation’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2017.
10(y) Executive Incentive Plan (2005) – Deferred Compensation
Program, dated December 21, 2005 is incorporated herein by
reference to Exhibit 10(g) to the Corporation’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
 
90
